North Carolina, session 2025, SB915.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE AND INTRODUCTION

TITLE OF ACT
SECTION 1.1. This act shall be known as the "Current Operations Appropriations
Act of 2026."

INTRODUCTION
SECTION 1.2. The appropriations made in this act are for maximum amounts
necessary to provide the services and accomplish the purposes described in the budget in
accordance with the State Budget Act. Savings shall be effected where the total amounts
appropriated are not required to perform these services and accomplish these purposes, and the
savings shall revert to the appropriate fund at the end of each fiscal year, except as otherwise
provided by law.

PART II. CURRENT OPERATIONS AND EXPANSION/GENERAL FUND

GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 2.1.(a) Notwithstanding any bill with an appropriation enacted in the
2025-27 biennium, appropriations from the General Fund for the budgets of the State
departments, institutions, and agencies, and for other purposes as enumerated, are made for each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, according to the following schedule:

Current Operations – General Fund FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027

EDUCATION
Community College System 1,730,176,632 1,880,055,057

Public Instruction 12,386,402,718 13,604,577,403

Governor Morehead School 10,656,568 11,500,741
*S915-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
NC School for the Deaf 12,169,049 13,085,861
Eastern NC School for the Deaf 10,740,596 11,534,374

Appalachian State University 209,862,595 209,862,595
East Carolina University
Academic Affairs 274,127,761 274,127,761
Health Affairs 107,144,915 107,144,915
Elizabeth City State University 48,513,547 48,513,547
Fayetteville State 87,586,990 87,586,990
NC A&T State University 162,728,474 162,743,010
NC Central University 98,572,636 98,572,636
NC State University
Academic Affairs 564,312,136 564,676,069
Agricultural Extension 46,543,237 46,543,237
Agricultural Research 63,465,016 63,465,016
UNC-Asheville 51,101,094 51,101,094
UNC-Chapel Hill
Academic Affairs 385,597,924 385,597,924
Health Affairs 249,399,553 249,399,553
AHEC 56,855,450 56,855,450
UNC-Charlotte 331,584,743 331,584,743
UNC-Greensboro 204,987,083 204,987,083
UNC-Pembroke 95,473,853 95,473,853
UNC-School of the Arts 41,972,163 41,972,163
UNC-Wilmington 217,239,729 217,239,729
Western Carolina University 164,563,738 164,589,450
Winston-Salem State University 68,743,773 68,743,773
General Administration 50,098,094 50,098,094
University Institutional Programs 312,000,384 620,191,944
Related Educational Programs 863,278,591 (114,721,409)
NC School of Science and Math 45,240,766 45,240,766
Aid to Private Institutions 1,209,300 11,209,300
Total University of North Carolina 4,802,203,545 4,142,799,286

HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Department of Health and Human Services
Aging and Adult Services 52,856,717 52,928,118
Central Management and Support 216,458,444 299,971,801
Child Development and Early Education 306,105,539 357,126,631
Child and Family Well Being 62,811,146 71,354,616
Health Benefits 6,844,445,224 7,627,688,832
Health Services Regulation 26,819,231 28,693,218
Mental Hlth/Dev. Disabl./Subs. Abuse Serv. 779,898,008 852,018,243
Public Health 133,644,399 121,290,363
Services for the Blind, Deaf and Hard of Hearing 9,599,492 10,504,110
Social Services 227,241,733 237,710,782
Vocational Rehabilitation 44,304,406 46,783,297
Total Health and Human Services 8,704,184,339 9,706,070,011

AGRICULTURE, NATURAL, AND ECONOMIC RESOURCES
Agriculture and Consumer Services 180,358,286 197,624,154
Page 2 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

Department of Commerce
Commerce 15,714,916 29,698,492
General State Aid 19,655,810 22,155,810
Economic Development 158,348,245 166,348,245

Environmental Quality 110,279,177 177,714,471

Labor 27,314,942 29,571,924

Department of Natural and Cultural Resources 285,859,993 336,482,888

Wildlife Resources Commission 18,430,344 20,291,774

JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY
Judicial Department 824,319,035 877,409,507

Judicial Department – Indigent Defense Services 174,735,348 182,710,624

Department of Justice 69,612,137 95,498,653

Department of Public Safety 665,993,291 697,589,873

Department of Adult Correction 2,226,163,079 2,301,698,762

State Bureau of Investigation 101,498,162 74,629,912

State Highway Patrol 26,056,834 49,929,942

GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Department of Administration 73,131,081 76,087,478

Office of Administrative Hearings 8,485,540 10,401,718

State Board of Elections 12,755,150 13,108,296

Office of State Auditor 25,984,513 26,878,912

Office of State Controller 36,885,814 37,867,492

General Assembly 105,392,840 109,503,336

Office of the Governor 6,985,397 7,766,647

Office of State Budget and Management
Office of State Budget and Management 11,996,615 13,050,765
OSBM – Reserve for Special Appropriations 10,300,000 12,000,000

Housing Finance Agency 10,660,000 70,660,000

Office of State Human Resource 12,209,780 16,914,870
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

Department of Insurance
Insurance 61,692,190 82,365,350
Insurance – Industrial Commission 14,615,798 15,573,874

Office of Lieutenant Governor 1,387,170 1,429,756

Department of Military and Veterans Affairs 9,113,460 10,190,758

Department of Revenue 124,029,089 141,251,495

Department of Secretary of State 19,840,122 23,137,780

Department of State Treasurer
Treasurer 209,074 877,074
Treasurer – Retirement System 24,394,657 24,394,657

Information Technology 75,729,621 129,861,153

RESERVES, DEBT, AND OTHER BUDGETS
Statewide Reserves 67,206,909 (16,304,782)

Total Net Appropriation 33,273,877,866 35,435,994,393

SECTION 2.1.(b) For purposes of this act, the requirements set forth in this section
represent the total amount of funds, including agency receipts, appropriated to an agency,
department, or institution.

GENERAL FUND AVAILABILITY
SECTION 2.2.(a) The General Fund availability derived from State tax revenue,
nontax revenue, and other adjustments used in developing the budget for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium is as follows:

FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027

Unappropriated Balance from Prior Fiscal Year 48,073,341 1,137,648,682
Over Collections 394,728,847 369,815,741
Estimated Reversions 448,182,114 400,000,000
Total, Current Beginning Unreserved Balance 890,984,302 1,907,464,423

Statutorily Required Reservations of Revenue
State Capital and Infrastructure Fund (1,120,000,000) 0
Savings Reserve (68,642,013) (60,465,000)
Subtotal (1,188,642,013) (60,465,000)

Additional Investments to Reserves
State Capital and Infrastructure Fund 0 (1,159,200,000)
State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund 0 (500,000,000)
Contingency and Emergency Reserve 0 (10,000,000)
Subtotal, Investments to Reserves 0 (1,669,200,000)

Page 4 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Tax Revenues
Individual Income 16,892,700,000 16,614,600,000
Sales and Use 11,492,800,000 11,784,500,000
Corporate Income 1,379,400,000 1,320,500,000
Franchise 787,800,000 792,300,000
Insurance 1,417,370,000 1,605,700,000
Alcoholic Beverage 560,600,000 554,300,000
Tobacco Products 240,800,000 237,500,000
Other Tax Revenue 228,630,000 248,500,000
Subtotal, Tax Revenues 33,000,190,000 33,157,900,000

Non-tax Revenues
Judicial Fees 202,400,000 218,000,000
Investment Income 702,900,000 637,200,000
Disproportionate Share 171,400,000 174,600,000
Master Settlement Agreement 97,600,000 98,000,000
Insurance 123,394,259 127,100,000
Other Non-tax Revenue 289,300,000 302,700,000
Subtotal, Non-tax Revenue 1,586,994,259 1,557,600,000

ARPA SFRF Interest 122,000,000 4,000,000

Total, Net Revenues 34,709,184,259 34,719,500,000

Adjustments to Revenues:
Maintain Individual Income Tax at 3.99% 896,000,000
Increase Standard Deduction from $25,500 to $26,500 (53,000,000)
Working Families Tax Credit – 10% of federal
Earned Income Tax Credit (240,000,000)
Refundable Child and Dependent Care Tax Credit (55,000,000)
Sales Tax Back-to-School Holiday (29,900,000)
Subtotal, Adjustments to Tax Revenues 518,100,000

Adjustments to Availability
NCInnovation Clawback – to be Deposited in SERDRF 500,000,000
Insurance Non-Tax Transfer 22,426,526

Revised Total Net General Fund Availability 34,411,526,548 35,937,825,949

Less Base Budget (31,918,784,866) (32,066,568,438)

Total Recommended Adjustments (1,355,093,000) (3,369,425,955)

Total Recommended Appropriations (33,273,877,866) (35,440,494,393)

Unappropriated Balance Remaining 1,137,648,682 501,831,556

SECTION 2.2.(b) IT Reserve – The State Controller shall transfer the sum of one
hundred sixty-five million six hundred sixty-seven thousand six hundred fifty-three dollars
($165,667,653) from the unreserved fund balance in the Information Technology Project Reserve
to the Office of State Budget and Management. Funds appropriated from the Information
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Technology Project Reserve shall be allocated by the Director of the State Budget in consultation
with the State Chief Information Officer and the head of the department with primary ownership
over the information technology project based on documented project needs. Funds transferred
under this section are appropriated in the year in which they are transferred and shall be used for
the following information technology projects:
(1) The Department of Information Technology's project to modernize data
storage by switching to hybrid cloud and local storage.
(2) The Department of Adult Correction's OPUS system and Rounds Tracking
Software.
(3) Eastern North Carolina's School for the Deaf’s ADA Campus Wide
Emergency Visual Alert System.
(4) The Modernizing Payroll Reserve for the replacement of the state's payroll
system.
(5) The Governor Morehead School’s Network Upgrade.
(6) The Department of Public Instruction's PSU school business system
modernization.
(7) The Office of State Human Resources' human capital management (HCM)
Phase I Enhancements.
(8) The Department of Revenue's DataPower and Network Files end of life
replacements, datacenter hardware replacement, and replacement of the RCA
desktop client.
(9) The State Board of Elections' election modernization Stage III project.
(10) The State Bureau of Investigation for its IT infrastructure project, Behavioral
Threat Assessment Management System, and Real-time Threat Alerting
Platform.
(11) The Office of Administrative Hearings’ Database Development System.
(12) The Department of Commerce's Modernized NCCareer Information System.
(13) The Department of the Secretary of State's Hardware Update program.
(14) The Office of Indigent Defense Services' Indigency Determination Pilot.
(15) The Department of Justice’s Legal Case Management System.
SECTION 2.2.(c) Medicaid Contingency Reserve. – The balance of the Medicaid
Contingency Reserve is hereby appropriated.
SECTION 2.2.(d) Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve. – Notwithstanding
subsection 2.2.(m) of S.L. 2022-74, the State Controller shall transfer funds available in the
Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve to agencies and departments as needed to draw down
federal funds in accordance with the following schedule, and the funds transferred are
appropriated for the 2026-2027 fiscal year:
(1) Eleven million, seven hundred seventy thousand, seven hundred fifty dollars
($11,770,750) to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for
the required match to leverage two agricultural conservation easement
agreements;
(2) Eight million, six hundred thirty-two thousand, one hundred sixty-six dollars
($8,632,166) to the Department of Environmental Quality to meet the state's
required cost share for federally led cleanup activities at Superfund National
Priorities List sites.
(3) Eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($850,000) to the Department of
Environmental Quality to leverage additional federal funds for the
Albemarle-Pamlico National Estuary Partnership.
(4) The Department of Environmental Quality may access any remaining funds
in the Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve, if interest earnings are
insufficient to meet the required State match for the federal Drinking Water
Page 6 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
State Revolving Fund and Clean Water State Revolving Fund programs, for
the purpose of providing the required match.
(5) The Office of State Budget and Management may access any remaining funds
in the Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve to provide support to State
agencies in mitigating the fiscal impacts of federal spending freezes, federal
government shutdowns, or reductions in federal spending.
SECTION 2.2.(e) The State Controller shall reserve from funds available in the
General Fund the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-27
fiscal year to the Contingency and Emergency Fund in the General Fund. Funds under this section
are appropriated in the year in which they are reserved.
SECTION 2.2.(f) Except as otherwise specifically provided, nothing in this section
shall be construed as appropriating funds reserved pursuant to this section. Funds reserved
pursuant to this section do not constitute an "appropriation made by law," as that phrase is used
in Section 7(1) of Article V of the North Carolina Constitution.
SECTION 2.2.(g) The State Controller shall ensure that the transfers required under
this section are completed as soon as practicable but no later than the end of the 2026-2027 fiscal
year. In making the transfers required under this section, the State Controller shall prioritize
transfers to Reserves that support expenditures.

PART III. HIGHWAY FUND AND HIGHWAY TRUST FUND

CURRENT OPERATIONS/HIGHWAY FUND
SECTION 3.1. Appropriations from the State Highway Fund for the maintenance
and operation of the Department of Transportation and for other purposes as enumerated are
made for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, according to the following schedule:

Highway Fund FY 2026-2027
Administration 141,758,209
Division of Highways
Administration 38,287,904
Construction 77,543,078
Maintenance 2,191,689,355
Governor's Highway Safety Program 351,695
OSHA 358,030

Aid to Municipalities
Powell Bill 185,875,000

Intermodal Divisions
Ferry 93,637,728
Public Transportation, Bicycle and Pedestrian 90,220,554
Aviation 164,074,415
Rail 78,367,607

Division of Motor Vehicles 170,100,604

Other State Agencies, Reserves, Transfers 139,011,958

Capital Improvements 23,613,813

Total Highway Fund Appropriations $3,399,889,949
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

HIGHWAY FUND AVAILABILITY
SECTION 3.2. The Highway Fund availability for the 2026-2027 fiscal year budget
is shown below:
FY 2026-2027
Consensus Revenue Forecast
Motor Fuels Tax 1,904,200,000
Licenses and Fees 1,141,800,000
Short-Term Lease 124,500,000
Investment Income 24,400,000
Sales Tax Transfer 176,200,000
Jet Fuel Sales 12,600,000
Transportation Commerce Tax 13,800,000
N Dividend 4,800,000
Total Highway Fund Availability $3,402,300,000

HIGHWAY TRUST FUND APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 3.3. Appropriations from the State Highway Trust Fund to the
Department of Transportation for construction and other purposes as enumerated are made for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, according to the following schedule:

Current Operations – Highway Trust Fund FY 2026-2027
Program Administration 45,117,311
Bonds 121,436,275
Turnpike Authority 49,000,000
State Ports Authority 45,000,000
Strategic Prioritization Funding Plan for
Transportation Investments 2,306,935,414
Transfer to Visitor Center 640,000
Other State Agencies 371,000

Total Highway Trust Fund Appropriations $2,568,500,000

HIGHWAY TRUST FUND AVAILABILITY
SECTION 3.4. The Highway Trust Fund availability for the 2026-2027 fiscal year
budget is shown below:
FY 2026-2027
Consensus Revenue Forecast
Highway Use Tax 1,181,500,000
Motor Fuels Tax 636,400,000
Fees 177,700,000
Investment Income 44,300,000
Sales Tax Transfer 528,600,000

Total Highway Trust Fund Availability $2,568,500,000

PART IV. OTHER AVAILABILITY AND APPROPRIATIONS

CASH BALANCES AND OTHER APPROPRIATIONS
Page 8 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4.1.(a) Cash balances, federal funds, departmental receipts, grants, and
gifts from the General Fund, revenue funds, enterprise funds, and internal service funds are
appropriated for the 2026-2027 fiscal year as follows:
(1) For all budget codes listed in the Governor's Recommended Budget for the
2026-2027 fiscal year, dated April 2026, and in the Budget Support
Document, fund balances and receipts are appropriated up to the amounts
specified, as adjusted by the General Assembly, for the 2026-2027 fiscal year.
Funds may be expended only for the programs, purposes, objects, and line
items or as otherwise authorized by the General Assembly. Expansion budget
funds listed in those documents are appropriated only as otherwise provided
in this act.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection:
a. Any receipts that are required to be used to pay debt service
requirements for various outstanding bond issues and certificates of
participation are appropriated up to the actual amounts received for the
2026-2027 fiscal year and shall be used only to pay debt service
requirements.
b. Other funds, cash balances, and receipts of funds that meet the
definition issued by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board of
a trust or agency fund are appropriated for and in the amounts required
to meet the legal requirements of the trust agreement for the 2026-2027
fiscal year.
SECTION 4.1.(b) Receipts collected in a fiscal year in excess of the amounts
appropriated by this section shall remain unexpended and unencumbered until appropriated by
the General Assembly, unless the expenditure of over-realized receipts in the fiscal year in which
the receipts were collected is authorized by the State Budget Act. Over-realized receipts are
appropriated in the amounts necessary to implement this subsection.
SECTION 4.1.(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, there is
appropriated from the Reserve for Reimbursements to Local Governments and Shared Tax
Revenues for each fiscal year an amount equal to the amount of the distributions required by law
to be made from that reserve for that fiscal year.

EDUCATION LOTTERY FUNDS/CHANGES TO REVENUE ALLOCATIONS
SECTION 4.2. Section 2A.1.(a) of S.L. 2025-89 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2A.1.(a) The allocations made from the Education Lottery Fund for the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium are as follows:
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
Noninstructional Support Personnel $385,914,455 $385,914,455
Prekindergarten Program 78,252,110 78,252,110
Universal School Breakfast 56,227,388
Public School Building Capital Fund 100,000,000 100,000,000
Needs-Based Public School Capital Fund 258,252,612 258,252,612
Public School Repair & Renovation 50,000,000 50,000,000
Scholarship Reserve Fund for Public Colleges
and Universities 17,748,769 17,748,769
Children of Wartime Veterans Scholarship 11,070,964 11,070,964
School Transportation 182,193,702 186,033,702
TOTAL ALLOCATION $1,083,432,612$1,143,500,0001,087,272,612"

INDIAN GAMING EDUCATION REVENUE FUND APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 4.3. Section 2A.2.(a) of S.L. 2025-89 reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"SECTION 2A.2.(a) The allocations made from the Indian Gaming Education Revenue
Fund for the 2025-27 fiscal biennium are as follows:
FY 2026-2027 FY 2026-2027
Textbook and Digital Resources Allotment $10,000,000 $10,000,000
Classroom Materials 15,500,000 53,500,000
Total Appropriation $25,500,000 $153,500,000"

CIVIL PENALTY AND FORFEITURE FUND
SECTION 4.4. Section 2A.3.(a) of S.L. 2025-89 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2A.3.(a) The allocations made from the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund for
the 2025-27 fiscal biennium are as follows:
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
School Technology Fund $18,000,000 $18,000,000
Drivers Education 31,493,768 31,493,768
State Public School Fund 186,041,640 166,041,640
Devices for Students 15,000,000
Universal School Breakfast 15,000,000
Total Appropriation $235,535,408 $24515,535,408"

PART V. GENERAL PROVISIONS

ESTABLISHING OR INCREASING FEES
SECTION 5.1.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 123.1, an agency is not required to consult
with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations prior to establishing or
increasing a fee to the level authorized or anticipated in this act.
SECTION 5.1.(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-21.1A(a), an agency may adopt an
emergency rule in accordance with G.S. 150B-21.1A to establish or increase a fee as authorized
by this act if the adoption of a rule would otherwise be required under Article 2A of Chapter
150B of the General Statutes.

CAP STATE FUNDED PORTION OF NONPROFIT SALARIES
SECTION 5.2. No more than one hundred forty thousand dollars ($140,000) in State
funds, including any interest earnings accruing from those funds, may be used for the annual
salary of any individual employee of a nonprofit organization.

2026 DISASTER RECOVERY
SECTION 5.3.(a) State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund. – Of the
nonrecurring funds appropriated in this act for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, fifty million dollars
($50,000,000) shall be allocated to the Department of Public Safety, Emergency Management
Division, to provide disaster response and recovery assistance to households and communities in
response to future storms.
SECTION 5.3.(b) Implementation. – The following actions and policies shall be
taken to implement subsection 5.3.(a):
(1) If a person's home is relocated or purchased with funds allocated in this
subsection, the State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund is
subrogated to the person's rights under any insurance coverage for the damage
to the home and any monies received from the insurance coverage shall be
paid to the State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund. The Office
of State Budget and Management shall ensure that those potentially affected
by this section are notified of, and adhere to, its requirements.
Page 10 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) No State funds appropriated in this section may be expended for the
construction of any new residence within the 100-year floodplain unless the
construction is in an area regulated by a unit of local government pursuant to
a floodplain management ordinance and the construction complies with the
ordinance. As used in this section, "100-year floodplain" means any area
subject to inundation by a 100-year flood, as indicated on the most recent
Flood Insurance Rate Map prepared by the Federal Emergency Management
Agency under the National Flood Insurance Program.
(3) Homeowners in the 100-year floodplain who receive homeowner's housing
assistance pursuant to this section shall have in effect federal flood insurance,
if available, as a precondition to receipt of State homeowner's housing
assistance for losses resulting from future flooding.
SECTION 5.3.(c) Limitation. – Funds allocated in this section shall be expended in
a manner that does not adversely affect any person's or entity's eligibility for federal funds that
are made available, or that are anticipated to be made available, as a result of natural disasters.
To the extent practicable, funds allocated in this section shall not be used to cover costs that will
be, or likely will be, covered by federal funds.
SECTION 5.3.(d) No Reversion of Funds. – Funds allocated in this section shall
remain available to implement the provisions of this section until the General Assembly directs
the reversion of any unexpended and unencumbered funds and G.S. 143C-6-23(f1)(1) shall not
apply to those funds.
SECTION 5.3.(e) Reporting Requirements. – The Office of State Budget and
Management shall provide periodic reports on the use of the funds allocated and appropriated in
this section in a manner which is consistent with Section 5.10 of Session Law 2019-250.

GOLDEN LEAF – HURRICANE HELENE BRIDGE LOAN MODIFICATIONS
SECTION 5.4.(a) Section 4C.3 of S.L. 2024-53, as modified by Section 1.1(a) of
S.L. 2025-97 reads as rewritten:
"…
"SECTION 4C.3.(d) Reversion; Reloan; Repayment. – Funds allocated by this section are
not subject to the provisions of G.S. 143C-6-23. Funds allocated by this section that have not
been expended or encumbered by October 31, 2028March 15, 2026, shall revert to the Savings
Reserve established in G.S. 143C-4-2. Net loan funds, including repayments of loans, available
to Golden LEAF prior to October 31, 2028March 15, 2026, may be loaned in accordance with
this section. Beginning December 15, 2025March 15, 2026, and every six months thereafter,
Golden LEAF shall remit the net loan funds it has received from lenders to the Office of State
Budget and Management to be placed into the Savings Reserve.
"SECTION 4C.3.(e) Reporting. – Beginning December 15, 2025March 15, 2026, and
continuing every six months thereafter, Golden LEAF shall submit a report on the program to
the Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee and
the Fiscal Research Division. The duty to report pursuant to this section shall cease after the
submission of the report following when Golden LEAF has remitted the entirety of the net loan
funds to the Office of State Budget and Management. Each report shall contain, at a minimum,
all of the following:
…."

NCINNOVATION
SECTION 5.5.(a) Return of Funds. – NCInnovation shall transfer back to the State,
after consultation with, and in conformity with direction received from, the State Controller, the
sum of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000).
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5.5.(b) State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund. – The State
Controller shall facilitate the return of transferred funds from NCInnovation pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section and shall deposit the funds into the State Emergency Response and
Disaster Relief Fund established in G.S. 166A-19.42. The transfer and deposit of funds into
reserves pursuant to this section does not constitute an "appropriation made by law," as that
phrase is used in Section 7(1) of Article V of the North Carolina Constitution. The funds shall
remain unappropriated unless the General Assembly appropriates the funds in this or a
subsequent act. In accordance with G.S. 147-69.1(d), funds in the Reserves shall be invested by
the Department of the State Treasurer, with earnings and interest therefrom being transferred to
and deposited in the General Fund.
SECTION 5.5.(c) Repeal. – Upon the return of the transferred funds to the State
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, Article 76A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is
repealed. The State Controller shall notify the Revisor of Statutes when the transfer has been
completed.
SECTION 5.5.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART VI. COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM

PROPEL NC FUNDING MODEL ADJUSTMENT
SECTION 6.1.(a) The funds appropriated in this act for Propel NC shall be used to
shift North Carolina Community College System’s enrollment formula from the current tier-
based allocation model to a labor-market driven model. This new model shall link courses to
workforce sectors that are ranked and valued by statewide salary job demand data.
SECTION 6.1.(b) The State Board of Community Colleges in consultation with the
Department of Commerce shall identify the workforce sectors aligned with the State’s high-
demand, high-salary jobs and allocate the funds appropriated in this act to those workforce
sectors. Appropriated funds may also be used for customized training and Small Business Centers
at the individual colleges.
SECTION 6.1.(c) Part 3 of Article 1 of Chapter 115D of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"§ 115D-10.5. Program funding.
…
(aa) The State Board of Community Colleges shall review and revise, as necessary, its
workforce sector designations for curriculum, workforce continuing education, and Basic Skills
courses at community colleges by July 15, 2029, and every three years thereafter.
…."

PROPEL NC ENROLLMENT INCREASE RESERVE
SECTION 6.2. G.S. 115D-31 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-31. State financial support of institutions.
…
(e) If receipts for community college tuition and fees exceed the amount certified in
General Fund Codes at the end of a fiscal year, the State Board of Community Colleges shall
transfer retain the amount of receipts and fees above those budgeted. to the Enrollment Growth
Reserve. Funds in the Enrollment Growth Reserve shall not revert to the General Fund and shall
remain available to the State Board until expended. The State Board may allocate these funds in
this reserve to colleges experiencing an enrollment increase greater than five percent (5%) of
budgeted enrollment levels.proportionally to colleges based on actual receipt collections from
the prior fiscal year.
(f) The Enrollment Increase Reserve shall be established as a recurring, nonreverting
reserve under the direction of the State Board of Community Colleges. Funds appropriated by
Page 12 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the North Carolina General Assembly shall be allocated based on actual fall semester FTE. The
method of allocation shall be as follows: at one-half the average FTE value per FTE for the
greater of FTE increases in excess of 5% for each category of instruction, or for increases in total
FTE greater than 325. If enrollment growth exceeds the funds appropriated in a given year, the
value per FTE would be reduced proportionately."

AUTHORIZE USE OF MOTORCYCLE SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAM FUNDS
FOR A CAPITAL PROJECT
SECTION 6.3.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 115D-10.50, of the funds received for the
North Carolina Motorcycle Safety Education Program (NCMSEP), the State Board of
Community Colleges may award up to five-hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to Lenoir
Community College for use in constructing or renovating a facility used for this program.
SECTION 6.3.(b) This authorization is for the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2027,
and funds transferred under subsection (a) above, shall not revert and shall remain available until
expended.

CLARIFY CUSTOMIZED TRAINING PERSONNEL
SECTION 6.4. G.S. 115D-10.17(e) reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-10.17. Customized Training Program.
…
(e) Of the funds appropriated in a fiscal year for the Customized Training Program, the
State Board of Community Colleges may approve the use of up to fifteen percent (15%) for the
training and support of regional community college personnelregionally based program
personnel to deliver Customized Training Program services to business and industry. For the
purpose of this subsection, “regionally based program personnel” is defined as the following:
(1) An individual(s) who may be hosted by a local community college to serve a
defined region of the state as assigned by the System Office.
…."

FREE COMMUNITY COLLEGE TUITION FOR HIGH DEMAND SKILLS TRAINING
SECTION 6.7. G.S. 115D-5.1A reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-10.19. Short-Term Workforce Development Grant Program.
…
(c) Award Amounts. – To the extent funds are made available for the Program, the State
Board of Community Colleges shall award grants in an amount of up to seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00) to students pursuing short‑term, noncredit State and industry workforce
credentials. The State Board of Community Colleges shall establish criteria for initial and
continuing eligibility for students. The criteria shall include a requirement that eligible students
be a resident of North Carolina pursuant to G.S. 116-143.1(a)(1). At a minimum, students shall
be required to qualify as a resident for tuition purposes under the criteria set forth in G.S.
116‑143.1 and in accordance with the coordinated and centralized residency determination
process administered by the State Education Assistance Authority.
(d) Report. – The State Board shall submit a report by April December 1 annually on the
Program to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research
Division. The report shall contain, for each academic year and by programs of study, the amount
of grant funds disbursed and the number of eligible students receiving funds."

PART VII. PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

REPEAL THE TEXTBOOK COMMISSION
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7.1.(a) G.S. 115C-86 through G.S. 115C-95 and G.S. 115C-97 are
repealed.
SECTION 7.1.(b) Part 3 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes reads
as rewritten:
"Part 3. Textbooks.Instructional Materials.
"§ 115C-85. Textbook Instructional material needs are determined by course of study.
When the State Board of Education has adopted, upon the recommendation of the
Superintendent of Public Instruction, a standard course of study at each instructional level in the
elementary school and the secondary school, setting forth what subjects shall be taught at each
level, it shall proceed to select and adopt textbooks.
As used in this part, "textbook" "instructional materials" means systematically organized
material comprehensive enough to cover the primary objectives outlined in the standard course
of study for a grade or course. Formats for textbooks instructional materials may be print or
nonprint, including hardbound books, softbound books, activity-oriented programs, classroom
kits, and technology-based programs digital resources that require the use of electronic
equipment in order to be used in the learning process.
Textbooks adopted in accordance with the provisions of this Part shall be used by the public
schools of the State except as provided in G.S. 115C-98(b1).
…
"§ 115C-96. Powers and duties of the State Board of Education in regard to
textbooks.instructional materials.
(a) The children of the public elementary and secondary schools of the State shall be
provided with free basic textbooks instructional materials within the appropriation of the General
Assembly for that purpose. To implement this directive, the State Board of Education shall
evaluate annually the amount of money necessary to provide textbooks instructional materials
based on the actual cost and availability of textbooks the instructional materials and shall request
sufficient appropriations from the General Assembly.
(b) The State Board of Education shall administer a fund and establish adopt rules and
regulations necessary to:
(1) Acquire by contract such basic textbooks as are or may be on the adopted list
of the State of North Carolina which the Board finds necessary to meet the
needs of the State public school system and to carry out the provisions of this
Part.
(2) Provide a system of distribution of these textbooks and distribute the books
that are provided without using any depository or warehouse facilities other
than those operated by the State Board of Education.
(3) Provide for the free use, with proper care and return, of elementary and
secondary basic textbooks. instructional materials. The title of said books the
instructional materials shall be vested in the State.
"§ 115C-98. Local boards of education to provide for local operation of the textbook
program, the selection and procurement of other instructional materials, and the
use of nonadopted textbooks.selection of supplementary and instructional
materials.
(a) Local boards of education shall adopt rules policies not inconsistent with the policies
rules of the State Board of Education concerning the local operation of the textbook
program.selection and procurement of instructional materials.
(b) Local boards of education shall adopt written policies concerning the procedures to
be followed in their local school administrative units for the selection and procurement of
supplementary textbooks, library books, periodicals, audiovisual materials, and other
supplementary and instructional materials needed for instructional purposes in the public schools
of their units.
Page 14 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Local boards of education shall have sole authority to select and procure supplementary and
instructional materials, including library books and media, whether or not the materials contain
commercial advertising, to determine if the materials are related to and within the limits of the
prescribed curriculum, and to determine when the materials may be presented to students during
the school day. Supplementary materials and contracts for supplementary materials are not
subject to approval by the State Board of Education.
Supplementary books and other instructional materials shall neither displace nor be used to
the exclusion of basic textbooks.instructional materials.
(b1) A local board of education may establish a community media advisory committee to
investigate and evaluate challenges from parents, teachers, and members of the public to
textbooks and supplementary instructional materials on the grounds that they are educationally
unsuitable, pervasively vulgar, or inappropriate to the age, maturity, or grade level of the
students. The State Board of Education shall review its rules and policies concerning these
challenges and shall establish guidelines to be followed by community media advisory
committees.
The local board, at all times, has sole authority and discretion to determine whether a
challenge has merit and whether challenged material should be retained or removed.
(b2) Local boards of education may:
(1) Select, procure, and use textbooks that have not been adopted by the State
Board of Education for use throughout the local school administrative unit for
selected grade levels and courses; and
(2) Approve school improvement plans developed under G.S. 115C-105.27 that
include provisions for using textbooks that have not been adopted by the State
Board of Education for selected grade levels and courses.
All textbook instructional material contracts made under this subsection shall include a clause
granting to the local board of education the license to produce braille, large print, and
audiocassette tape tape, and other accessible copies of the textbooks instructional materials for
use in the local school administrative unit.
…
"§ 115C-98.5. Challenges to supplementary and instructional materials.
(a) Local boards of education shall establish a community media advisory committee to
investigate and evaluate challenges to supplementary and instructional materials.
(b) At a minimum, the committee shall include the following:
(1) A principal from a high school, middle school, and elementary school,
respectively.
(2) A teacher from a high school, middle school, and elementary school,
respectively.
(3) A parent of a student in high school or middle school and a parent of a student
in elementary school.
(4) A school library media coordinator from a high school, middle school, and
elementary school, respectively.
(c) Challenges to instructional and supplemental materials shall be made in writing and
submitted to the local board of education. The challenge shall specify that the material being
challenged is one or more of the following:
(1) Obscene.
(2) Inappropriate to the age, maturity, or grade level of the students.
(3) Not aligned with the standard course of study.
(d) The local board of education and the media advisory committee shall only investigate
and evaluate challenges submitted by a parent of a student enrolled in a school governed by the
board, a teacher employed by the board, or a resident of the area of assignment for the board.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) Within two weeks of the filing of the challenge, the media advisory committee shall
hold a hearing and provide the challengers an opportunity to present their concerns to the
committee. The committee may, in the committee's discretion, request additional information on
the subject matter at the hearing from experts employed by the local school administrative unit.
Within two weeks of the hearing, the committee shall make a recommendation to the local board
of education on whether the challenge has merit and whether the challenged material should be
retained or removed as unfit material. The committee's determination shall be limited to
considerations of whether the material is unfit on the specific grounds of the material being (i)
obscene, (ii) inappropriate to the age, maturity, or grade level of the students, or (iii) not aligned
with the standard course of study.
(f) At the next meeting of the local board of education after the media advisory
committee's recommendation is received, the local board shall determine whether the challenge
has merit and whether the challenged material should be retained or removed as unfit material.
(g) The local board, at all times, has sole authority and discretion to determine whether a
challenge has merit and whether challenged material should be retained or removed. The decision
of the board is not appealable.
"§ 115C-99. Legal custodians of textbooks instructional materials furnished by State.
Local boards of education are the custodians of all textbooks instructional materials
purchased by the local boards with State funds. They shall provide adequate and safe storage
facilities for the proper care of these textbooks the instructional materials and emphasize to all
students the necessity for proper care of textbooks.instructional materials.
"§ 115C-100. Rental fees for textbooks instructional materials prohibited; damage fees
authorized.
No local board of education may charge any pupil a rental fee for the use of textbooks.
instructional materials. A pupil's parents or legal guardians may be charged damage fees for
abuse or loss of textbooks instructional materials under rules adopted by the State Board of
Education. All money collected from the sale of textbooks instructional materials purchased with
State funds under the provisions of this Part shall be paid annually as collected to the State Board
of Education.
"§ 115C-101. Duties and authority of superintendents of local school administrative units.
The superintendent of each local school administrative unit, as an official agent of the State
Board of Education, shall administer the provisions of this Part and the rules and regulations of
the Board insofar as they apply to his the local school administrative unit. The superintendent of
each local school administrative unit shall have authority to require the cooperation of principals
and teachers so that the children may receive the best possible service, and so that all the books
instructional materials and moneys may be accounted for properly. If any principal or teacher
fails to comply with the provisions of this section, his the superintendent shall withhold his the
salary vouchers of the principal until the duties imposed by this section have been performed.
If any superintendent fails to comply with the provisions of this section, the State
Superintendent, as secretary to the State Board of Education, shall notify the State Board of
Education and the State Treasurer. The State Board and the State Superintendent shall withhold
the superintendent's salary vouchers, and the State Treasurer shall make no payment until the
State Superintendent notifies him confirms that the provisions of this section have been complied
with.
"§ 115C-102. Right to purchase; disposal of textbooks and instructional materials.
(a) Any parent, guardian, or person in loco parentis may purchase any instructional
material needed for any child in the public schools of the State from the board of education of
the local school administrative unit in which the child is enrolled or, in the case of basic
textbooks, from the State Board of Education.enrolled.
(b) Notwithstanding Article 3A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, G.S. 143-49(4),
or any other provision of law, the State Board of Education may adopt rules authorizing local
Page 16 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
boards of education to dispose of discontinued instructional material, including State-adopted
textbooks.material."
SECTION 7.1.(c) G.S. 115C-11(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Voting. – No voting by proxy shall be permitted. Except in voting on textbook
adoptions, a A majority of those present and voting shall be necessary to carry a motion and a
roll call vote shall be had on each motion. A record of all such votes shall be kept in the minute
book."
SECTION 7.1.(d) G.S. 115C-11(e) is repealed.
SECTION 7.1.(e) G.S. 115C-12(9)b. is repealed.
SECTION 7.1.(f) G.S. 115C-12(18)d. reads as rewritten:
"d. The State Board of Education shall modify the Uniform Education
Reporting System to provide clear, accurate, and standard information
on the use of funds at the unit and school level. The plan shall provide
information that will enable the General Assembly to determine State,
local, and federal expenditures for personnel at the unit and school
level. The plan also shall allow the tracking of expenditures for
textbooks, instructional materials, educational supplies and
equipment, capital outlay, at-risk students, and other purposes."
SECTION 7.1.(g) G.S. 115C-47 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-47. Powers and duties generally.
In addition to the powers and duties designated in G.S. 115C-36, local boards of education
shall have the power or duty:
…
(6) To Regulate Fees, Charges and Solicitations. – Local boards of education shall
adopt rules and regulations governing solicitations of, sales to, and
fund-raising activities conducted by, the students and faculty members in
schools under their jurisdiction, and no fees, charges, or costs shall be
collected from students and school personnel without approval of the board of
education as recorded in the minutes of said the board; provided, this
subdivision shall not apply to such textbooks instructional material fees as are
determined and established by the State Board of Education. The local board
of education shall publish a schedule of fees, charges, and solicitations
approved by the local board on the local school administrative unit's Web site
by October 15 of each school year and, if the schedule is subsequently revised,
within 30 days following the revision.
…
(33) To Approve and Use Supplemental Materials. – Local boards of education
shall have sole authority to select and procure supplementary instructional
materials, whether or not the materials contain commercial advertising,
pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 115C-98(b).
(33a) To Approve and Use Textbooks Not Adopted by State Board of Education.
Instructional Materials. – Local boards of education shall have the authority
to select, procure, and use textbooks not adopted by the State Board of
Education instructional materials as provided in
G.S. 115C-98(b1).G.S. 115C-98.
…."
SECTION 7.1.(h) G.S. 115C-76.55 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-76.55. Age-appropriate instruction for grades kindergarten through fourth grade.
Instruction on gender identity, sexual activity, or sexuality shall not be included in the
curriculum provided in grades kindergarten through fourth grade, regardless of whether the
information is provided by school personnel or third parties. For the purposes of this section,
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
curriculum includes the standard course of study and support materials, locally developed
curriculum, supplemental instruction, and textbooks and other supplementary materials, but does
not include responses to student-initiated questions."
SECTION 7.1.(i) G.S. 115C-81.5(b)(3) is repealed.
SECTION 7.1.(j) G.S. 115C-81.25(b)(3) is repealed.
SECTION 7.1.(k) G.S. 115C-81.25(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Parental Review. – The State Board of Education shall make available to all local
school administrative units for review by the parents and legal guardians of students enrolled at
those units any State-developed objectives for instruction, any approved textbooks, the list of
reviewed materials, and any other State-developed or approved materials that pertain to or are
intended to impart information or promote discussion or understanding in regard to the
prevention of sexually transmitted diseases, including HIV/AIDS, to the avoidance of
out-of-wedlock pregnancy, or to the reproductive health and safety education curriculum. The
review period shall extend for at least 60 days before use."
SECTION 7.1.(l) G.S. 115C-105.25(b)(12) reads as rewritten:
"(12) Funds allotted for textbooks and digital resources instructional materials may
only be used for the purchase of textbooks and digital resources. to acquire
instructional and supplemental materials as identified in Part 3 of Article 8 of
this Chapter and to acquire software necessary for the use of the instructional
or supplemental materials. These funds shall not be transferred out of the
allotment for any other purpose."
SECTION 7.1.(m) G.S. 115C-242(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) The board of education of any local school administrative unit may operate
the school buses of such unit one day prior to the opening of the regular school
term for the transportation of pupils and employees to and from the school to
which such pupils are assigned or in which they are enrolled and such
employees are employed, for the purposes of the registration of students, the
organization of classes, the distribution of textbooks, instructional materials,
and such other purposes as will, in the opinion of the superintendent of the
schools of such unit, promote the efficient organization and operation of such
public schools."
SECTION 7.1.(n) G.S. 115C-271(d)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) Local funds appropriated for teachers, textbooks, instructional materials, or
classroom materials, supplies, and equipment are not transferred or used for
this purpose."
SECTION 7.1.(o) G.S. 115C-384(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Rental Fees for Textbooks Instructional Materials Prohibited; Damage Fees
Authorized. – No rental fees are permitted for the use of textbooks, but damage fees may be
collected pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 115C-100."
SECTION 7.1.(p) G.S. 115C-390.2(l)(1) reads as rewritten:
"(1) The opportunity to take textbooks instructional materials and school-furnished
digital devices home for the duration of the absence."
SECTION 7.1.(q) G.S. 115C-390.5(c)(1) reads as rewritten:
"(1) The opportunity to take textbooks instructional materials home for the
duration of the suspension."
SECTION 7.1.(r) G.S. 115C-398 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-398. Damage to school buildings, furnishings, textbooks.instructional materials.
Students and their parents or legal guardians may be liable for damage to school buildings,
furnishings and textbooks instructional materials pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 115C-523,
115C-100 and 14-132."
SECTION 7.1.(s) G.S. 143A-48 is repealed.
Page 18 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7.1.(t) No further funds shall be allocated into the State Textbook fund.
The Department of Public Instruction, in coordination with the Office of State Budget and
Management, shall ensure that the fund is dissolved once all funds are expended.
SECTION 7.1.(u) Effective July 1, 2026, there is established the Instructional
Materials funding allotment within the State Public School Fund. The State Board of Education
shall establish the purposes for which the funds within the Instructional Materials funding
allotment may be used for the purchase and maintenance of instructional and supplemental
materials as identified in Part 3 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes. Funds
allocated to the Instructional Materials funding allotment in fiscal years 2026-2027 and
2027-2028 shall not revert to the General Fund at the end of the fiscal year but shall remain
available until expended.

EXCEPTIONAL CHILDREN FUNDING
SECTION 7.2.(a) G.S. 115C-111.05 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-111.05. Funding for children with disabilities.
To the extent funds are made available for this purpose, the State Board shall allocate funds
for children with disabilities to each local school administrative unit on a per child basis. Each
local school administrative unit shall receive funds for the lesser of (i) all children who are
identified as children with disabilities or (ii) thirteen percent (13%) of its allocated average daily
membership in the local school administrative unit for the current school year.The State Board
of Education shall adopt an allotment policy to implement the tiered student funding formula for
exceptional children as proposed in the report published pursuant to Section 7.7 of S.L. 2023-
134 by the Department of Public Instruction. To the extent funds are made available for this
purpose, the Exceptional Children Allotment shall be funded at a seventy percent (70%) state
share and shall replace the Children With Disabilities Allotment. The State Board shall adjust the
amount of funding for children with disabilities each public school unit receives during the fiscal
year based on the December 1 headcount of children with disabilities required by 20 U.S.C.
1412(a)(3)."
SECTION 7.2.(b) Create the Exceptional Children Funding Stabilization Reserve.
– The Exceptional Children Funding Stabilization Reserve is established within the General
Fund. The General Assembly shall appropriate in the Current Appropriations Act or other
appropriations act a specific amount to this reserve for allocation, on an as-needed basis only, to
provide stabilization funds to public school units that experience a decline in total state funding
for exceptional children in the FY 2026-27 fiscal year.
SECTION 7.2A.(c) Reserve Authorized Uses. – The funds in the Reserve are
available to the Department of Public Instruction to distribute to public school units that would
otherwise receive less funding under the Exceptional Children allotment in the FY 2026-27 fiscal
year than they received through the Children With Disabilities allotment in FY 2025-26.
SECTION 7.2A.(d) Reserve Nonrevert. – The funds in the Reserve shall not revert
at the end of FY 2026-27 but shall remain available for use until June 30, 2029 to implement this
section.
SECTION 7.2.(e) Compliance. – Implementation of the exceptional children
weighted funding model and access to funds by public school units through this model shall be
contingent upon the provision of a free and appropriate education (FAPE) in the least restrictive
environment. The Department of Public Instruction shall routinely monitor public school units
commensurate with the authority established by 34 CFR Part 300 and G.S. 115C-451. In
exercising its monitoring responsibilities under 34 CFR 300.600(d), the Department of Public
Instruction must ensure that when it identifies noncompliance with the requirements of this part
by PSUs, the noncompliance is corrected as soon as possible, and in no case later than one year
after the State's identification of the noncompliance 34 CFR 300.600(e).
SECTION 7.2.(f) G.S. 115C-218.105(a) reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 19

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(a) The State Board of Education shall allocate to each charter school:
(1) An amount equal to the average per pupil allocation for average daily
membership from the local school administrative unit allotments in which the
charter school is located for each child attending the charter school except for
the allocation for children with disabilities and for the allocation for children
with limited English proficiency;
(2) An additional amount for each child attending the charter school who is a child
with disabilities; and
(3) An additional amount for children with limited English proficiency attending
the charter school, based on a formula adopted by the State Board.
In accordance with G.S. 115C-218.7 and G.S. 115C-218.8, the State Board
shall allow for annual adjustments to the amount allocated to a charter school
based on its enrollment growth in school years subsequent to the initial year
of operation.
In the event a child with disabilities leaves the charter school and enrolls in
a public school during the first 60 school days in the school year, the charter
school shall return a pro rata amount of funds allocated for that child to the
State Board, and the State Board shall reallocate those funds to the local
school administrative unit in which the public school is located. In the event
a child with disabilities enrolls in a charter school during the first 60 school
days in the school year, the State Board shall allocate to the charter school the
pro rata amount of additional funds for children with disabilities. The State
Board shall adjust the amount of funding for children with disabilities each
charter school receives during the fiscal year based on the December 1
headcount of children with disabilities required by 20 U.S.C. 1412(a)(3)."
SECTION 7.2.(g) G.S. 116-239.11(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The State Board of Education shall allocate to a laboratory school the following:
(1) An amount equal to the average per pupil allocation for average daily
membership from the local school administrative unit allotments in which the
school is located for each child attending the laboratory school, except for the
allocation for children with disabilities and for the allocation for children with
limited English proficiency.
(2) An additional amount for each child attending the laboratory school who is a
child with disabilities. In the event a child with disabilities leaves the
laboratory school and enrolls in a public school during the first 60 school days
in the school year, the laboratory school shall return a pro rata amount of funds
allocated for that child to the State Board, and the State Board shall reallocate
those funds to the local school administrative unit in which the public school
is located. In the event a child with disabilities enrolls in the laboratory school
during the first 60 school days in the school year, the State Board shall allocate
to the laboratory school the pro rata amount of additional funds for children
with disabilities. The State Board shall adjust the amount of funding for
children with disabilities each laboratory school receives during the fiscal year
based on the December 1 headcount of children with disabilities required by
20 U.S.C. 1412(a)(3).
…."

LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY FUNDING METHODOLOGY CHANGE
SECTION 7.3.(a) The title of Article 32F of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes
reads as rewritten:
"Supplemental School Funding.Funding and Other Allotments."
Page 20 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7.3.(b) Article 32F of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-472.30. Limited English proficient allotment.
To the extent funds are made available for this purpose, the State Board of Education shall
allocate funds to local school administrative units, charter schools, regional schools, and
laboratory schools operated under Article 29A of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes to provide
services to students with limited English proficiency. The State Board shall allocate these funds
under a formula that takes into account the average number of students in the units, charters,
regional schools, or laboratory schools over the past three years who have limited English
proficiency. Local school administrative units shall use funds allocated to them to pay for
classroom teachers, teacher assistants, tutors, textbooks, classroom materials/instructional
supplies/equipment, transportation costs, and professional development of teachers for students
with limited English proficiency. A county in which a local school administrative unit receives
funds under this section shall use the funds to supplement local current expense funds and shall
not supplant local current expense funds."
SECTION 7.3.(c) When making adjustments to allocations to local school
administrative units from the limited English proficient allotment for the 2026-2027 fiscal year,
no local school administrative unit with an average daily membership of 20,000 or fewer students
for the 2026-2027 school year shall receive a negative adjustment in excess of fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) when compared to the allocation received during the 2025-2026 fiscal year
from that allotment.

SCHOOL RESOURCE OFFICER ALLOTMENT
SECTION 7.4.(a) Purpose. – The State Board of Education shall create the School
Resource Officer Allotment to provide for the safety of students on school grounds. Middle
schools across the state may use allotted funds to hire and train School Resource Officers (SROs).
SECTION 7.4.(b) Allotment. – Of the funds appropriated through this act to the
Department of Public Instruction, the State Board shall allocate funding to each local school
administrative unit for hiring school resource officers. Each local school administrative unit shall
receive allotted dollars for each non-virtual school serving students in middle school.
SECTION 7.4.(c) Consolidation. – Effective July 1, 2026, G.S. 143B-1209.60 is
repealed and all funds for middle school SROs shall be administered through the School Resource
Officer Allotment by the Department of Public Instruction. At the discretion of the State Board
of Education, the funds provided for high school SROs through the At-Risk Student Allotment
may also be consolidated into this allotment.
SECTION 7.4.(d) Training. – The Center for Safer Schools and the Department of
Public Instruction shall work with the NC Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards
Commission to establish initial training and continuing education standards for SROs. Those
standards shall include pre-service training and modules on the social and cognitive development
of elementary school and middle school children, behavioral health, and trauma-informed
practices in schools. All SROs must receive training through a community college, a local law
enforcement agency, or the North Carolina Justice Academy prior to placement in a school.

EXPAND LITERACY PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT AND SUPPORT TO
GRADES 6-8
SECTION 7.5.(a) G.S. 115C-83.6A reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.6A. Approval of literacy intervention plans.
(a) Each local school administrative unit shall submit to the Department of Public
Instruction a plan for the literacy interventions interventions for kindergarten through eighth
grade it will offer, including reading camps, in the following school year no later than October
1. The plan shall include information about the local school administrative unit's efforts to staff
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 21

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
reading camps with the most qualified teachers possible, including the unit's efforts to attract
teachers associated with high growth in reading based on EVAAS data and teachers who have
earned a reading bonus. The plan shall incorporate any feedback received from the Department
on the previous year's plan. As part of their plans, local school administrative units are
encouraged to partner with other local school administrative units and with community
organizations to enhance literacy interventions.
…."
SECTION 7.5.(b) G.S. 115C-83.4B reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.4B. Early Literacy Program.
(a) There is established the Early Literacy Program within the Department of Public
Instruction. The Department of Public Instruction, in consultation with the Department of Health
and Human Services, shall use the Early Literacy Program to build strong foundational early
literacy skills utilizing the Science of Reading for children in the North Carolina Prekindergarten
(NC Pre-K) program.
(b) As part of the Early Literacy Program, the Department of Public Instruction shall
focus on at least the following components:
(1) Provide a training program to educatorseducators, principals, and
administrators working with children in the NC Pre-K program to ensure
developmentally appropriate instruction grounded in the Science of Reading
and outcomes promoting reading achievement in students. Any principal who
supervises educators who undergo this training shall also complete the
training themselves. The Department of Public Instruction shall utilize a third-
party independent teacher training program to deliver professional
development that demonstrates evidence-based success with educators
educators, principals, and administrators in establishing deep knowledge of
literacy instruction.
…."
SECTION 7.5.(c) Allotment. – To the extent funds are made available for this
purpose, the Department of Public Instruction shall use funds appropriated in this act to contract
with Lexia Learning to provide Lexia Aspire® Professional Learning to all English-Language
Arts, Math, Science and Social Studies teachers in sixth, seventh, and eighth grades.

EXPAND USE OF DIAGNOSTIC READING ASSESSMENTS TO GRADES 4-5
SECTION 7.6.(a) G.S. 115C-83.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.3. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) "Accelerated reading class" means a class where focused literacy
interventions are provided to increase a student's reading level at least two
grades in one school year.
(2) "Alternative assessment" means a valid and reliable standardized assessment
of reading comprehension, approved by the State Board of Education, that is
not the same test as the State-approved standardized test of reading
comprehension administered to third grade students. The State Board of
Education shall provide the valid and reliable alternative assessment to local
school administrative units public school units upon request and establish
achievement level ranges for the approved alternative assessment. The State
Board of Education shall annually review the alternative assessment to ensure
ongoing relevance, validity, and reliability.
…."
SECTION 7.6.(b) G.S. 115C-83.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.6. Facilitating early grade reading proficiency.
Page 22 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Kindergarten, first, second, and third through fifth grade students shall be assessed
with valid, reliable, formative, and diagnostic reading assessments made available to local school
administrative units public school units by the State Board of Education pursuant to G.S. 115C-
174.11(a). Difficulty with reading development identified through administration of formative
and diagnostic assessments shall be addressed with literacy interventions outlined in the student's
Individual Reading Plan. Parents or guardians of first and second grade students offered a reading
camp as a literacy intervention shall be encouraged to enroll their student in the reading camp
provided by the local school administrative unit. Parents or guardians of a student identified as
demonstrating reading comprehension below grade level shall make the final decision regarding
a student's reading camp attendance.
…
(a2) The Department of Public Instruction shall provide for EVAAS analysis all formative
and diagnostic assessment data collected pursuant to this section for kindergarten through third
fifth grade. The Department shall use a uniform template for all data collected, and the template
shall be used each time data is provided. The template shall include clear designations for each
data component reported.
…."
SECTION 7.6.(c) G.S. 115C-83.6B reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.6B. Individual Reading Plans.
(a) An Individual Reading Plan (IRP) shall be developed for any student in kindergarten
through third fifth grade demonstrating difficulty with reading development based on the results
of either (i) the first diagnostic or formative assessment of the school year or (ii) the first
diagnostic or formative assessment of the second semester of the school year. The IRP shall be
continually adjusted based on multiple data sources as prescribed by the Department of Public
Instruction, indicating that the student is not progressing toward grade-level standards in one or
more major reading areas. Based on the most recently collected data, the IRP shall include the
following information, specific to the identified student:
(1) The specific reading skill deficiencies identified by assessment data.
(2) Goals and benchmarks for growth.
(3) The means by which progress will be monitored and evaluated.
(4) The specific additional literacy interventions the student will receive.
(5) The Science of Reading-based instructional programming the teacher will
implement.
(6) Any additional services the teacher deems appropriate to accelerate the
student's reading skill and development.
…."

SCHOOL PERFORMANCE GRADE REDESIGN
SECTION 7.7.(a) Program Established; Purpose. – There is established the School
Performance Grade Redesign Pilot Program (Program) for the 2026-2027 and 2027-2028 fiscal
years. The Program shall be composed of a small group of school units and expanded to all K-12
schools receiving public funds in the 2028-29 school year. The purpose of the Program is to
improve the school performance grade process to provide more transparent and comprehensive
information about school performance to parents, students, and administrators. School
performance grades will continue to be issued pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.15 during the pilot
program.
SECTION 7.7.(b) School Performance Grade Criteria. – The Department of Public
Instruction shall develop and publish criteria to be used for school performance grades in the
Program.
SECTION 7.7.(c) Application for Program. – Public school units interested in
participating in the Program shall notify the Department, and the Department shall establish a
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 23

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
process for selecting schools to participate. The Department shall select one charter school, one
local school administrative unit, and one private school that receives state funds to participate in
the Program from each State Board of Education region, balancing characteristics of the school
units to represent the diversity of the State.
SECTION 7.7.(d) Interim Reporting. – Each school unit participating in the Program
shall report to the Department on the criteria developed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
by the deadline established by the Department.
SECTION 7.7.(e) Department Reporting. – The Department shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee and the Office of State Budget and Management by November
1, 2027, on the status and progress of the Program. A copy of the report shall be distributed to all
local superintendents and principals in public school units participating in the Program. The
report shall include at least the following:
(1) Any difficulties in collecting data or information required by the Program.
(2) Any recommended changes to the Program.
(3) Any other information the Department deems relevant to the performance of
the Program.
(4) Any other information requested by the committee.
SECTION 7.7.(f) Statewide Expansion of the Program. – Beginning with the
2028-29 school year, the Program shall be expanded to all K-12 schools in the State that receive
public funds. All participating schools shall provide the information required by the Program.
SECTION 7.7.(g) Final Reporting. – Each participating school unit, as part of the
Program, shall report to the Department on the criteria developed pursuant to subsection (a) of
Section 2 of this act by the deadline established by the Department.
SECTION 7.7.(h) Final Department Reporting. – The Department shall submit a
final report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee by June 30, 2029, on the outcomes of
the Program. A copy of the report shall be distributed to local superintendents and principals in
all participating schools. The report shall include at least the following:
(1) Any continued difficulties in collecting data or information required by the
Program.
(2) Any recommended changes to the criteria developed by the Program.
(3) Any other information the Department deems relevant to the performance of
the Program.
(4) The model and scale that the Department would use to assign school
performance grades from the criteria developed for the Program.
(5) Any recommended legislation for implementing the Program permanently to
replace the existing school performance grade system.
(6) Any other information requested by the committee.
SECTION 7.7.(i) Intention of General Assembly. – It is the intention of the General
Assembly that after any statutory changes made pursuant to subsection (h) of this section, school
performance measures be issued that are based on the results of the pilot, that more heavily
weight growth than the current score, and that comply with federal requirements, including those
in the Every Student Succeeds Act.

FUND VIRTUAL CHARTER SCHOOLS AT STATEWIDE AVERAGE PER-PUPIL
FUNDING
SECTION 7.8. G.S. 115C-218.105 reads as rewritten:
"(a) The State Board of Education shall allocate to each charter school:
(1) An amount equal to to:
a. Except for charter schools approved to operate pursuant to G.S. 115C-
218-120(b)(1), the average per pupil allocation for average daily
membership from the local school administrative unit allotments in
Page 24 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
which the charter school is located for each child attending the charter
school except for the allocation for children with disabilities and for
the allocation for children with limited English
proficiency.proficiency;
b. For charter schools approved to operate pursuant to G.S. 115C-218-
120(b)(1), the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership for each child attending the charter school except for the
allocation for children with disabilities and for the allocation for
children with limited English proficiency.
…."

ELIMINATE TRANSPORTATION FUNDING FOR VIRTUAL CHARTER SCHOOL
SECTION 7.9. G.S. 115C-218.105 reads as rewritten:
"…
(a1) The State Board shall not withhold or reduce distribution of funds to a charter school
for any reason except as provided in subsection (a2) of this section.
(a2) The State Board shall withhold or reduce distribution of funds to a charter school if
any of the following applies:
(1) The change in funding is due to an annual adjustment based on enrollment or
is a general adjustment to allocations that is not specific to the charter or
actions of that charter school.
(2) The Review Board notifies the State Board that the charter school has
materially violated a term of its charter, has violated a State statute or federal
law, or has had its charter terminated or nonrenewed.
(3) The Review Board notifies the State Board that the charter school has failed
to meet generally accepted standards of fiscal management or has violated a
State or federal requirement for receipt of funds.
(a3) The State Board shall not provide transportation funds to virtual charter schools or
remote charter academies for students who attend exclusively online.
…."

INCREASE SUPPORT FOR PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS
SECTION 7.10. G.S. 115C-546.2 reads as rewritten:
"…
(e) The State Board of Education may use up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) two
million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) each year of monies in the Fund to support
positions in the Department of Public Instruction's Support Services Division.
…."

INCREASE PARTICIPATION IN COMMUNITY ELIGIBILITY PROVISION MEAL
PROGRAM
SECTION 7.11.(a) Part 2 of Article 17 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-264.6. CEP Meal Incentive Program.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply to this section:
(1) CEP. – Community Eligibility Provision.
(2) Department. – Department of Public Instruction.
(3) Eligible unit. – A local school administrative unit, school within a local school
administrative unit, regional school, or charter school that meets all of the
following:
a. Qualifies for the federal CEP program.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 25

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Did not participate in the federal CEP program in the 2025-2026 fiscal
year.
(4) ISP. – Identified Student Percentage.
(5) Participating school. – A school participating in the Program.
(6) Participating unit. – An eligible unit selected to participate in the Program.
(7) Program. – The CEP Meal Incentive Program established pursuant to this
section.
(b) Program; Purpose. – The Department shall establish the Program to expand public
school participation in the federal CEP program to increase the number of students with access
to healthy, cost-free school breakfast and lunch. In each year where funds are made available for
this purpose, the Program shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of this section.
(c) Application. – By April 15 of each year of the Program, the Department shall develop
the application for the Program and make it available to eligible units. To be considered for
selection for the Program, eligible units shall submit their applications by June 1 of each year. At
a minimum, the application shall include the following information:
(1) The school or schools that will participate in the CEP program.
(2) The ISP for the school or schools for the current school year.
(3) The number of students enrolled in the school or schools for the current school
year.
(4) Participation rates in the National School Breakfast and Lunch programs for
the current school year for the schools requesting to receive the incentive.
(d) Selection. – By July 15 of each year of the Program, the Department shall determine
whether each applicant is eligible to participate. The Department shall then award grants to all
eligible units that apply. If there are insufficient funds to award grants to all eligible units that
apply, the Department shall first prioritize awarding grants to eligible units with an ISP of greater
than or equal to fifty-five percent (55%) and then prioritize awarding grants to those schools that
will draw the greatest federal match.
(e) Grants. – The Department shall issue State reimbursements to participating units to
supplement federal reimbursements of school meals. State reimbursements shall equal the
difference between the federal free rate and the federal paid rate for the number of meals served
at the participating schools equal to a 0.2 multiplier of the ISP for the participating schools. State
and federal reimbursements shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the federal free rate
of meals served. Participating schools shall have an innovative breakfast option available where
students have access to breakfast and are allowed to consume breakfast in the classroom.
(f) Nonsupplant Requirement. – A participating unit shall use the funds to supplement
and not supplant local current expense funds.
(g) Report. – No later than January 1 of each year of the Program, the Department shall
report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division
at least the following information:
(1) The number of participating schools.
(2) The number of students who received free meals who would not have
otherwise received free meals had the participating school not utilized the
incentive.
(3) The amount of federal and State money participating units received.
(4) Any increase in student success due to the participating school's utilization of
the incentive and participation in the Program.
(h) Administration. – The Department may use up to five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) of the funds appropriated for the Program for administrative costs."
SECTION 7.11.(b) Section 7.59 of S.L. 2023-134 is repealed.
SECTION 7.11.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

Page 26 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART VII-A. COMPENSATION OF PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES

TEACHER SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 7A.1.(a) The following monthly teacher salary schedule shall apply for
the 2025-26 fiscal year to licensed personnel of the public schools who are classified as teachers.
The salary schedule is based on years of teaching experience.
2025-2026 Teacher Monthly Salary Schedule
Years of Experience "A" Teachers
0 4,630
1 4,690
2 4,750
3 4,810
4 4,870
5 4,930
6 4,990
7 5,050
8 5,110
9 5,170
10 5,230
11 5,290
12 5,350
13 5,410
14 5,470
15 5,520
16 5,520
17 5,520
18 5,580
19 5,580
20 5,580
21 5,640
22 5,640
23 5,640
24 5,730
25+ 5,730
SECTION 7A.1.(b) The following monthly teacher salary schedule shall apply for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to licensed personnel of the public schools who are classified as
teachers. The salary schedule is based on years of teaching experience.
2026-2027 Teacher Monthly Salary Schedule
Years of Experience "A" Teachers
0 5,312
1 5,332
2 5,355
3 5,378
4 5,401
5 5,424
6 5,447
7 5,470
8 5,493
9 5,516
10 5,539
11 5,562
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 27

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
12 5,585
13 5,608
14 5,631
15 5,654
16 5,677
17 5,700
18 5,723
19 5,746
20 5,769
21 5,792
22 5,815
23 5,838
24 5,861
25+ 5,875
SECTION 7A.1.(c) Salary Supplements for Teachers Paid on This Salary Schedule.
(1) Licensed teachers who have NBPTS certification shall receive a salary
supplement each month of twelve percent (12%) of their monthly salary on
the "A" salary schedule.
(2) Licensed teachers who are classified as "M" teachers shall receive a salary
supplement each month of ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the
"A" salary schedule.
(3) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
six-year degree level shall receive a salary supplement of one hundred
twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month in addition to the supplement
provided to them as "M" teachers.
(4) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
doctoral degree level shall receive a salary supplement of two hundred
fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(5) Certified school nurses shall receive a salary supplement each month of ten
percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the "A" salary schedule.
(6) School counselors who are licensed as counselors at the master's degree level
or higher shall receive a salary supplement each month of one hundred dollars
($100.00).
SECTION 7A.1.(d) For school psychologists, school speech pathologists who are
licensed as speech pathologists at the master's degree level or higher, and school audiologists
who are licensed as audiologists at the master's degree level or higher, the following shall apply:
(1) The first step of the salary schedule shall be equivalent to the sixth step of the
"A" salary schedule.
(2) These employees shall receive the following salary supplements each month:
a. Ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary, excluding the supplement
provided pursuant to sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.
b. Three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00).
(3) These employees are eligible to receive salary supplements equivalent to those
of teachers for academic preparation at the six-year degree level or the
doctoral degree level.
(4) The twenty-sixth step of the salary schedule shall be seven and one-half
percent (7.5%) higher than the salary received by these same employees on
the twenty-fifth step of the salary schedule.
Page 28 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7A.1.(e) Beginning with the 2014-2015 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to teachers paid on the teacher salary schedule, the amounts of those
longevity payments are included in the monthly amounts under the teacher salary schedule.
SECTION 7A.1.(f) A teacher compensated in accordance with this salary schedule
for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the
following:
(1) The applicable amount on the salary schedule for the applicable school year.
(2) For teachers who were eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school year,
the sum of the following:
a. The salary the teacher received in the 2013-2014 school year pursuant
to Section 35.11 of S.L. 2013-360.
b. The longevity that the teacher would have received under the longevity
system in effect for the 2013-2014 school year provided in Section
35.11 of S.L. 2013-360 based on the teacher's current years of service.
c. The annual bonus provided in Section 9.1(e) of S.L. 2014-100.
(3) For teachers who were not eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school
year, the sum of the salary and annual bonus the teacher received in the
2014-2015 school year pursuant to Section 9.1 of S.L. 2014-100.
SECTION 7A.1.(g) As used in this section, the term "teacher" shall also include
instructional support personnel.

RESTORE MASTER'S PAY
SECTION 7A.2.(a) The following session laws are repealed:
(1) Section 8.22 of S.L. 2013-360.
(2) Section 8.3 of S.L. 2014-100.
SECTION 7A.2.(b) G.S. 115C-302.10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-302.10. Qualifications for certain education-based salary supplements.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only the following teachers and
instructional support personnel shall be paid on the "M" salary schedule or receive a salary
supplement for academic preparation at the six-year degree level or at the doctoral degree level:
(1) Certified school nurses and instructional support personnel in positions for
which a master's degree is required for licensure.
(2) Teachers and instructional support personnel who were paid on the "M" salary
schedule or received that salary supplement prior to the 2014-15 school year.
(3) Teachers and instructional support personnel who (i) complete a degree at the
master's, six-year, or doctoral degree level for which they completed at least
one course prior to August 1, 2013, and (ii) would have qualified for the salary
supplement pursuant to State Board of Education policy, TCPA006, as it was
in effect on June 30, 2013.
(4) Teachers who do not qualify under subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this section
but who spend at least seventy percent (70%) of their time as follows:
a. For teachers, in classroom instruction related to their graduate
academic preparation in their field or subject area within their area of
licensure. Most of the teachers' remaining time shall be spent in one or
more of the following:
1. Mentoring teachers.
2. Performing demonstration lessons for teachers.
3. Writing curricula.
4. Developing and leading staff development programs for
teachers.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 29

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. For instructional support personnel, performing work within the
employee's area of graduate academic preparation.
(b) Beginning with the 2025-2026 fiscal year and in subsequent fiscal years, for teachers
who are paid on the "M" salary schedule under subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this act,
determination of whether teachers shall be paid on the "M" salary schedule or receive a salary
supplement for academic preparation shall take place on an annual basis. Teachers may be moved
off the "M" salary schedule or discontinue receiving salary supplements if they are not meeting
the requirements of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this act in that year.
(c) Unless an individual otherwise qualifies under subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection (a)
of this section, teachers and instructional support personnel who earn an advanced degree in
school administration shall not be paid on the "M" salary schedule or receive a salary supplement
for academic preparation."

CONSOLIDATED TEACHER BONUS PROGRAM
SECTION 7A.3.(a) Establish Consolidated Bonus Program. – The State Board of
Education shall establish a consolidated teacher bonus program for the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to reward teacher performance and encourage student learning and improvement. To
attain this goal, the Department of Public Instruction shall administer bonus pay to qualifying
teachers whose salaries are supported from State funds in January of 2026 and 2027, based on
data from the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 school years, respectively, in accordance with this
section.
SECTION 7A.3.(b) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following
definitions shall apply:
(1) Eligible advanced course teacher. – A teacher of Advanced Placement
courses, International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme courses, or the
Cambridge Advanced International Certificate of Education (AICE) program
who meets the following criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, one or more
of the following:
1. A qualifying public school unit.
2. The North Carolina Virtual Public School program.
b. Taught one or more students who received a score listed in subsection
(c) of this section.
(2) Eligible career and technical education (CTE) teacher. – A teacher who meets
the following criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a qualifying
public school unit.
b. Taught one or more students who attained approved industry
certifications or credentials consistent with G.S. 115C-156.2.
(3) Eligible growth teacher. – A teacher who meets at least one of the following
criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a qualifying
public school unit and meets one of the following criteria:
1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for third
grade reading from the previous school year.
2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth
or fifth grade reading from the previous school year.
3. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth,
Page 30 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the
previous school year.
b. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a local school
administrative unit and meets one of the following criteria:
1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for third grade
reading from the previous school year.
2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth or fifth
grade reading from the previous school year.
3. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth, fifth,
sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the previous
school year.
c. Was employed by a local school administrative unit that employed in
the previous school year three or fewer total teachers in that teacher's
grade level as long as the teacher has an EVAAS student growth index
score from the previous school year of exceeded expected growth in
one of the following subject areas:
1. Third grade reading.
2. Fourth or fifth grade reading.
3. Fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics.
(4) EVAAS. – The Education Value-Added Assessment System.
(5) Qualifying public school unit. – Any of the following:
a. A local school administrative unit.
b. A charter school.
c. A regional school.
d. A school providing elementary or secondary instruction operated by
The University of North Carolina under Article 29A of Chapter 116 of
the General Statutes.
(6) Qualifying teacher. – An eligible teacher who meets one of the following
criteria:
a. Remains employed teaching in the same qualifying public school unit,
or, if an eligible advanced course teacher is only employed by the
North Carolina Virtual Public School program, remains employed
teaching in that program, at least from the school year the data is
collected until January 1 of the corresponding school year that the
bonus is paid.
b. Retired, between the last day of the school year in which the data is
collected and January 1 of the corresponding school year in which the
bonus is paid, after attaining one of the following:
1. The age of at least 65 with five years of creditable service.
2. The age of at least 60 with 25 years of creditable service.
3. Thirty years of creditable service.
SECTION 7A.3.(c) Advanced Course Bonuses. – A bonus in the amount of fifty
dollars ($50.00) shall be provided to qualifying advanced course teachers for each student taught
in each advanced course who receives the following score:
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 31

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) For Advanced Placement courses, a score of three or higher on the College
Board Advanced Placement Examination.
(2) For International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme courses, a score of four
or higher on the International Baccalaureate course examination.
(3) For the Cambridge AICE program, a score of "E" or higher on the Cambridge
AICE program examinations.
SECTION 7A.3.(d) CTE Bonuses. – For qualifying career and technical education
teachers, bonuses shall be provided in the following amounts:
(1) A bonus in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each student taught
by a teacher who provided instruction in a course that led to the attainment of
an industry certification or credential with a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) value
ranking as determined under subsection (e) of this section.
(2) A bonus in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each student taught by a
teacher who provided instruction in a course that led to the attainment of an
industry certification or credential with a fifty dollar ($50.00) value ranking
as determined under subsection (e) of this section.
SECTION 7A.3.(e) CTE Course Value Ranking. – The Department of Commerce,
in consultation with the State Board, shall assign a value ranking for each industry certification
and credential based on academic rigor and employment value in accordance with this subsection.
Fifty percent (50%) of the ranking shall be based on academic rigor and the remaining fifty
percent (50%) on employment value. Academic rigor and employment value shall be based on
the following elements:
(1) Academic rigor shall be based on the number of instructional hours, including
work experience or internship hours, required to earn the industry certification
or credential, with extra weight given for coursework that also provides
community college credit.
(2) Employment value shall be based on the entry wage, growth rate in
employment for each occupational category, and average annual openings for
the primary occupation linked with the industry certification or credential.
SECTION 7A.3.(f) Statewide Growth Bonuses. – Of the funds appropriated in this
act for the program, bonuses shall be provided to qualifying teachers who are eligible teachers
under sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section, as follows:
(1) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to
eligible teachers under sub-sub-subdivision a.1. of subdivision (3) of
subsection (b) of this section. These funds shall be distributed equally among
qualifying teachers.
(2) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
a.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
(3) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
a.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 7A.3.(g) Local Growth Bonuses. – Of the funds appropriated in this act
for the program, bonuses shall be provided to eligible teachers under sub-subdivisions b. and c.
of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section, as follows:
(1) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to
eligible EVAAS teachers under sub-sub-subdivisions b.1. and c.1. of
subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section. These funds shall be divided
proportionally based on average daily membership in third grade for each
local school administrative unit and then distributed equally among qualifying
third grade reading teachers in each local school administrative unit.
Page 32 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
b.2. or c.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
(3) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
b.3. or c.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 7A.3.(h) Limitations and Other Criteria. – The following additional
limitations and other criteria shall apply to the program:
(1) Bonus funds awarded to a teacher pursuant to subsection (c), subsection (d),
subdivision (1) of subsection (f), and subdivision (1) of subsection (g) of this
section shall not exceed three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per
subsection or subdivision in any given school year.
(2) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.1.,
b.1., or c.1. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (1) of subsection (f) and subdivision (1) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than seven thousand
dollars ($7,000) pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (f) and subdivision
(1) of subsection (g) of this section in any given school year.
(3) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.2.,
b.2., or c.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (2) of subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than two bonuses
pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of subsection
(g) of this section in any given school year.
(4) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.3.,
b.3., or c.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than two bonuses
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of subsection
(g) of this section in any given school year.
SECTION 7A.3.(i) Bonuses Not Compensation. – Bonuses awarded to a teacher
pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any regular wage or other bonus the teacher receives
or is scheduled to receive. Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the bonuses awarded under this
section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, Retirement
System for Teachers and State Employees.
SECTION 7A.3.(j) Study and Report. – The State Board of Education shall study
the effect of the program on teacher performance and retention. The State Board shall report the
results of its findings and the amount of bonuses awarded to the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee, the Office of State Budget and Management, and the Fiscal Research Division by
March 15 of each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The report shall include, at a minimum,
the following information:
(1) Number of students enrolled and taking examinations in each of the following
categories of courses:
a. Advanced Placement.
b. International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme.
c. Cambridge AICE program.
d. Courses needed for the attainment of an industry certification or
credential.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 33

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Number of students receiving outcomes on examinations resulting in the
award of a bonus for a teacher in each category of courses identified in
sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) Number of teachers receiving a bonus in each category of courses identified
in sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(4) The amounts awarded to teachers for each category of courses identified in
sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(5) The type of industry certifications and credentials earned by the students, the
value ranking for each certification and credential, the number of bonuses
earned for each certification or credential, and the total bonus amount awarded
for each certification or credential.
(6) Average bonus amount awarded to each qualifying teacher who is an eligible
teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.1., b.1., or c.1. of subdivision (3) of
subsection (b) of this section.
(7) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
were eligible to receive a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course
in January 2026 or January 2027, or both, where applicable, pursuant to one
of the following programs:
a. The Advanced Course and CTE Bonus Program provided in Section
7A.4 of S.L. 2021-180.
b. The Growth-Based Teacher Bonus Program provided in Section 7A.2
of S.L. of 2022-74.
(8) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
received a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course in either
January 2026 or January 2027 pursuant to one of the programs listed in
subdivision (7) of this subsection.
(9) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
received a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course in January
2026 or January 2027, or both, where applicable, pursuant to one of the
programs listed subdivision (7) of this subsection.
(10) The statistical relationship between a teacher receiving a bonus in January
2026 or 2027 pursuant to this section and receiving a bonus pursuant to a
predecessor bonus program. For purposes of this subdivision, the following
are predecessor programs:
a. Bonuses awarded pursuant to Section 7A.4(c) of S.L. 2021-180 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section.
b. Bonuses awarded pursuant to Section 7A.4(d) of S.L. 2021-180 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subsection (d) of this
section.
c. Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (c) and
subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of Section 7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (1) of
subsection (f) and subdivision (1) of subsection (g) of this section.
d. Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (c) and
subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of Section 7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (2) of
subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of subsection (g) of this section.
e. Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (c)(3) and subdivision (d)(3)
of Section 7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74 are predecessors to bonuses awarded
Page 34 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of
subsection (g) of this section.
(11) The distribution of statewide and local growth bonuses awarded pursuant to
this section as among qualifying public school units and, where applicable,
schools within those units.

SUPPLEMENTAL FUNDS FOR TEACHER COMPENSATION
SECTION 7A.4.(a) Use of Funds. – For each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium,
except as provided in subsection (f1) of this section, the State Board of Education shall allocate
funds pursuant to this section to eligible local school administrative units to provide salary
supplements to teachers and qualifying school administrators in those units. Allocation of salary
supplements among teachers and qualifying school administrators within each eligible local
school administrative unit, including whether a teacher or qualifying school administrator
receives a salary supplement and the amount of the supplement provided to that person, shall be
determined in the discretion of the local board of education of the eligible unit, except that no
individual salary supplement shall exceed the per teacher funding amount awarded to that unit
pursuant to subdivision (4) of subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 7A.4.(b) Definitions. – As used in this section, the following definitions
shall apply:
(1) Adjusted market value of taxable real property. – A county's assessed taxable
real property value, using the latest available data published by the
Department of Revenue, divided by the county's sales assessment ratio
determined under G.S. 105-289(h).
(2) Composite value. – For each eligible county, the sum of the following:
a. The taxable real property factor multiplied by sixty-five percent
(65%).
b. The median household income factor multiplied by twenty-five
percent (25%).
c. The effective tax rate factor multiplied by ten percent (10%).
(3) County allocation factor. – For each eligible county, the supplement factor for
that county divided by the sum of all supplement factors for the State.
(4) Effective tax rate. – The actual county tax rate multiplied by the most recent
annual sales assessment ratio for that county.
(5) Effective tax rate factor. – For each eligible county, the effective tax rate for
that county divided by the median effective tax rate in the State.
(6) Eligible county. – A county that has an adjusted market value of taxable real
property of less than fifty billion nine hundred million dollars
($50,900,000,000).
(7) Eligible local school administrative unit. – A local school administrative unit
located in whole or in part in an eligible county.
(8) Eligible school. – A public school that is located in an eligible county and
governed by a local school administrative unit.
(9) Maintenance of effort amount. – For each local school administrative unit in
each fiscal year, the supplant factor multiplied by the total State and non-State
funds expended for salaries for teachers from the fiscal year for which the
most recent salary data are available.
(10) Median household income. – A county's median household income for the
most recent 12 months for which data are available, as that term is used in
G.S. 143B-437.08.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 35

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(11) Median household income factor. – For each eligible county, the median
household income in the State divided by the median household income for
that county.
(12) Non-State funds. – Any funds held by a local school administrative unit, other
than nonrecurring federal funds received as a result of legislation enacted by
Congress in response to COVID19, that are not State funds.
(13) Qualifying school administrator. – Any of the following:
a. Assistant principals paid pursuant to G.S. 115C-285(a)(8).
b. Principals paid pursuant to G.S. 115C-285(a)(8a).
(14) Supplant factor. – For each local school administrative unit in each fiscal year
of the fiscal biennium, the total non-State funds expended for salary
supplements for teachers in the 2020-2021 fiscal year divided by the total
State and non-State funds expended for salaries for teachers in the 2020-2021
fiscal year.
(15) Supplement factor. – For each eligible county, the composite value multiplied
by the number of State-funded teachers employed in a school in the county
that is governed by a local school administrative unit.
(16) Taxable real property factor. – For each eligible county, the median adjusted
market value of taxable real property in the State divided by the adjusted
market value of taxable real property for that county.
(17) Teacher. – Teachers and instructional support personnel.
SECTION 7A.4.(c) Allocation of Funds. – The State Board of Education shall
allocate funds for salary supplements to eligible local school administrative units according to
the following procedure:
(1) County allocation. – For each eligible county, the State Board shall determine
a county allocation by multiplying the county allocation factor for that county
by the funding amount appropriated pursuant to this section for the applicable
fiscal year.
(2) Per teacher funding amount. – For each eligible county, the State Board shall
determine a per teacher funding amount by dividing the county allocation
amounts determined pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection by the total
number of State-funded teachers employed in all eligible schools in that
county.
(3) Unit funding amount. – For each eligible local school administrative unit, the
State Board shall determine the funding amount for that unit based on the per
teacher funding amount or amounts for the eligible county or counties where
the unit is located. For each county with an eligible school governed by the
unit, the State Board shall multiply the applicable per teacher funding amount
for that county determined pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection by
the number of State-funded teachers employed in the eligible school in that
county. If the unit is located in multiple eligible counties, the State Board shall
aggregate those amounts.
(4) Allocation and funding cap. – The State Board shall allocate the amount
determined pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection to each eligible local
school administrative unit for each applicable fiscal year, up to a maximum of
five thousand dollars ($5,000) per State-funded teacher.
SECTION 7A.4.(d) Charter Schools. – Funds appropriated to the Department of
Public Instruction pursuant to this section shall be subject to the allocation of funds for charter
schools described in G.S. 115C-218.105. The General Assembly encourages charter schools
receiving funds pursuant to this section to provide salary supplements to teachers and qualifying
school administrators in the charter school in accordance with the requirements of this section.
Page 36 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7A.4.(e) Formula for Distribution of Supplemental Funding Pursuant to
this Section Only. – The formula in this section is solely a basis for distribution of supplemental
funding to eligible local school administrative units and is not intended to reflect any measure of
the adequacy of the educational program or funding for public schools. The formula is also not
intended to reflect any commitment by the General Assembly to appropriate any additional
supplemental funds for eligible local school administrative units.
SECTION 7A.4.(f) Non-supplant Requirement. – A local school administrative unit
that receives funds under this section shall use those funds to supplement non-State funds
provided for salary supplements for teachers and qualifying school administrators and shall not
use any State funds, including funds received under this section or Section 7A.12 of S.L.
2021-180, to supplant non-State funds provided for salary supplements for teachers and
qualifying school administrators. For purposes of this section, a local school administrative unit
has supplanted non-State funds if the State Board finds that the amount of non-State funds
expended by the unit for salary supplements was less than ninety-five percent (95%) of the
maintenance of effort amount for the local school administrative unit.
SECTION 7A.4.(f1) Non-supplant Enforcement. – If the State Board of Education
determines that a local school administrative unit has supplanted non-State funds in violation of
subsection (f) of this section, the State Board of Education shall not allocate any funds under this
section to the unit.
SECTION 7A.4.(f2) Additional Penalty for Consecutive Supplanting. – It is the
intent of the General Assembly that the State Board of Education will not allocate supplemental
funds for teacher compensation to a local school administrative unit in the 2026-2027 fiscal year
if the State Board of Education determines that the local school administrative unit supplanted
non-State funds provided for salary supplements for teachers and qualifying school
administrators with State funds in the 2024-2025 fiscal year and the 2025-2026 fiscal year.
SECTION 7A.4.(g) Reports. – No later than April 15 of each year of the 2025-2027
fiscal biennium, the State Board of Education shall report the following information for the
applicable fiscal year to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal
Research Division:
(1) A list of all eligible counties and eligible local school administrative units.
(2) Funds allocated to each eligible local school administrative unit.
(3) The percentage and amount of teachers and qualifying school administrators
in each eligible local school administrative unit receiving salary supplements.
(4) The average salary supplement amount in each eligible local school
administrative unit.
(5) The range of salary supplement amounts in each eligible local school
administrative unit.
(6) The effect of the salary supplements on the retention of teachers and
qualifying school administrators in eligible local school administrative units.
(7) The identity of any local school administrative unit that the State Board
determines has supplanted funds.

PRINCIPAL SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 7A.5.(a) The following annual salary schedule for principals shall apply
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025.
2025-2026 Principal Annual Salary Schedule
Avg. Daily Membership Base Met Growth Exceeded Growth
0-200 $79,737 $87,709 $95,684
201-400 $83,723 $92,095 $100,467
401-700 $87,709 $96,481 $105,252
701-1,000 $91,698 $100,866 $110,037
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 37

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
1,001-1,600 $95,684 $105,252 $114,821
1,601+ $99,670 $109,637 $119,604
SECTION 7A.5.(b) The following annual salary schedule for principals shall apply
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2026.
2026-2027 Principal Annual Salary Schedule
Avg. Daily Membership Base Met Growth Exceeded Growth
0-200 $81,730 $89,902 $98,076
201-400 $85,816 $94,397 $102,979
401-700 $89,902 $98,893 $107,883
701-1,000 $93,990 $103,388 $112,788
1,001-1,600 $98,076 $107,883 $117,692
1,601+ $102,162 $112,378 $122,594
SECTION 7A.5.(c) A principal's placement on the salary schedule shall be
determined according to the average daily membership of the school supervised by the principal,
as described in subsection (b) of this section, and the school growth scores, calculated pursuant
to G.S. 115C-83.15(c), for each school the principal supervised in at least one of the prior two
school years, as described in subsection (c) of this section, regardless of a break in service, and
provided the principal supervised each school as a principal for at least a majority of the school
year, as follows:
(1) A principal shall be paid according to the Exceeded Growth column of the
schedule if the school growth scores show the school or schools exceeded
expected growth in at least one of the prior two school years.
(2) A principal shall be paid according to the Met Growth column of the schedule
if any of the following apply:
a. The higher school growth score in one of the two prior school years
shows that the school met expected growth.
b. The principal supervised a school in the two prior school years that
was not eligible to receive a school growth score.
(3) A principal shall be paid according to the Base column if either of the
following apply:
a. The school growth scores show the school or schools did not meet
expected growth in either of the two prior years.
b. The principal has not supervised any school as a principal for a
majority of the school year in at least the two prior school years.
SECTION 7A.5.(d) For purposes of determining the average daily membership of a
principal's school, the following amounts shall be used during the following time periods:
(1) For the 2025-2026 school year, placement on the schedule related to average
daily membership shall be based on the average daily membership for the
school from the 2024-2025 school year. If the school did not have an average
daily membership in the 2024-2025 school year, the projected average daily
membership for the school for the 2025-2026 school year shall be used
between July 1, 2025 and December 31, 2025, and the average daily
membership for the school shall be used between January 1, 2026 and June
30, 2026.
(2) For the 2026-2027 school year, placement on the schedule related to average
daily membership shall be based on the average daily membership for the
school from the 2025-2026 school year. If the school did not have an average
daily membership in the 2025-2026 school year, the projected average daily
membership for the school for the 2026-2027 school year shall be used
between July 1, 2026 and December 31, 2026, and the average daily
Page 38 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
membership for the school shall be used between January 1, 2027 and June
30, 2027.
SECTION 7A.5.(e) For purposes of determining the school growth scores for each
school the principal supervised in one or more prior school years, the following school growth
scores shall be used during the following time periods:
(1) For purposes of determining the school growth scores for each principal in the
2025-2026 school year, school growth scores from the two most recent
available school years, up to the 2024-2025 school year, shall be used.
(2) For purposes of determining the school growth scores for each principal in the
2026-2027 school year, school growth scores from the two most recent
available school years, up to the 2025-2026 school year, shall be used.
SECTION 7A.5.(f) Beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to principals paid on the principal salary schedule, the amounts of
those longevity payments are included in the annual amounts under the principal salary schedule.
SECTION 7A.5.(g) A principal compensated in accordance with this section for the
2025-2026 and 2026-27 fiscal year shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the following:
(1) The applicable amount determined pursuant to subsections (a) through (d) of
this section.
(2) For principals who were eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017 fiscal year,
the sum of the following:
a. The salary the principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal year pursuant
to Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.
b. The longevity that the principal would have received as provided for
State employees under the North Carolina Human Resources Act for
the 2016-2017 fiscal year based on the principal's current years of
service.
(3) For principals who were not eligible for longevity in the 2016-17 fiscal year,
the salary the principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal year pursuant to
Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94

PRINCIPAL RECRUITMENT BONUS
SECTION 7A.6.(a) G.S. 115C-285.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-285.1. Principal recruitment supplement.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions shall apply in this section:
(1) Eligible employer. – The governing board of a local school administrative unit
with an eligible school.
(2) Eligible school. – A low‑performing school, as defined in G.S. 115C-105.37,
that received an overall school performance score that placed it in the bottom
five percent (5%) ten percent (10%) of all schools in the State in the prior
school year.
(3) Qualifying principal. – A principal who is paid on the Exceeded Growth
column of the Principal Salary Schedule.
(4) Qualifying school. – An eligible school selected by the Department to
participate in the Program.
(b) Program; Purpose. – The Department of Public Instruction shall establish the
Principal Recruitment Supplement Program (Program). To the extent funds are made available,
the purpose of the Program shall be to provide significant, time‑limited salary supplements to
qualifying principals who accept employment as principals of qualifying schools.
(c) Salary Supplement. – A qualifying principal who accepts a position as a principal in
a qualifying school shall receive an annual salary supplement of thirty thousand dollars
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 39

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
($30,000), paid on a monthly basis, as long as the principal is employed as the principal of that
school, up to a maximum period of 36 months, subject to the following:
(1) A qualifying principal who contracts with an eligible employer to receive the
salary supplement shall not be excluded in future years from contracting with
the same eligible employer or a different eligible employer for another salary
supplement, subject to the requirements of this section.
(2) A qualifying principal who accepts employment as a principal at a qualifying
school shall continue to receive the salary supplement during performance of
the contract, up to 36 months, even if one or more of the following occur:
a. The principal is no longer a qualifying principal.
b. The school is no longer an eligible school.
(3) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), salary supplements provided pursuant to this
section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General
Statutes, the Teachers' and State Employees' Retirement System.
(4) In the event that insufficient funds are available to provide awards to all
qualifying principals, the Department shall prioritize providing salary
supplements to those principals accepting positions in the lowest performing
schools.
…."

BONUSES FOR PRINCIPALS
SECTION 7A.7.(a) The Department of Public Instruction shall administer a bonus
in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to any principal who supervised a school as a principal for a
majority of the previous school year if that school was in the top fifty percent (50%) of school
growth in the State during the previous school year, calculated by the State Board pursuant to
G.S. 115C-83.15(c), as follows:
2025-2027 Principal Bonus Schedule
Statewide Growth Percentage Bonus
Top 5% $15,000
Top 10% $10,000
Top 15% $5,000
Top 20% $2,500
Top 50% $1,000
A principal shall receive no more than one bonus pursuant to this subsection. The
bonus shall be paid at the highest amount for which the principal qualifies.
SECTION 7A.7.(b) The bonus awarded pursuant to this section shall be in addition
to any regular wage or other bonus the principal receives or is scheduled to receive.
SECTION 7A.7.(c) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the bonuses awarded pursuant
to this section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes,
Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
SECTION 7A.7.(d) It is the intent of the General Assembly that funds provided
pursuant to this section will supplement principal compensation and not supplant local funds.
SECTION 7A.7.(e) The bonus provided pursuant to this section shall be paid no
later than October 31, 2025, to qualifying principals employed as of October 1, 2025.

ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL SALARIES
SECTION 7A.8.(a) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, assistant principals shall
receive a monthly salary based on the relevant salary schedule for teachers shown in Section
7A.1(a) who are classified as "A" teachers plus nineteen percent (19%). An assistant principal
shall be placed on the step on the salary schedule that reflects the total number of years of
experience as a certified employee of the public schools. For purposes of this section, an
Page 40 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
administrator with a one-year provisional assistant principal's certificate shall be considered
equivalent to an assistant principal.
SECTION 7A.8.(b) Assistant principals with certification based on academic
preparation at the six-year degree level shall be paid a salary supplement of one hundred
twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month and at the doctoral degree level shall be paid a salary
supplement of two hundred fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month.
SECTION 7A.8.(c) Participants in an approved full-time master's in school
administration program shall receive up to a 10-month stipend during the internship period of the
master's program. The stipend shall be at the beginning salary of an assistant principal or, for a
teacher who becomes an intern, at least as much as that person would earn as a teacher on the
teacher salary schedule. The North Carolina Principal Fellows Program or the school of education
where the intern participates in a fulltime master's in school administration program shall supply
the Department of Public Instruction with certification of eligible fulltime interns.
SECTION 7A.8.(d) Beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to assistant principals on the assistant principal salary schedule, the
amounts of those longevity payments are included in the monthly amounts provided to assistant
principals pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 7A.8.(e) An assistant principal compensated in accordance with this
section for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the
following:
(1) The applicable amount determined pursuant to subsections (a) through (d) of
this section.
(2) For assistant principals who were eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017 fiscal
year, the sum of the following:
a. The salary the assistant principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal year
pursuant to Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.
b. The longevity that the assistant principal would have received as
provided for State employees under the North Carolina Human
Resources Act for the 2016-2017 fiscal year based on the assistant
principal's current years of service.
(3) For assistant principals who were not eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017
fiscal year, the salary the assistant principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal
year pursuant to Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.

CENTRAL OFFICE SALARIES
SECTION 7A.9.(a) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025, the
annual salary for superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate superintendents,
directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers, whose salaries are supported from State
funds, shall be increased by two and one half percent (2.5%).
SECTION 7A.9.(b) The monthly salary maximums that follow apply to assistant
superintendents, associate superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance
officers for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025:
2025-2026 Fiscal Year
Maximum
School Administrator I $7,762
School Administrator II $8,225
School Administrator III $8,715
School Administrator IV $9,055
School Administrator V $9,417
School Administrator VI $9,974
School Administrator VII $10,373
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 41

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The local board of education shall determine the appropriate category and placement
for each assistant superintendent, associate superintendent, director/coordinator, supervisor, or
finance officer within the maximums and within funds appropriated by the General Assembly
for central office administrators and superintendents. The category in which an employee is
placed shall be included in the contract of any employee.
SECTION 7A.9.(c) The monthly salary maximums that follow apply to public
school superintendents for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025:
2025-2026 Fiscal Year
Maximum
Superintendent I $10,995
Superintendent II $11,650
Superintendent III $12,350
Superintendent IV $13,092
Superintendent V $13,880
The local board of education shall determine the appropriate category and placement
for the superintendent based on the average daily membership of the local school administrative
unit and within funds appropriated by the General Assembly for central office administrators and
superintendents.
SECTION 7A.9.(d) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2026, the
annual salary for superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate superintendents,
directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers, whose salaries are supported from State
funds, shall be increased by an additional two and one half percent (2.5%).
SECTION 7A.9.(e) The monthly salary maximums that follow apply to assistant
superintendents, associate superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance
officers for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2026:
2026-2027 Fiscal Year
Maximum
School Administrator I $7,956
School Administrator II $8,431
School Administrator III $8,933
School Administrator IV $9,281
School Administrator V $9,652
School Administrator VI $10,223
School Administrator VII $10,632
The local board of education shall determine the appropriate category and placement
for each assistant superintendent, associate superintendent, director/coordinator, supervisor, or
finance officer within the maximums and within funds appropriated by the General Assembly
for central office administrators and superintendents. The category in which an employee is
placed shall be included in the contract of any employee.
SECTION 7A.9.(f) The monthly salary maximums that follow apply to public
school superintendents for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2026:
2026-2027 Fiscal Year
Maximum
Superintendent I $11,270
Superintendent II $11,941
Superintendent III $12,659
Superintendent IV $13,419
Superintendent V $14,227
The local board of education shall determine the appropriate category and placement
for the superintendent based on the average daily membership of the local school administrative
Page 42 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
unit and within funds appropriated by the General Assembly for central office administrators and
superintendents.
SECTION 7A.9.(g) Longevity pay for superintendents, assistant superintendents,
associate superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers shall be as
provided for State employees under the North Carolina Human Resources Act.
SECTION 7A.9.(h) Superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate
superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers with certification based
on academic preparation at the six-year degree level shall receive a salary supplement of one
hundred twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month in addition to the compensation provided
pursuant to this section. Superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate superintendents,
directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers with certification based on academic
preparation at the doctoral degree level shall receive a salary supplement of two hundred
fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month in addition to the compensation provided for under this
section.
SECTION 7A.9.(i) The State Board of Education shall not permit local school
administrative units to transfer State funds from other funding categories for salaries for public
school central office administrators.

NON-CERTIFIED PERSONNEL SALARIES
SECTION 7A.10.(a) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025, the
annual salary for non-certified public school employees whose salaries are supported from State
funds shall be increased as follows:
(1) For permanent, full-time employees on a 12-month contract, by two and one
half percent (2.5%).
(2) For the following employees, by a prorated and equitable amount based on the
amount specified in subdivision (1) of this subsection:
a. Permanent, full-time employees on a contract for fewer than 12
months.
b. Permanent, part-time employees.
c. Temporary and permanent hourly employees.
SECTION 7A.10.(b) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2026, the
annual salary for non-certified public school employees whose salaries are supported from State
funds shall be increased as follows:
(1) For permanent, full-time employees on a 12-month contract, by an additional
two and one half percent (2.5%).
(2) For the following employees, by a prorated and equitable amount based on the
amount specified in subdivision (1) of this subsection:
a. Permanent, full-time employees on a contract for fewer than 12
months.
b. Permanent, part-time employees.
c. Temporary and permanent hourly employees.

PART VII-B. GOVERNOR MOREHEAD SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND – RESERVED

PART VII-C. EASTERN NORTH CAROLINA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF –
RESERVED

PART VII-D. NORTH CAROLINA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF - RESERVED

PART VIII. THE UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA SYSTEM

Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 43

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
COMPLETION ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS
SECTION 8.1.(a) For purposes of this section, the term "eligible constituent
institutions" refers to the following constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina:
(1) Elizabeth City State University.
(2) Fayetteville State University.
(3) NC Central University.
(4) University of North Carolina at Pembroke.
(5) Winston-Salem State University.
SECTION 8.1.(b) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall
establish a Completion Assistance Program (Program) at each eligible constituent institution. At
a minimum, each Program shall meet the following criteria:
(1) A student enrolled in a Program established by this section may receive up to
one thousand dollars ($1,000) per academic semester under the Program to
pay for the costs of continuing attendance and earning necessary credit hours
at the eligible constituent institution.
(2) A student shall be eligible to receive funds under a Program if the student
meets at least the following requirements:
a. Needs financial assistance to remain enrolled at the eligible constituent
institution and earn credits necessary to graduate on time.
b. Is a resident for tuition purposes, as provided in G.S. 116-143.1.
c. Meets satisfactory academic progress, as determined by the Board.
d. Has completed or is on track to complete at least 60 academic credit
hours by the end of the semester in which the funds are provided.
e. Has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA)
for the academic year in which the funds are provided.
f. Has an unpaid balance with the eligible constituent institution. This
may include an unpaid balance for tuition, fees, room, board, or other
expenses of attendance.
SECTION 8.1.(c) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall
report on each Completion Assistance Program established pursuant to this section to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee no later than March 15, 2028. The report shall
include, at a minimum, an analysis of the impact of each Program on the following:
(1) On-time graduation rates.
(2) Student debt at graduation.
SECTION 8.1.(d) Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina for Completion Assistance Programs, the Board shall
allocate funds to each eligible constituent institution of The University of North Carolina
proportional to the number of undergraduate students enrolled at each eligible constituent
institution who are residents of North Carolina and recipients of a federal Pell Grant.

EXPAND CHEATHAM-WHITE SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
SECTION 8.2.(a) G.S. 116-290 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116‐290. Cheatham-White Scholarships; establishment and purpose; benefits.
(a) Scholarships Established; Purpose. – The Cheatham-White Scholarships are
established as a merit scholarship program at North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State
University, and at North Carolina Central University, and Winston‐Salem State University. The
purpose of the scholarships is to provide an outstanding educational experience for students who
are exceptional scholars, versatile and well‐ rounded individuals with a broad range of interests,
and who are accomplished and proficient in areas of both the arts and the sciences. They must
also demonstrate leadership potential and a strong commitment to service.
Page 44 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Scholarship Benefits. – Each scholarship is a fully funded four-year scholarship that
covers the cost of all of the following: full tuition, student fees, housing, meals, textbooks, a
laptop, supplies, travel, and personal expenses. Each scholarship also provides four summers of
fully funded enrichment and networking opportunities that may include international travel and
study.
(c) Number of Scholarships Awarded. – Up to 50 150 scholarships, 40 120 for resident
students and 10 30 for nonresident students, may be awarded each academic year to students
admitted to North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University. Up to 50 100
scholarships, 40 80 for resident students and 10 20 for nonresident students, may be awarded each
academic year to students admitted to North Carolina Central University. Up to 50 scholarships,
40 for resident students and 10 for nonresident students, may be awarded each academic year to
students admitted to Winston‐Salem State University."
SECTION 8.2.(b) G.S. 116-292(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 116‑292. Cheatham-White Scholarships; eligibility and selection criteria.
(a) Eligibility. – To be eligible to be nominated as a potential candidate for a
Cheatham-White Scholarship, a person must satisfy all of the following criteria:
(1) Be a competitive applicant for admission as a freshman in the fall semester
into a baccalaureate program at either North Carolina Agricultural and
Technical State University, or North Carolina Central University, or Winston-
Salem State University.
(2) Be a United States citizen or permanent resident.
(3) Be on course to graduate from high school in the spring semester prior to
college admission."
SECTION 8.2.(c) G.S. 116-294 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116‑294. Cheatham-White Scholarships; administration of scholarships.
The University of North Carolina System Office shall administer the Cheatham‐White
Scholarships, in consultation and collaboration with North Carolina Agricultural and Technical
State University, and North Carolina Central University, and Winston‐Salem State University,
pursuant to policies adopted by the Board of Trustees of both constituent institutions. As part of
its administrative responsibilities, The University of North Carolina System Office, in
consultation and collaboration with North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University,
and North Carolina Central University, and Winston‐Salem State University, shall do all of the
following:
(1) Design and implement an application and school nomination process to be
used to identify potential scholarship candidates and a process for awarding
the scholarships.
…
(9) Any other function necessary for the successful implementation of the
Cheatham-White Scholarships program and administration of the
Cheatham-White Scholarships Fund."

NORTH CAROLINA SCHOOL OF SCIENCE AND MATH RECEIPT FLEXIBILITY
SECTION 8.3. G.S. 116-30.3A reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-30.3A. Availability of excess receipts.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes, receipts within The
University of North Carolina realized in excess of budgeted levels shall be available, up to a
maximum of ten percent (10%) above budgeted levels, for each Budget Code, in addition to
appropriations to support the operations generating the receipts as approved by the Director of
the Budget. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-6-4(g), the North Carolina School of Science and
Mathematics shall be subject to subsections b1 and b2 of G.S. 143C-6-4."

Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 45

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
NORTH CAROLINA SCHOOL OF SCIENCE AND MATH RESIDENCY
DETERMINATION
SECTION 8.4. G.S. 116-235 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-235. Board of Trustees; additional powers and duties.
…
(b) Students. –
(1) Admission of Students. – The School shall admit students in accordance with
criteria, standards, and procedures established by the Board of Trustees. To be
eligible to be considered for admission, an applicant must be either a legal
resident of the State, as defined by G.S. 116-143.1(a)(1) G.S. 116-143.1(b) or
a student whose parent is an active duty member of the Armed Forces, as
defined by G.S. 116-143.3(a)(2), who is abiding in this State incident to active
military duty at the time the application is submitted, provided the student
shares the abode of that parent; eligibility to remain enrolled in the School
shall terminate at the end of any school year during which a student becomes
a nonresident of the State. The Board of Trustees shall ensure, insofar as
possible without jeopardizing admission standards, that an equal number of
qualified applicants is admitted to the program and to the residential summer
institutes in science and mathematics from each of North Carolina's
congressional districts. In no event shall the differences in the number of
qualified applicants offered admission to the program from each of North
Carolina's congressional districts be more than two and one-half percentage
points from the average number per district who are offered admission.
…."

PART VIII-A. NORTH CAROLINA STATE EDUCATION ASSISTANCE AUTHORITY

OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIPS ACCOUNTABILITY
SECTION 8A.1.(a) G.S. 115C-562.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
…
(3a) Eligible student. – A student residing in North Carolina who has not yet
received a high school diploma and who meets all of the following
requirements:
a. Is eligible to attend a North Carolina public school pursuant to Article
25 of this Chapter. A child who is the age of 4 on or before April 16 is
eligible to attend the following school year if the principal, or
equivalent, of the school in which the child seeks to enroll finds that
the student meets the requirements established by the Authority
pursuant to G.S. 115C-562.2(d) and those findings are submitted to the
Authority.
b. Has not been enrolled in a postsecondary institution as a full-time
student taking at least 12 hours of academic credit.
c. Has not been placed in a nonpublic school or facility by a public
agency at public expense.
d. Received a scholarship grant during the previous school year."
SECTION 8A.1.(b) G.S. 115C-562.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.2. Scholarship grants.
(a) The Authority shall make available no later than February 1 annually applications to
eligible students for the award of scholarship grants to attend any nonpublic school on a full or
Page 46 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
part-time basis. Information about scholarship grants and the application process shall be made
available on the Authority's Web site. Beginning March 15, the Authority shall begin awarding
scholarship grants to students who have applied by March 1 in the following order: according to
the following criteria:
(1) Eligible students who received a scholarship grant for the school year prior to
the school year for which the students are applying.
(2) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (1) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(3) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (2) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(4) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (3) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(5) All other students.
(b) Repealed by Session Laws 2023-134, s. 8A.6(c), effective July 1, 2023.
(b1) Repealed by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8A.3(e), effective July 1, 2021.
(b2) Scholarship grants shall be awarded to eligible students as follows:
(1) For students residing in households with an income level not in excess of the
amount required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price
lunch program, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to one hundred
percent (100%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year.
(2) For students residing in households with an income level between the amount
required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch
program and not in excess of two hundred percent (200%) one hundred and
fifty percent (150%) of that amount, per year per eligible student, an amount
of up to ninety percent (90%) of the average State per pupil allocation for
average daily membership in the prior fiscal year.
(3) For students residing in households with an income level of between two
hundred percent (200%) of the amount required for the student to qualify for
the federal free or reducedprice lunch program and not in excess of four
hundred fifty percent (450%) of that amount, per year per eligible student, an
amount of up to sixty percent (60%) of the average State per pupil allocation
for average daily membership in the prior fiscal year.
(4) For all students, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to fortyfive
percent (45%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year, unless the student qualifies for a higher
amount under this subsection.
(b3) Tuition and fees for a nonpublic school may include tuition and fees for books,
transportation, equipment, or other items required by the nonpublic school.
(b4) No scholarship grant shall exceed, per year per eligible student, an amount equal to
one hundred percent (100%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year, and no scholarship grant shall exceed the required tuition
and fees for the nonpublic school the eligible student will attend.
(b5) In addition to the amount of the scholarship grant, for any student receiving a
scholarship grant in grades three, eight, or 11, the Authority shall provide to the nonpublic school
an amount equal to the cost of the nationally standardized test required to be administered as
provided in G.S. 115C-562.5.
(c) The Authority shall permit an eligible student receiving a scholarship grant to enroll
in a different nonpublic school and remain eligible. An eligible student receiving a scholarship
grant who transfers to another nonpublic school during the year may be eligible to receive a pro
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 47

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
rata share of any unexpended portion of the scholarship grant for tuition and fees at the nonpublic
school to which the student transfers.
(c1) An eligible student awarded a scholarship grant shall participate in administration of
examinations required by G.S. 115C-562.5 to maintain eligibility for receipt of the scholarship
grant."
SECTION 8A.1.(c) G.S. 115C-562.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.5. Obligations of nonpublic schools accepting eligible students receiving
scholarship grants.
(a) A nonpublic school that accepts eligible students receiving scholarship grants shall
comply with the following:
(1) Provide to the Authority annually documentation for required tuition and fees
charged to the student by the nonpublic school.
(1a) Shall not increase tuition each year by more than the Consumer Price Index
as calculated by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics and reported on
January 1 of the year in which the school is increasing tuition.
(2) Provide to the Authority a criminal background check conducted for the staff
member with the highest decision-making authority, as defined by the bylaws,
articles of incorporation, or other governing document, to ensure that person
has not been convicted of any crime listed in G.S. 115C-332.
(3) Provide to the parent or guardian of an eligible student, whose tuition and fees
are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship grant, an annual written
explanation of the student's progress, including the student's scores on
standardized achievement tests.
(4) Administer, at least once in each school year (or more as required by State or
Federal Requirements), tests as provided in this subdivision. Student-level test
performance data shall be submitted to the Authority by July 15 of each year
and retained by the nonpublic school for a five-year period and shall be subject
to audit by the Authority to ensure compliance with this subdivision.year. Test
Personally identifiable individual test performance data reported to the
Authority or audited or collected for evaluation purposes by the Authority
under this subdivision is not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General
Statutes. Nothing in this subdivision shall be deemed to prohibit a nonpublic
school from administering other standardized tests or tests at other grade
levels for its own purposes. Tests shall be administered to all eligible students
enrolled in grades three and higher whose tuition and fees are paid in whole
or in part with a scholarship grant as follows:
a. The nationally standardized test norm-referenced assessment
designated by the Authority in grades three and eight.
b. The ACT in grade 11.
c. A nationally standardized test or other nationally standardized
equivalent measurement norm-referenced assessment selected by the
chief administrative officer of the nonpublic school from the list of
approved assessments determined by the Authority in all other grades
four and higher. For grades four through seven, the nationally
standardized test or other equivalent measurement selected must
measure achievement nationally norm-referenced assessments
approved by the Authority must assess student performance in the
areas of English grammar, reading, spelling, and mathematics. For
grades nine, 10, and 12, the nationally standardized test or other
equivalent measurement selected must nationally norm-referenced
assessments approved by the Authority must measure either (i)
Page 48 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
achievement student performance in the areas of English grammar,
reading, spelling, and mathematics or (ii) competencies in the verbal
and quantitative areas. The Authority shall approve at least two but not
more than three nationally norm-referenced assessments for each
grade level for this purpose.
d. The assessments and tests required by the State Board of Education
for public schools to comply with federal law according to grade level
pursuant to G.S. 115C-174.11(c)(1).
(4b) Pursuant to G.S. 115C-107.6, educate each child with a disability awarded
scholarship funds in accordance with that child's Individualized Education
Program (IEP) and in compliance with the Individuals with Disabilities Act
(IDEA) and State Board of Education policies.
(5) Provide to the Authority four-year cohort graduation rates of the students
receiving scholarship grants in a manner consistent with requirements of Title
I, Part A of ESEA and 34 C.F.R. § 200.19. nationally recognized standards.
(5b) Provide to the Authority by August 1 of each year attendance records of
students receiving scholarship grants during the previous school year
including the name of any schools attended during that time.
(5c) Report annually to the State Board of Education the incidents of reportable
crime pursuant to G.S. 115C-228.
(6) Contract with a certified public accountant to perform a financial reviewaudit,
consistent with generally accepted methods of accounting or any other
comprehensive basis of accounting recognized by the American Institute of
Certified Public Accountants (AICPA) a minimum of once every two years
for each school year in which the school enrolls 70 or more students receiving
scholarship grants or scholarship funds awarded by the Authority. students
who collectively receive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
in scholarship grants awarded under this Part. If a nonpublic school accepts
students receiving less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in
scholarship grants, the school shall contract with a certified public accountant
to perform a financial audit once every three years. The nonpublic school shall
submit the audit report to the Authority by December 31 of each year an audit
is conducted. The Authority may require a school to be audited annually after
the school has two consecutive financial audits with findings. The Authority
shall ensure that all schools are audited in accordance with this section.
(7) Maintain a school facility within the State where in-person instruction is
provided. This subdivision does not prohibit a school from offering
remote-only courses of instruction in addition to in-person instruction.
(8) Provide the following information annually to the Division:
a. Name and address of the school, including physical location address.
A school with more than one physical location shall establish a
separate notice of intent for each physical location and shall provide
all information required by this subdivision for each physical location.
b. The name of the owners and chief administrator, as well as their
contact information.
c. Number of students in attendance at the school as of October 1.
d. Total number of students enrolled in the school as of the last day of
the previous school year.
e. Documentation of a completed fire inspection within the previous 365
days.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 49

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(9) In coordination with local law enforcement agencies, adopt a School Risk
Management Plan (SRMP) relating to incidents of school violence as detailed
in G.S. 115C-47(40). In constructing and maintaining these plans, the school
shall utilize the School Risk and Response Management System (SRRMS)
established pursuant to G.S. 115C-105.49A. These plans are not considered a
public record as the term "public record" is defined under G.S. 132-1.
(10) Pursuant to G.S. 115C-105.53, provide schematic diagrams and keys to the
main entrance of school facilities to local law enforcement agencies. These
diagrams are not considered a public record as the term "public record" is
defined under G.S. 132-1.
(11) Pursuant to G.S. 115C-105.49, at least once a year, hold a full school-wide
lockdown exercise with local law enforcement and emergency management
agencies that are part of the qualified nonpublic school's SRMP.
(12) Provide the following: (i) schematic diagrams, including digital schematic
diagrams, and (ii) emergency response information requested by the
Department of Public Safety, Division of Emergency Management for the
SRMP. These diagrams and emergency response information are not
considered a public record as the term "public record" is defined under
G.S. 132-1.
(b) A nonpublic school that accepts students receiving scholarship grants shall not require
any additional fees based on the status of the student as a scholarship grant recipient.
(c) A nonpublic school enrolling more than 25 10 students in any grade whose tuition
and fees are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship grant shall provide and retain information
on student test performance in each grade with more than 25 10 students, as follows:
(1) Report to the Authority on the aggregate standardized test performance of the
individual student test performance of eligible students in grades three, eight,
and 11 under subsection (4) of this section. Aggregate test performance data
reported to the Authority which does not contain personally identifiable
student data shall be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.
The Authority shall make these reports of aggregate student test performance
publicly available. Test performance data may be shared with public or private
institutions of higher education located in North Carolina and shall be
provided to an independent research organization selected by the Authority
for research purposes as permitted by the Federal Education Rights and
Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g.
(2) Retain standardized test performance data for eligible students in all other
grades and annually certify to the Authority compliance with the requirements
of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section.
(c1) A nonpublic school shall not discriminate with respect to: the categories listed in 42
U.S.C. § 2000d, as that statute read on January 1, 2014
(1) race, color, and national origin as listed in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d, as that statute
read on January 1, 2014,
(2) disability as defined in the Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990, 42
U.S.C. § 12101 as that statute read on January 1, 2024, and
(3) sexual orientation."
SECTION 8A.1.(d) G.S. 115C-562.7(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision
to read:
"§ 115C-562.7. Reporting requirements.
…
(6) Information on the compliance with the academic assessment requirement
pursuant to G.S. 115C-562.5(3a-b).
Page 50 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) School-level assessment data for each participating nonpublic school serving
10 or more students receiving scholarship funds."
SECTION 8A.1.(e) G.S. 115C-562.8(b) reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.8. The Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve.
…
(b) The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical need in this State to provide
opportunity for school choice for North Carolina students, it is imperative that the State provide
an increase of funds for 15 years to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve. Therefore,
there There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Reserve the following amounts for each
fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
2017-2018 $44,840,000
2018-2019 $54,840,000
2019-2020 $64,840,000
2020-2021 $74,840,000
2021-2022 $84,840,000
2022-2023 $94,840,000
2023-2024 $176,540,000
2024-2025 $191,540,000
2025-2026 $625,000,000
2026-2027 $675,000,000
2027-2028 $700,000,000$234,488,935
2028-2029 $725,000,000$217,270,804
2029-2030 $750,000,000$195,951,245
2030-2031 $775,000,000$193,426,448
2031-2032 $800,000,000$149,580,223
2032-2033 $126,221,744
2033-2034 $101,647,252
2034-2035 $76,338,957
2035-2036 $50,912,730
2036-2037 $25,344,985
For the 2032-2033 2037-2038 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated
from the General Fund to the Reserve the sum of eight hundred twenty-five million dollars
($825,000,000) zero dollars ($0) to be used for the purposes set forth in this section. When
developing the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-11, for each fiscal year specified in this
subsection, the Director of the Budget shall include the appropriated amount specified in this
subsection for that fiscal year."
SECTION 8A.1.(f) The State Education Assistance Authority shall not award
scholarship funds to new recipients pursuant to Part 2A of Article 39 of Subchapter X of Chapter
115C of the General Statutes after the 2025-2026 academic year.
SECTION 8A.1.(g) G.S. 115C-112.7 is amended by adding a new subsection to
read:
"…
(c) The State Education Assistance Authority, in coordination with the Department of
Public Instruction, shall make publicly available by September 30 of each year school
achievement, growth, and performance scores and associated performance grades pursuant to
G.S. 115C-83.15 for nonpublic schools that enroll more than 10 students whose tuition and fees
are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship grant. This section is effective with the 2026-27
school year. The first school achievement, growth, and performance scores and associated
performance grades shall be made publicly available by September 30, 2027.
…."
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 51

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 8A.1.(h) Section 8A.6(i) and Section 8A.6(j) of Session Law 2023-134
are repealed.
SECTION 8A.1.(i) The State Education Assistance Authority shall transfer one
hundred fourteen million, seven hundred twenty-one thousand, four hundred nine dollars
($114,721,409) in unused fund balance from the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve
to budget code 16012 in the General Fund.
SECTION 8A.1.(j) This provision is effective when it becomes law and applies
beginning with the 2026-27 school year.

CHILDREN OF WARTIME VETERANS SCHOLARSHIP FUND AWARDS
FLEXIBILITY
SECTION 8A.2. G.S. 143B-1227 reads as rewritten:
"143B-1227. Administration and funding.
…
(c) Allowances for room and board in State educational institutions shall be at such a rate
as established by the Secretary of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.
(d) Within funds available for the Program, the following shall be determined:
Due to the sacrifice of veterans for the State of North Carolina and the unique needs and
challenges of the children of wartime veterans to ensure they have the greatest opportunities to
reach their higher education attainment goals, if there are additional eligible recipients, other than
those identified by the Department under this Program, who are attending public colleges and
universities of the State who may qualify to have their scholarships funded with monies from the
Escheat Fund, the Authority, after consultation with the Secretary, may fund those scholarships
with monies from the Escheat Fund.
(e) After consultation with the Authority, the Secretary shall determine whether to
prioritize the award of new applicants for the 2025-2026 academic year in Class I-A, I-B, and IV
scholarships, prior to awarding Class II and III scholarships. Class II and Class III awards may
be determined following awards for Class I-A, I-B, and IV depending on the availability of funds
for the Program.
(f) The Secretary, after consulting with the Authority, may determine based on the
number of eligible students, including new and renewal students, that have applied for the 2026-
2027 academic year, whether to reduce the room and board allowance award for students
attending a public institution and the maximum allowance award for students attending private
institutions, prior to August 15, 2026.
(g) After the actions set forth in sub-subdivisions d., e., and f. of this subdivision have
been taken, for awards for the 2026-2027 academic year, if funds available for the Program are
still insufficient to provide scholarships to all eligible students, the Authority may adjust and
standardize award amounts as necessary, including providing pro rata scholarship awards for
room and board, to ensure the efficient administration of the scholarship funds.
(h) All scholarship notifications shall include language that the award of the scholarship
is contingent upon the availability of funds.
(i) The Authority shall disburse scholarship funds in accordance with G.S. 116-204(11a).
(j) From the total amount of funding appropriated to the Board of Governors of The
University of North Carolina and allocated to the Authority in a fiscal year to support the award
of scholarship funds under the Program, the Authority may use an amount of up to two and one-
half percent (2.5%) for administration costs related to the Program from the allocation from the
General Fund. The Authority shall place any unexpended and unencumbered appropriated funds
remaining at the end of the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 fiscal years into an institutional trust fund
established in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 116-36.1. Those funds may be used for the
purpose of awarding scholarships under the Program and for administration costs of the Authority
related to the Program."
Page 52 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

PART IX. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

PART IX-A. AGING AND ADULT SERVICES [RESERVED]

PART IX-B. CENTRAL MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT

COMMUNITY HEALTH GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 9B.1.(a) Funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and
Human Services, Division of Central Management, Office of Rural Health, for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium for the Community Health Grant Program shall be used to continue
to administer the Community Health Grant Program as modified by Section 11A.8 of S.L.
2017-57.
SECTION 9B.1.(b) The Office of Rural Health shall make the final decision about
awarding grants under this Program, but no single grant award shall exceed one hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($150,000) during the fiscal year. In awarding grants, the Office of Rural Health
shall consider the availability of other funds for the applicant; the incidence of poverty in the area
served by the applicant or the number of indigent clients served by the applicant; the availability
of, or arrangements for, after-hours care; and collaboration between the applicant and a
community hospital or other safety net organizations.
SECTION 9B.1.(c) Grant recipients shall not use these funds to do any of the
following:
(1) Enhance or increase compensation or other benefits of personnel,
administrators, directors, consultants, or any other persons receiving funds for
program administration; provided, however, funds may be used to hire or
retain health care providers. The use of grant funds for this purpose does not
obligate the Department of Health and Human Services to continue to fund
compensation beyond the grant period.
(2) Supplant existing funds, including federal funds traditionally received by
federally qualified community health centers. However, grant funds may be
used to supplement existing programs that serve the purposes described in
subsection (a) of this section.
(3) Finance or satisfy any existing debt.
SECTION 9B.1.(d) The Office of Rural Health may use up to two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000) in recurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for
administrative purposes.
SECTION 9B.1.(e) By September 1 of each year, the Office of Rural Health shall
submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on
community health grants that includes at least all of the following information:
(1) The identity and a brief description of each grantee and each program or
service offered by the grantee.
(2) The amount of funding awarded to each grantee.
(3) The number of individuals served by each grantee and, for the individuals
served, the types of services provided to each.
(4) Any other information requested by the Office of Rural Health as necessary
for evaluating the success of the Community Health Grant Program.

REPLACEMENT FOR CRITICAL IT SYSTEMS THAT SUPPORT SUBSTANCE USE
DISORDER PREVENTION AND TREATMENT
SECTION 9B.2. The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop and
implement a replacement for outdated data systems supporting substance use prevention and
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 53

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
treatment goals, specifically concerning the Driving While Impaired Services, the Drug
Education School, and the Drug Control Unit programs designed to prevent progression of
misuse of substances through education and regulatory supports. The project shall not proceed
until the business case has been approved by the Office of State Budget and Management and
the State Chief Information Officer in the Enterprise Project Management Office's Touchdown
System. Upon approval, Mixed Use Beverage tax receipts available in Budget Code 14460,
Budget Fund 134603, may be budgeted for transfer to Budget Code 24410 for information
technology projects in an amount not to exceed one million two hundred thousand dollars
($1,200,000). Following project completion, the Division of Mental Health, Developmental
Disabilities, and Substance Use Services may use Mixed Use Beverage Tax receipts to cover
operations and maintenance costs for the new IT system.

USE OF TALC SETTLEMENT FUNDS
SECTION 9B.3.(a) The Ovarian Cancer Mitigation Fund (Fund) is created within
the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Central Management and Support,
as a nonreverting special fund. The Fund shall consist of (i) monies received by the State as a
beneficiary of the final consent judgment resolving the case, State of North Carolina, ex rel.
Joshua H. Stein, Attorney General v. Johnson & Johnson (J&J Case), and (ii) all interest and
investment earnings received on monies in the Fund. Monies in the Fund shall be expended only
by an act of appropriation by the General Assembly and in accordance with the final consent
judgment resolving the J&J Case.
SECTION 9B.3.(b) There is appropriated from the Ovarian Cancer Mitigation Fund
created in subsection (a) of this section to the Department of Health and Human Services,
Division of Central Management and Support, the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated and used as follows:
(1) Up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for 2026-2027
shall be used to support a public-private partnership consisting of community-
based organizations, medical providers, and others to develop, strengthen, and
promote improved access to ovarian cancer educational materials, screenings,
and care providers. Funds may be used to contract with a lead community-
based organization with statewide reach to implement related initiatives,
including technical assistance and subgrants to other community-based
organizations for these purposes.
(2) Up to seven hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) in nonrecurring
funds for 2026-27 shall be used to invest in data collection and analysis
infrastructure to support timely and accurate cancer surveillance and improved
capacity to address emerging threats.
(3) Up to one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,250,000) in
nonrecurring funds for 2026-2027 shall be used to design and implement
communication and education strategies designed to raise awareness of
ovarian cancer and promote preventive measures, screening, and treatment.
In addition to these uses, the Department of Health and Human Services may use up
to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) of funds allocated by this subdivision for each year
of the fiscal biennium for administrative purposes.
SECTION 9B.3.(c) Funds allocated under subsection (b) of this section shall remain
available for expenditure in the amounts and for the purposes specified in subsection (a) of this
section until expended.
SECTION 9B.3.(d) Beginning November 1, 2027, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human
Services and the Fiscal Research Division on the expenditures made from the Ovarian Cancer
Mitigation Fund during the preceding fiscal year.
Page 54 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

APPROPRIATION OF RURAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION GRANT FUNDS
SECTION 9B.4. The grant funds received from the federal Rural Health
Transformation Program authorized under H.R.1 are appropriated in the amounts provided in the
notification of award from the federal government or any entity acting on behalf of the federal
government to administer the federal funds. State agencies may, with approval of the Director of
the Budget, spend funds received from the Rural Health Transformation Program.

PART IX-C. CHILD AND FAMILY WELL-BEING [RESERVED]

PART IX-D. CHILD DEVELOPMENT AND EARLY EDUCATION

NC PRE-K PROGRAMS/STANDARDS FOR FOUR AND FIVE-STAR RATED
FACILITIES
SECTION 9D.1.(a) Eligibility. – The Department of Health and Human Services,
Division of Child Development and Early Education, shall continue implementing the
prekindergarten program (NC Pre-K). The NC Pre-K program shall serve children who are 4
years of age on or before August 31 of the program year. In determining eligibility, the Division
shall establish income eligibility requirements for the program not to exceed seventy-five percent
(75%) of the State median income. Up to twenty percent (20%) of children enrolled may have
family incomes in excess of seventy-five percent (75%) of median income if those children have
other designated risk factors. Furthermore, any age-eligible child who is a child of either of the
following shall be eligible for the program: (i) an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the
United States, including the North Carolina National Guard, State military forces, or a reserve
component of the Armed Forces who was ordered to active duty by the proper authority within
the last 18 months or is expected to be ordered within the next 18 months, or (ii) a member of the
Armed Forces of the United States, including the North Carolina National Guard, State military
forces, or a reserve component of the Armed Forces who was injured or killed while serving on
active duty. Eligibility determinations for NC Pre-K participants may continue through local
education agencies and local North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., partnerships.
Other than developmental disabilities or other chronic health issues, the Division shall
not consider the health of a child as a factor in determining eligibility for participation in the NC
Pre-K program.
SECTION 9D.1.(a1) Staff-To-Child Ratio and Class Size. – The classroom shall not
exceed a maximum staff-to-child ratio of one to 10 with a maximum class size of 20 children,
with at least one teacher and one teacher assistant per classroom. A classroom of 10 children or
less shall have at least one teacher. The Child Care Commission shall adopt any rules and the
Division of Child Development and Early Education shall revise any rules or policies necessary
to implement the provisions of this subsection.
SECTION 9D.1.(b) Multi-year Contracts. – The Division of Child Development and
Early Education shall require the NC Pre-K contractor to issue multi-year contracts for licensed
private child care centers providing NC Pre-K classrooms.
SECTION 9D.1.(c) Building Standards. – Notwithstanding G.S. 110-91(4), private
child care facilities and public schools operating NC Pre-K classrooms shall meet the building
standards for preschool students as provided in G.S. 115C-521.1.
SECTION 9D.1.(d) Programmatic Standards. – Except as provided in subsection (c)
of this section, entities operating NC Pre-K classrooms shall adhere to all of the policies
prescribed by the Division of Child Development and Early Education regarding programmatic
standards and classroom requirements.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 55

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9D.1.(e) NC Pre-K Committees. – Local NC Pre-K committees shall use
the standard decision-making process developed by the Division of Child Development and Early
Education in awarding NC Pre-K classroom slots and student selection.
SECTION 9D.1.(f) Reporting. – The Division of Child Development and Early
Education shall submit an annual report no later than March 15 of each year to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Office of State Budget and
Management, and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include the following:
(1) The number of children participating in the NC Pre-K program by county.
(2) The number of children participating in the NC Pre-K program who have
never been served in other early education programs such as child care, public
or private preschool, Head Start, Early Head Start, or early intervention
programs.
(3) The expected NC Pre-K expenditures for the programs and the source of the
local contributions.
(4) The results of an annual evaluation of the NC Pre-K program.
SECTION 9D.1.(g) Audits. – The administration of the NC Pre-K program by local
partnerships shall be subject to the financial and compliance audits authorized under
G.S. 143B-168.14(b).

CHILD CARE SUBSIDY RATES
SECTION 9D.2.(a) The maximum gross annual income for initial eligibility,
adjusted annually, for subsidized child care services shall be determined based on a percentage
of the federal poverty level as follows:
AGE INCOME PERCENTAGE LEVEL
0 – 5 200%
6 – 12 133%
The eligibility for any child with special needs, including a child who is 13 years of
age or older, shall be two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level.
SECTION 9D.2.(b) Fees for families who are required to share in the cost of care
are established based on ten percent (10%) of gross family income. When care is received at the
blended rate, the copayment shall be eighty-three percent (83%) of the full-time copayment.
Copayments for part-time care shall be seventy-five percent (75%) of the full-time copayment.
SECTION 9D.2.(c) Payments for the purchase of child care services for low-income
children shall be in accordance with the following requirements:
(1) Religious sponsored child care facilities operating pursuant to G.S. 110-106
and licensed child care centers and homes that meet the minimum licensing
standards that are participating in the subsidized child care program shall be
paid the one-star county market rate unless prohibited by subsection (f) of this
section.
(2) Licensed child care centers and homes with two or more stars shall receive the
county market rate for that rated license level for that age group or the
statewide rate floor, whichever is higher, unless prohibited by subsection (g)
of this section.
(3) Certified Developmental Day Centers shall receive the statewide average or
county market rate, whichever is higher, plus a multiplier of 0.75 for children
with special needs and multiplier of 0.5 for typically developing children.
(4) No payments shall be made for transportation services charged by child care
facilities.
(5) Payments for subsidized child care services for postsecondary education shall
be limited to a maximum of 20 months of enrollment. This shall not be
determined before a family's annual recertification period.
Page 56 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) The Department of Health and Human Services shall implement necessary
rule changes to restructure services, including, but not limited to, targeting
benefits to employment.
SECTION 9D.2.(d) Provisions of payment rates for child care providers in counties
that do not have at least 50 children in each age group for center-based and homebased care are
as follows:
(1) Except as applicable in subdivision (2) of this subsection, payment rates shall
be set at the statewide or regional market rate for licensed child care centers
and homes.
(2) If it can be demonstrated that the application of the statewide or regional
market rate to a county with fewer than 50 children in each age group is lower
than the county market rate and would inhibit the ability of the county to
purchase child care for low-income children, then the county market rate may
be applied.
SECTION 9D.2.(e) A market rate shall be calculated for child care centers and
homes at each rated license level for each county and for each age group or age category of
enrollees and shall be representative of fees charged to parents for each age group of enrollees
within the county. The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall also calculate
a statewide rate and regional market rate for each rated license level for each age category.
SECTION 9D.2.(f) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, shall increase the child care
subsidy market rates to the seventy-fifth percentile as recommended by the 2023 Child Care
Market Rate Study for children in three-, four-, and five-star-rated child care centers and homes.
The Department shall also implement a subsidy statewide floor rate based on the seventy-fifth
percentile of the 2021 Child Care Market Rate Study for children in three-, four-, and
five-star-rated child care centers and homes.
SECTION 9D.2.(g) The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall
continue implementing policies that improve the quality of child care for subsidized children,
including a policy in which child care subsidies are paid, to the extent possible, for child care in
the higher quality centers and homes only. The Division shall define higher quality, and subsidy
funds shall not be paid for one or two-star-rated facilities. For those counties with an inadequate
number of four and five-star-rated facilities, the Division shall continue a transition period that
allows the facilities to continue to receive subsidy funds while the facilities work on the increased
star ratings. The Division may allow exemptions in counties where there is an inadequate number
of four and five-star-rated facilities for non-star-rated programs, such as religious programs.
SECTION 9D.2.(h) Facilities licensed pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the
General Statutes and facilities operated pursuant to G.S. 110-106 may participate in the program
that provides for the purchase of care in child care facilities for minor children of needy families.
Except as authorized by subsection (f) of this section, no separate licensing requirements shall
be used to select facilities to participate. In addition, child care facilities shall be required to meet
any additional applicable requirements of federal law or regulations. Child care arrangements
exempt from State regulation pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes shall
meet the requirements established by other State law and by the Social Services Commission.
County departments of social services or other local contracting agencies shall not
use a provider's failure to comply with requirements in addition to those specified in this
subsection as a condition for reducing the provider's subsidized child care rate.
SECTION 9D.2.(i) Payment for subsidized child care services provided with
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant funds shall comply with all regulations
and policies issued by the Division of Child Development and Early Education for the subsidized
child care program.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 57

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9D.2.(j) Non-citizen families who reside in this State legally shall be
eligible for child care subsidies if all other conditions of eligibility are met. If all other conditions
of eligibility are met, non-citizen families who reside in this State illegally shall be eligible for
child care subsidies only if at least one of the following conditions is met:
(1) The child for whom a child care subsidy is sought is receiving child protective
services or foster care services.
(2) The child for whom a child care subsidy is sought is developmentally delayed
or at risk of being developmentally delayed.
(3) The child for whom a child care subsidy is sought is a citizen of the United
States.
SECTION 9D.2.(k) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of
Child Development and Early Education, shall require all county departments of social services
to include on any forms used to determine eligibility for child care subsidy whether the family
waiting for subsidy is receiving assistance through the NC Pre-K Program or Head Start.
SECTION 9D.2.(l) Department of Defense-certified child care facilities licensed
pursuant to G.S. 110-106.2 may participate in the State-subsidized child care program that
provides for the purchase of care in child care facilities for minor children in needy families,
provided that funds allocated from the State-subsidized child care program to Department of
Defense-certified child care facilities shall supplement and not supplant funds allocated in
accordance with G.S. 143B-168.15(g). Payment rates and fees for military families who choose
Department of Defense-certified child care facilities and who are eligible to receive subsidized
child care shall be as set forth in this section.

CHILD CARE ALLOCATION FORMULA
SECTION 9D.3.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of
Child Development and Early Education (Division), shall allocate child care subsidy voucher
funds to pay the costs of necessary child care for minor children of needy families. The
mandatory thirty percent (30%) North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., subsidy allocation
under G.S. 143B-168.15(g) shall constitute the base amount for each county's child care subsidy
allocation. The Department of Health and Human Services shall use the following method when
allocating federal and State child care funds, not including the aggregate mandatory thirty percent
(30%) North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., subsidy allocation:
(1) Funds shall be allocated to a county based upon the projected cost of serving
children under age 11 in families with all parents working who earn less than
the applicable federal poverty level percentage set forth in Section 9D.3(a) of
this act.
(2) The Division may withhold up to two percent (2%) of available funds from
the allocation formula for (i) preventing termination of services throughout
the fiscal year and (ii) repayment of any federal funds identified by counties
as overpayments, including overpayments due to fraud. The Division shall
allocate to counties any funds withheld before the end of the fiscal year when
the Division determines the funds are not needed for the purposes described
in this subdivision. The Division shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division, which report shall include each of the following:
a. The amount of funds used for preventing termination of services and
the repayment of any federal funds.
b. The date the remaining funds were distributed to counties.
c. As a result of funds withheld under this subdivision and after funds
have been distributed, any counties that did not receive at least the
Page 58 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
amount the counties received the previous year and the amount by
which funds were decreased.
The Division shall submit a report in each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium 30
days after the funds withheld pursuant to this subdivision are distributed but no later than April
1 of each respective year.
(3) The Division shall set aside four percent (4%) of child care subsidy allocations
for vulnerable populations, which include a child identified as having special
needs and a child whose application for assistance indicates that the child and
the child's family is experiencing homelessness or is in a temporary living
situation. A child identified by this subdivision shall be given priority for
receiving services until such time as set-aside allocations for vulnerable
populations are exhausted.
SECTION 9D.3.(b) The Division may reallocate unused child care subsidy voucher
funds in order to meet the child care needs of low-income families. Any reallocation of funds
shall be based upon the expenditures of all child care subsidy voucher funding, including North
Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., funds within a county. Counties shall manage service
levels within the funds allocated to the counties. A county with a spending coefficient over one
hundred percent (100%) shall submit a plan to the Division for managing the county's allocation
before receiving any reallocated funds.
SECTION 9D.3.(c) When implementing the formula under subsection (a) of this
section, the Division shall include the market rate increase in the formula process rather than
calculate the increases outside of the formula process. Additionally, the Department shall do the
following:
(1) Deem a county's initial allocation as the county's expenditure in the previous
fiscal year or a prorated share of the county's previous fiscal year expenditures
if sufficient funds are not available.
(2) Effective immediately following the next new decennial census data release,
implement (i) one-third of the change in a county's allocation in the year
following the data release, (ii) an additional one-third of the change in a
county's allocation beginning two years after the initial change under this
subdivision, and (iii) the final one-third change in a county's allocation
beginning the following two years thereafter.

SMART START INITIATIVES
SECTION 9D.4.(a) Policies. – The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.,
and its Board shall ensure policies focus on the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.'s
mission of improving child care quality in North Carolina for children from birth to five years of
age. North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., funded activities shall include assisting child
care facilities with (i) improving quality, including helping one, two, and three-star-rated
facilities increase their star ratings, and (ii) implementing prekindergarten programs. State
funding for local partnerships shall also be used for evidence-based or evidence-informed
programs for children from birth to five years of age that do the following:
(1) Increase children's literacy.
(2) Increase the parents' ability to raise healthy, successful children.
(3) Improve children's health.
(4) Assist four and five-star-rated facilities in improving and maintaining quality.
SECTION 9D.4.(b) Administration. – Administrative costs shall be equivalent to,
on an average statewide basis for all local partnerships, not more than ten percent (10%) of the
total statewide allocation to all local partnerships. For purposes of this subsection, administrative
costs shall include costs associated with partnership oversight, business and financial
management, general accounting, human resources, budgeting, purchasing, contracting, and
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 59

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
information systems management. The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., shall
continue using a single statewide contract management system that incorporates features of the
required standard fiscal accountability plan described in G.S. 143B-168.12(a)(4). All local
partnerships are required to participate in the contract management system and, directed by the
North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., to collaborate, to the fullest extent possible, with
other local partnerships to increase efficiency and effectiveness.
SECTION 9D.4.(c) Salaries. – The salary schedule developed and implemented by
the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., shall set the maximum amount of State funds
that may be used for the salary of the Executive Director of the North Carolina Partnership for
Children, Inc., and the directors of the local partnerships. The North Carolina Partnership for
Children, Inc., shall base the schedule on the following criteria:
(1) The population of the area serviced by a local partnership.
(2) The amount of State funds administered.
(3) The amount of total funds administered.
(4) The professional experience of the individual to be compensated.
(5) Any other relevant factors pertaining to salary, as determined by the North
Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.
The salary schedule shall be used only to determine the maximum amount of State
funds that may be used for compensation. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit
a local partnership from using non-State funds to supplement an individual's salary in excess of
the amount set by the salary schedule established under this subsection.
SECTION 9D.4.(d) Match Requirements. – The North Carolina Partnership for
Children, Inc., and all local partnerships shall, in the aggregate, be required to match one hundred
percent (100%) of the total amount budgeted for the program in each fiscal year of the 2025-2027
biennium. Of the funds that the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., and the local
partnerships are required to match, contributions of cash shall be equal to at least thirteen percent
(13%) and in-kind donated resources shall be equal to no more than six percent (6%) for a total
match requirement of nineteen percent (19%) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.
The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., may carry forward any amount in excess of
the required match for a fiscal year in order to meet the match requirement of the succeeding
fiscal year. Only in-kind contributions that are quantifiable shall be applied to the in-kind match
requirement. Volunteer services may be treated as an in-kind contribution for the purpose of the
match requirement of this subsection. Volunteer services that qualify as professional services
shall be valued at the fair market value of those services. All other volunteer service hours shall
be valued at the statewide average wage rate as calculated from data compiled by the Division of
Employment Security of the Department of Commerce in the Employment and Wages in North
Carolina Annual Report for the most recent period for which data are available. Expenses,
including both those paid by cash and in-kind contributions, incurred by other participating non-
State entities contracting with the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., or the local
partnerships also may be considered resources available to meet the required private match. In
order to qualify to meet the required private match, the expenses shall:
(1) Be verifiable from the contractor's records.
(2) If in-kind, other than volunteer services, be quantifiable in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles for nonprofit organizations.
(3) Not include expenses funded by State funds.
(4) Be supplemental to and not supplant preexisting resources for related program
activities.
(5) Be incurred as a direct result of the Early Childhood Initiatives Program and
be necessary and reasonable for the proper and efficient accomplishment of
the Program's objectives.
(6) Be otherwise allowable under federal or State law.
Page 60 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) Be required and described in the contractual agreements approved by the
North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., or the local partnership.
(8) Be reported to the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., or the local
partnership by the contractor in the same manner as reimbursable expenses.
Failure to obtain a nineteen percent (19%) match by June 30 of each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall result in a dollar-for-dollar reduction in the appropriation for the
Program for a subsequent fiscal year. The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., shall be
responsible for compiling information on the private cash and in-kind contributions into a report,
to be included in its annual report as required under G.S. 143B-168.12(d), in a format that allows
verification by the Department of Revenue. The same match requirements shall apply to any
expansion funds appropriated by the General Assembly.
SECTION 9D.4.(e) Bidding. – The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.,
and all local partnerships shall use competitive bidding practices in contracting for goods and
services on contract amounts as follows:
(1) For amounts of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less, the procedures specified
by a written policy as developed by the Board of Directors of the North
Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.
(2) For amounts greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000) but less than fifteen
thousand dollars ($15,000), three written quotes.
(3) For amounts of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more but less than forty
thousand dollars ($40,000), a request for proposal process.
(4) For amounts of forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or more, a request for
proposal process and advertising in a major newspaper.
SECTION 9D.4.(f) Allocations. – The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.,
shall not reduce the allocation for counties with less than 35,000 in population below the
2012-2013 funding level.
SECTION 9D.4.(g) Performance-Based Evaluation. – The Department of Health
and Human Services shall continue to implement the performance-based evaluation system.
SECTION 9D.4.(h) Expenditure Restrictions. – Except as provided in subsection (i)
of this section, the Department of Health and Human Services and the North Carolina Partnership
for Children, Inc., shall ensure that the allocation of funds for Early Childhood Education and
Development Initiatives for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be administered and distributed
in the following manner:
(1) Capital expenditures are prohibited for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. For the
purposes of this section, "capital expenditures" means expenditures for capital
improvements as defined in G.S. 143C-1-1(d)(5).
(2) Expenditures of State funds for advertising and promotional activities are
prohibited for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.
For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, local partnerships shall not spend any State funds
on marketing campaigns, advertising, or any associated materials. Local partnerships may spend
any private funds the local partnerships receive on those activities.
SECTION 9D.4.(i) Notwithstanding subsection (h) of this section, the North
Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., and local partnerships may use up to one percent (1%) of
State funds for fundraising activities. The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., shall
include in its annual report required under G.S. 143B-168.12(d) a report on the use of State funds
for fundraising. The report shall include the following:
(1) The amount of funds expended on fundraising.
(2) Any return on fundraising investments.
(3) Any other information deemed relevant.

PART IX-E. HEALTH BENEFITS
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 61

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

CONTINUE MEDICAID ANNUAL REPORT
SECTION 9E.1. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits (DHB), shall continue the publication of the Medicaid Annual Report and
accompanying tables. DHB shall publish the report and tables on its website no later than
December 31 following each State fiscal year.

VOLUME PURCHASE PLANS AND SINGLE SOURCE PROCUREMENT
SECTION 9E.2. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits, may, subject to the approval of a change in the State Medicaid Plan, contract for
services, medical equipment, supplies, and appliances by implementation of volume purchase
plans, single source procurement, or other contracting processes in order to improve cost
containment.

ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FUNDING
SECTION 9E.3. Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health
and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, for administrative contracts and interagency
transfers, the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall transfer the sum of one
million dollars ($1,000,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of one million dollars
($1,000,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to the Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH).
These funds shall be allocated by OAH for mediation services provided for Medicaid applicant
and recipient appeals and to contract for other services necessary to conduct the appeals process.
OAH shall continue the Memorandum of Agreement (MOA) with DHHS for mediation services
provided for Medicaid recipient appeals and contracted services necessary to conduct the appeals
process. Upon receipt of invoices from OAH for covered services rendered in accordance with
the MOA, DHHS shall transfer the federal share of Medicaid funds drawn down for this purpose.

ACCOUNTING FOR MEDICAID RECEIVABLES AS NONTAX REVENUE
SECTION 9E.4.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of
Health Benefits (DHB), receivables reserved at the end of the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 fiscal
years shall, when received, be accounted for as nontax revenue for each of those fiscal years. The
treatment under this section of any revenue derived from federal programs shall be in accordance
with the requirements specified in the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 2, Part 225.
SECTION 9E.4.(b) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall deposit from its revenues one hundred seven million seven hundred
thousand dollars ($170,965,305) with the Department of State Treasurer to be accounted for as
nontax revenue. For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the Department of Health and Human Services
shall deposit from its revenues one hundred nine million dollars ($174,565,305) with the
Department of State Treasurer to be accounted for as nontax revenue. These deposits shall
represent the return of advanced General Fund appropriations, nonfederal revenue, fund
balances, or other resources from State-owned and State operated hospitals that are used to
provide indigent and nonindigent care services. The return from State-owned and State operated
hospitals to the Department of Health and Human Services shall be made from nonfederal
resources in the following manner:
(1) The University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill shall make the
following deposits:
a. For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the amount of thirty-one million three
hundred sixty-five thousand three hundred five dollars ($31,365,305).
b. For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the amount of thirty-one million three
hundred sixty-five thousand three hundred five dollars ($31,365,305).
Page 62 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) All State-owned and State operated hospitals, other than the University of
North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill, that specialize in psychiatric care
shall annually deposit an amount equal to the amount of the payments from
DHB for uncompensated care.

LME/MCO INTERGOVERNMENTAL TRANSFERS
SECTION 9E.5.(a) The local management entities/managed care organizations
(LME/MCOs) shall make intergovernmental transfers to the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), in an aggregate amount of eighteen million twenty-
eight thousand two hundred seventeen dollars ($18,028,217) in the 2025-2026 fiscal year and in
an aggregate amount of eighteen million twenty-eight thousand two hundred seventeen dollars
($18,028,217) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. The due date and frequency of the
intergovernmental transfer required by this section shall be determined by DHB. The amount of
the intergovernmental transfer that each individual LME/MCO is required to make in each fiscal
year shall be as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
Alliance Behavioral Healthcare $4,508,857 $4,508,857
Partners Health Management $3,544,348 $3,544,348
Trillium Health Resources $6,448,693 $6,448,693
Vaya Health $3,526,319 $3,526,319
SECTION 9E.5.(b) In the event that a county disengages from an LME/MCO and
realigns with another LME/MCO during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, DHB shall have the
authority to reallocate the amount of the intergovernmental transfer that each affected
LME/MCO is required to make under subsection (a) of this section, taking into consideration the
change in catchment area and covered population, provided that the aggregate amount of the
transfers received from all LME/MCOs in each year of the fiscal biennium is achieved.

MEDICAID TRANSFORMATION FUND BALANCE
SECTION 9E.6. The unexpended balance in the Medicaid Transformation Fund of
six million eight hundred forty-one thousand four hundred sixty-six dollars ($6,841,466) shall be
transferred to the Division of Health Benefits for Medicaid administration needs in FY 2026-27.

CREATE DESIGNATED STATE HEALTH PROGRAM SAVINGS BUDGET FUND
SECTION 9E.7.(a) Fund created. – The Designated State Health Programs budget
fund is created as a nonreverting budget fund within the Department of Health and Human
Services (DHHS), Division of Health Benefits (DHB) 24445 budget code. The Division of
Central Management Services, Division of Child and Family Well-Being, Division of Mental
Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services, and Division of Public Health
shall transfer and deposit all freed-up state funds that result from additional receipts realized
through Designated State Health Programs authority in the North Carolina Medicaid Reform
Section 1115 Demonstration approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in
December, 2024 to this budget fund.

APPROPRIATION OF GOVERNMENT EFFICIENCY GRANT
SECTION 9E.8. The federal Government Efficiency Grant funds awarded to
implement the State Medicaid Community Engagement requirements and other necessary
eligibility system requirements resulting from Medicaid expansion eligibility changes in H.R.1
are appropriated in the amounts provided in the notification of award from the federal
government or any entity acting on behalf of the federal government to administer the federal
funds. DHB, with approval of the Director of the Budget, may spend the grant awards.

Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 63

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
LEGISLATIVE INTENT
SECTION 9E.9.1. It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide funding for
the increased administrative costs of compliance with frequency of eligibility redeterminations
requirements and community engagement requirements in the Medicaid program under Sections
71107 and 71119 of P.L. 119-21 from a source that meets the limitations on funding sources in
G.S. 108A-54.3B for NC Health Works.

SHIFT EXISTING PUBLIC HOSPITAL ASSESSMENTS TO
INTERGOVERNMENTAL TRANSFERS
SECTION 9E.9.2.(a) G.S. 108A-146.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-146.1. Public hospital modernized assessment.
(a) The public hospital modernized assessment imposed under this Part shall apply to all
public acute care hospitals.
(b) The public hospital modernized assessment shall be assessed as a percentage of each
public acute care hospital's hospital costs. The assessment percentage shall be calculated
quarterly by the Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with this Part. The
(c) Through June 30, 2026, the percentage for each quarter shall equal the aggregate acute
care hospital modernized assessment collection amount under G.S. 108A-146.5 multiplied by the
public hospital historical assessment share and divided by the total hospital costs for all public
acute care hospitals holding a license on the first day of the assessment quarter.
(d) Beginning July 1, 2026, the public hospital modernized assessment quarterly
percentage shall equal the modernized IGT actual receipts adjustment component under
G.S. 108A-146.14 divided by the total hospital costs for all public acute care hospitals holding a
license on the first day of the assessment quarter."
SECTION 9E.9.2.(b) Part 2 of Article 7B of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes
is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 108A-146.1A. Public hospital modernized presumptive IGT offset amount.
The public hospital modernized presumptive IGT offset amount is the aggregate acute care
hospital modernized assessment collection amount under G.S. 108A-146.5 multiplied by the
public hospital historical assessment share."
SECTION 9E.9.2.(c) G.S. 108A-146.5(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-146.5. Aggregate acute care hospital modernized assessment collection amount.
(a) The aggregate modernized assessment collection amount is an amount of money that
is calculated by subtracting the modernized intergovernmental transfer presumptive IGT
adjustment component under G.S. 108A-146.13 from the total modernized nonfederal receipts
under subsection (b) of this section and then adding the positive or negative amount of the
modernized IGT actual receipts adjustment component under G.S. 108A-146.14. section."
SECTION 9E.9.2.(d) G.S. 108A-146.14 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-146.14. Modernized IGT actual receipts adjustment component.
The modernized IGT actual receipts adjustment components is a positive or negative dollar
amount equal to the amount of the modernized presumptive IGT adjustment component under
G.S 108A-146.13 G.S. 108A-146.13(c) for the previous quarter plus the public hospital
modernized presumptive IGT offset amount under G.S. 108A-146.1A for the previous quarter
minus the amount of money received during the previous quarter by the Department through the
intergovernmental transfer and designated in the Department’s accounting system as a receipt
related to the modernized assessments. If this calculation results in a negative number, the
modernized IGT actual receipts adjustment component is zero."
SECTION 9E.9.2.(e) G S. 108A-146.14 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-146.14. Modernized IGT actual receipts adjustment component.
The modernized IGT actual receipts adjustment components is a dollar amount equal to the
amount of the modernized presumptive IGT adjustment component under G.S. 108A-146.13(c)
Page 64 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
for the previous quarter plus the public hospital modernized presumptive IGT offset amount
under G.S. 108A-146.1A for the previous quarter minus the amount of money received during
the previous quarter by the Department through the intergovernmental transfer and designated in
the Department’s accounting system as a receipt related to the modernized assessments. If this
calculation results in a negative number, the modernized IGT actual receipts adjustment
component is zero."
SECTION 9E.9.2.(f) Subsection (e) of this section is effective October 1, 2026 and
applies to assessments imposed on or after that date.
SECTION 9E.9.2.(g) G.S. 108A-147.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-147.1. Public hospital health advancement assessment.
(a) The public hospital health advancement assessment imposed under this Part shall
apply to all public acute care hospitals.
(b) The public hospital health advancement assessment shall be assessed as a percentage
of each public acute care hospital's hospital costs. The assessment percentage shall be calculated
quarterly by the Department in accordance with this Part. The
(c) Through June 30, 2026, the percentage for each quarter shall equal the aggregate acute
care hospital health advancement assessment collection amount calculated under
G.S. 108A-147.3 multiplied by the public hospital historical assessment share and divided by the
total hospital costs for all public acute care hospitals holding a license on the first day of the
assessment quarter.
(d) Beginning July 1, 2026, the public hospital health advancement assessment quarterly
percentage shall equal the health advancement IGT actual receipts adjustment components under
G.S. 108A-147.10 divided by the total hospital costs for all public acute care hospitals holding a
license on the first day of the assessment quarter."
SECTION 9E.9.2.(h) Part 3 of Article 7B of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes
is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 108A-147.1A. Public hospital health advancement presumptive IGT offset amount.
The public hospital health advancement presumptive IGT offset amount is the aggregate
acute care hospital health advancement assessment collection amount under G.S. 108A-147.3
multiplied by the public hospital historical assessment share."
SECTION 9E.9.2.(i) G.S. 108A-147.3(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The aggregate health advancement assessment collection amount is an amount of
money that is calculated quarterly by adjusting the total nonfederal receipts for health
advancement calculates under subsection (b) of this section by (i) subtracting the health
advancement presumptive IGT adjustment component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.9, (ii)
adding the positive or negative health advancement IGT actual receipts adjustment component
calculated under G.S. 108A-147.10, G.S. 108A-147.9 and (iii) then subtracting the positive or
negative total IGT share of the reconciliation adjustment component calculated under G.S. 108A-
147.11(b)G.S. 108A-147.11(e)."
SECTION 9E.9.2.(j) G.S. 108A-147.10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-147.10. Health advancement IGT actual receipts adjustment component.
The health advancement IGT actual receipts adjustment component is a positive or negative
dollar amount equal to the health advancement presumptive IGT adjustment component
calculated under G.S. 108A-147.9 for the previous quarter, plus the positive or negative total IGT
share of the reconciliation adjustment component calculated under G.S.
108A-147.11(b)G.S. 108A-147.11(e) for the previous quarter, and minus the amount of money
received during the previous quarter by the Department through intergovernmental transfer and
designated in the Department's accounting system as a receipt for health advancement. If this
calculation results in a negative number, the health advancement IGT actual receipts adjustment
component is zero."
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 65

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9E.9.2.(k) G.S. 108A-147.10 as amended by subsection (j) of this section
reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-147.10. Health advancement IGT actual receipts adjustment component.
The health advancement IGT actual receipts adjustment component is a positive or negative
dollar amount equal to the total of (i) the amount of the health advancement presumptive IGT
adjustment component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.9 for the previous quarter, plus (ii) the
positive or negative IGT share of the reconciliation adjustment component calculated under
G.S. 108A-147.11(e) for the previous quarter, andand (iii) the public hospital health
advancement presumptive IGT offset amount for the previous quarter, minus the amount of
money received during the previous quarter by the Department through intergovernmental
transfer and designated in the Department's accounting system as a receipt for health
advancement. If this calculation results in a negative number, the health advancement IGT actual
receipts adjustment component is zero."
SECTION 9E.9.2.(l) G.S. 108A-147.11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-147.11. Health advancement reconciliation adjustment component.
(a) The health advancement reconciliation adjustment component is a positive or
negative dollar amount equal to the actual nonfederal expenditures for the quarter that is two
quarters prior to the current quarter minus the sum of the following specified amounts:
(1) The presumptive service cost component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.5
for the quarter that is two quarters prior to the current quarter.
(2) The amount transferred during the current quarter by the Department of
Revenue to the State Treasurer for the Health Advancement Receipts Special
Fund under G.S. 105-228.5C.
(3) The health advancement acute care hospital HASP component calculated
under G.S. 108A-147.6 for the quarter that is two quarters prior to the current
quarter.
(4) The health advancement freestanding psychiatric hospital HASP component
calculated under G.S. 108A-147.6A for the quarter that is two quarters prior
to the current quarter.
(b) The base IGT share of the reconciliation adjustment component is a positive or
negative dollar amount that is calculated by multiplying the health advancement reconciliation
adjustment component calculated under subsection (a) of this section by the share of public
hospital costs calculated under subsection (c) of this section.
(c) The share of public hospital costs is calculated by adding total hospital costs for the
UNC Health Care System, total hospital costs for the primary affiliated teaching hospital for the
East Carolina University Brody School of Medicine, and sixty percent (60%) of the total hospital
costs for all public acute care hospitals and dividing that sum by the total hospital costs for all
acute care hospitals except for critical access hospitals.
(d) The supplemental IGT share of the reconciliation adjustment component is a positive
or negative dollar amount that is calculated by subtracting the base IGT share of the reconciliation
adjustment component calculated under subsection (b) of this section from the health
advancement reconciliation component calculated under subsection (a) of this section and
multiplying that difference by the public hospital historical assessment share.
(e) The total IGT share of the reconciliation adjustment component is a positive or
negative dollar amount that is the sum of the base IGT share of the reconciliation adjustment
component calculated under subsection (b) of this section and the supplemental IGT share of the
reconciliation adjustment component calculated under subsection (d) of this section."
SECTION 9E.9.2.(m) Subsection (k) of this section is effective October 1, 2026,
and applies to assessments imposed on or after that date.
SECTION 9E.9.2.(n) Except as otherwise provided, this section is effective July 1,
2026, and applies to assessments imposed on or after that date.
Page 66 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

THE 2026 ONE-TIME ASSESSMENTS FOR NEW HEALTH ADVANCEMENT
ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS
SECTION 9E.9.3.(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Acute care hospital. – As defined in G.S. 108A-145.3.
(2) Aggregate collection amount. – Fourteen million three hundred thousand
dollars ($14,300,000) minus intergovernmental transfer receipts.
(3) DHHS. – The Department of Health and Human Services.
(4) Hospital costs. – As defined in G.S. 108A-145.3.
(5) Intergovernmental transfer receipts. – The amount of money received during
the quarter in which this section becomes effective by DHHS through
intergovernmental transfers and that is designated in DHHS's accounting
system as a receipt for the 2026 one-time assessments.
(6) Private acute care hospital. – As defined in G.S. 108A-145.3.
(7) Private hospital historical assessment share. – As defined in G.S. 108A-145.3.
(8) Public acute care hospital. – As defined in G.S. 108A-145.3.
(9) Public hospital historical assessment share. – As defined in G.S. 108A-145.3.
SECTION 9E.9.3.(b) Effective when this act becomes law, each private acute care
hospital is subject to a 2026 one-time assessment that is a percentage of its hospital costs. The
percentage shall equal the aggregate collection amount multiplied by the private hospital
historical assessment share and divided by the total hospital costs for all private acute care
hospitals.
SECTION 9E.9.3.(c) Effective when this act becomes law, each public acute care
hospital is subject to a 2026 one-time assessment that is a percentage of its hospital costs. The
percentage shall equal the aggregate collection amount multiplied by the public hospital historical
assessment share and divided by the total hospital costs for all public acute care hospitals.
SECTION 9E.9.3.(d) The proceeds of the assessments under this section
and intergovernmental transfer receipts shall be deposited in the Health Advancement
Receipts Special Fund under G.S. 143C-9-10 and shall be used for the increased
administrative costs described in Section 9E.9 as allowed under G.S. 108A-147.13(a)(2). From
the proceeds of this assessment and intergovernmental transfer receipts, DHHS shall use the sum
of seven million eight hundred thousand dollars ($7,800,000) to provide funding to county
departments of social services to support the counties with the increased administrative costs
described in Section 9E.9.9.
SECTION 9E.9.3.(e) The hospital assessments under this section shall be imposed
by DHHS in accordance with the following procedures:
(1) The assessment shall be calculated, imposed, and due in the time and manner
prescribed by DHHS and shall be considered delinquent if not paid within
seven calendar days of this due date.
(2) With respect to any hospital owing a past due assessment amount, DHHS may
withhold the unpaid amount from Medicaid payments otherwise due or
impose a late payment penalty. DHHS may waive a penalty for good cause
shown.
(3) A hospital may appeal a determination of the assessment amount owed
through a reconsideration review. The pendency of an appeal does not relieve
a hospital from its obligation to pay an assessment amount when due.
(4) The assessment may be included as allowable costs of a hospital for purposes
of any applicable Medicaid reimbursement formula, except the assessment
shall be excluded from cost settlement.
(5) The assessment may not be added as a surtax or assessment on a patient's bill.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 67

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9E.9.3.(f) For purposes of determining the aggregate amount of all
assessments due from hospitals under Article 7B of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes
pursuant to G.S. 108A-148.1(c)(2), the assessments under this section shall be considered an
assessment due from hospitals under that Article.
SECTION 9E.9.3.(g) No later than February 1, 2027, DHHS shall submit to the
Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and the Fiscal Research Division a report
that details the amount of the proceeds from the assessments imposed under this section that
DHHS provided to each county department of social services and the date that those proceeds
were provided to each county department of social services.

HOSPITAL HEALTH ADVANCEMENT ASSESSMENT FUNDING FOR NEW
ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS
SECTION 9E.9.4.(a) G.S. 108A-147.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-147.7. Administration Base administration component.
(a) The base administration component is an amount of money that is calculated by
adding the base State administration subcomponent calculated under subsection (b) of this
section and the base county administration subcomponent calculated under subsection (c) of this
section.
(b) For each quarter of the 2023-2024 State fiscal year, the State administration
subcomponent is the product of one million three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,350,000)
multiplied by the number of months in that State fiscal quarter in which G.S. 108A-54.3A(24) is
effective during any part of the month. For each quarter of the 2024-2025 State fiscal year, the
base State administration subcomponent is four million one hundred eighty-seven thousand seven
hundred dollars ($4,187,700). For each subsequent State fiscal year, the base State administration
subcomponent shall be increased over the prior year's quarterly amount by a percentage that is
the sum of each monthly percentage change in the Consumer Price Index: All Urban Consumers
for the most recent 12 months available on March 1 of the previous State fiscal year.
(c) For each quarter of the 2022-2023 State fiscal year and the 2023-2024 State fiscal
year, the county administration subcomponent is the product of one million six hundred
sixty-seven thousand dollars ($1,667,000) multiplied by the number of months in that State fiscal
quarter in which G.S. 108A-54.3A(24) is effective during any part of the month. The base county
administration subcomponent is seven million four hundred thousand dollars ($7,400,000) for
each quarter of the 2024-2025 State fiscal year and seven million eight hundred thousand dollars
($7,800,000) for each quarter of the 2025-2026 State fiscal year. For each State fiscal year after
the 2025-2026 State fiscal year, the base county administration subcomponent shall be increased
over the prior year's quarterly amount by a percentage that is the sum of each monthly percentage
change in the Consumer Price Index: All Urban Consumers for the most recent 12 months
available on March 1 of the previous State fiscal year."
SECTION 9E.9.4.(b) Part 3 of Article 7B of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes
is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 108A-147.7A. Supplemental administration component.
(a) The supplemental administration component is an amount of money that is calculated
by adding the supplemental State administration subcomponent calculated under subsection (b)
of this section and the supplemental county administration subcomponent calculated under
subsection (c) of this section.
(b) For the quarter of the 2026-2027 fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2026, the
supplemental State administration subcomponent is zero. For the quarter of the 2026-2027 fiscal
year beginning on October 1, 2026, the supplemental State administration subcomponent is three
million three hundred thousand dollars ($3,300,000). For the quarter of the 2026-2027 fiscal year
beginning on January 1, 2207, the supplement State administration subcomponent is two million
three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,350,000). For the quarter of the 2026-27 fiscal year
Page 68 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
beginning on April 1,2027, the supplemental State administration subcomponent is three million,
three hundred thousand dollars ($3,300,000). For the 2027-2028 fiscal year, the quarterly
supplemental State administration subcomponent shall be three million three hundred thousand
dollars ($3,300,000) increased by a percentage that is the sum of each monthly percentage change
in the Consumer Price Index: All Urban Consumers for the most recent 12 months available on
March1 of the previous State fiscal year. For each subsequent State fiscal year through the 2035-
2036 State fiscal year, the supplemental State administration subcomponent shall be increased
over the prior year’s quarterly amount by a percentage that is the sum of each monthly percentage
change in the Consumer Price Index: All Urban Consumers for the most recent 12 months
available March 1 of the previous State fiscal year. For each State Fiscal year beginning on or
after July 1, 2036, the supplemental State administration subcomponent quarterly amount is zero.
(c) For each quarter of the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the supplemental county administration
component is seven million eight hundred thousand dollars ($7,800,000). For each subsequent
State fiscal year through the 2035-2036 State fiscal year, the supplemental county administration
subcomponent shall be increased over the prior year’s quarterly amount by a percentage that is
the sum of each monthly percentage change in the Consumer Price Index: All Urban Consumers
for the most recent 12 months available on March 1 of the previous State fiscal year. For each
State fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2036, the supplemental county administration
subcomponent quarterly amount is zero."

SECTION 9E.9.4.(c) G.S. 108A-147.3, as amended by Section 6.1(n) of S.L.
2025-64 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-147.3. Aggregate acute care hospital health advancement assessment collection
amount.
…
(b) The total nonfederal receipts for health advancement is an amount of money that is
calculated quarterly by adding all of the following:
(1) The presumptive service cost component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.5.
(2) The health advancement acute care hospital HASP component calculated
under G.S. 108A-147.6.
(2a) The health advancement freestanding psychiatric hospital HASP component
calculated under G.S. 108A-147.6A.
(3) The base administration component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.7.
(3a) The supplemental administration component calculated under G.S. 108A-
147.7A.
(4) The State retention component under G.S. 108A-147.9.
(5) The positive or negative health advancement reconciliation adjustment
component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.11(a).
…."
SECTION 9E.9.4.(d) G.S. 108A-147.9 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-147.9. Health advancement presumptive IGT adjustment component.
…
(b) The public hospital health advancement IGT adjustment subcomponent is the total of
the following amounts:
(1) Sixty percent (60%) of the public hospital share of the sum of the presumptive
service cost component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.5 for the current
quarter, the base administration component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.7
for the current quarter, the supplemental administration component calculated
under G.S. 108A-147.7A, and the State retention component under
G.S. 108A-147.8 for the current quarter. The public hospital share is the total
hospital costs for all public acute care hospitals divided by the total hospital
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 69

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
costs for all acute care hospitals except for critical access hospitals and rural
emergency hospitals for the current quarter.
…
(c) The UNC Health Care System health advancement IGT adjustment subcomponent is
the total of the following amounts:
(1) The UNC Health Care System share of the sum of the presumptive service
cost component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.5 for the current quarter
andquarter, the base administration component calculated under
G.S. 108A-147.7 for the current quarterquarter, and the supplemental
administration component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.7A for the current
quarter. The UNC Health Care System share is the total hospital costs for the
UNC Health Care System hospitals divided by the total hospital costs for all
acute care hospitals except for critical access hospitals and rural emergency
hospitals for the current quarter.
…
(d) The East Carolina University health advancement IGT adjustment subcomponent is
the total of the following amounts:
(1) The East Carolina University share of the sum of the presumptive service cost
component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.5 for the current quarter and
quarter, the administration component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.7 for
the current quarter, quarter, and the supplemental administration component
calculated under G.S. 108A-147.7A for the current quarter. The East Carolina
University share is the total hospital costs for the primary affiliated teaching
hospital for the East Carolina University Brody School of Medicine divided
by the total hospital costs for all acute care hospitals except for critical access
hospitals and rural emergency hospitals for the current quarter.
…."
SECTION 9E.9.4.(e) G.S. 108A-147.13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-147.13. Use of funds.
…
(b) The Department shall use an amount of the proceeds of the health advancement
assessments that is equal to the sum of the base county administration subcomponent of the
administration component in G.S. 108A-147.7 and the supplemental county administration
subcomponent of the supplemental administration component in G.S. 108A-147.7A to provide
funding to county departments of social services to support the counties in determining eligibility
for newly eligible individuals.
(c) The amount of the proceeds of the health advancement assessments that may be used
for administrative expenses attributable to providing Medicaid coverage to newly eligible
individuals and administrative expenditures associated with the HASP program shall not exceed,
for any State fiscal year, an amount equal to the sum of the base State administration
subcomponent of the base administration component in G.S. 108A-147.7 for each quarter of the
State fiscal year, the supplemental State administration subcomponent of the supplemental
administration component in G.S. 108A-147.7A for each quarter of the State fiscal year, and all
corresponding matching federal funds.funds corresponding to those subcomponents.
…."
SECTION 9E.9.4.(f) This section is effective July 1, 2026, and applies to
assessments imposed on or after that date.

ADMINISTRATIVE COST REPORTING AND RECONCILIATION
SECTION 9E.9.5. No later than October 1, 2029, the Department of Health and
Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), shall submit a report to the House of
Page 70 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Representatives Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Senate
Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Medicaid, and the Fiscal Research Division that includes all of the following:
(1) The estimated share of the actual administrative costs expended through June
30, 2029, by DHB that is attributable to compliance with the requirements
described in Section 9E.9 of this act.
(2) A description of any reduction to the administrative costs described in Section
9E.9 of this act resulting from (i) actions taken by DHB to achieve efficiencies
or (ii) decreases in enrollment in NC Health Works.
(3) The total amount of assessment receipts and intergovernmental transfer
receipts from April 1, 2026, through June 30, 2029, that are attributable to
G.S. 108A-147.7A or 9E.9.3. of this act.
(4) A proposal for crediting against future assessments owed under Article 7B of
Chapter 108A of the General Statutes any amounts under subdivision (3) of
this section that exceed the amount under subdivision (1) of this section.
(5) Any proposed legislative changes to ensure that hospital assessment and
intergovernmental transfer amounts attributable to G.S. 108A-147.7A do not
exceed the administrative costs expended to comply with the requirements
described in Section 9E.9 of this act, including any of the following:
a. Adjustments to the supplemental administration component in
G.S. 108A-147.7A.
b. Addition of a statutory annual reconciliation of any hospital
assessment and intergovernmental transfer amounts attributable to
G.S. 108A-147.7A in excess of actual administrative costs expended
to comply with the requirements described in Section 9E.9 of this act.

REPORTING ON CERTAIN CHANGES RESULTING IN REDUCTION IN
ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS
SECTION 9E.9.6.(a) If the Department of Health and Human Services, Division
of Health Benefits (DHB), determines that the requirements described in Section 9E.9 of this
act as applied to NC Health Works will be modified or eliminated due to a change in federal or
State law, rule, or regulation and the modification or elimination will reduce the administrative
costs described in Section 9E.9 of this act, then DHB shall submit a report on its determination
to the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the
Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Medicaid, and the Fiscal Research Division. This report shall be due 60
days after DHB identifies the anticipated modification or elimination and shall include all of the
following:
(1) An explanation of the anticipated modification or elimination.
(2) The date the modification or elimination is expected to be effective.
(3) A fiscal analysis of the anticipated reduction in administrative costs
attributable to the modification or elimination.
(4) A proposal for a decrease or elimination of the amounts included in the
assessments to hospitals under G.S. 108A-147.7A that corresponds to the
anticipated reduction in administrative costs.
SECTION 9E.9.6.(b) This section expires June 30, 2036.

END NEW HOSPITAL ASSESSMENT AMOUNTS UNDER CERTAIN CONDITIONS
SECTION 9E.9.7.(a) In developing the average commercial rate demonstration for
the Healthcare Access and Stabilization Program (HASP), the Department of Health and
Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), shall use the payment methodology or
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 71

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
approach that produces the maximum allowable level of HASP reimbursements to hospitals and
receives federal approval.
SECTION 9E.9.7.(b) DHB shall submit a report to the House of Representatives
Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations
Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Medicaid, and the Fiscal Research Division if DHB determines that any of the following
conditions have been met:
(1) Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) approved a HASP
preprint that is less than ninety-five percent (95%) of the maximum allowable
amount for HASP under federal law or regulation, calculated based on all of
the following:
a. Limits on state directed payments and provider taxes established under
P.L. 119-21.
b. Any federal laws or regulations related to state directed payments,
provider taxes, and intergovernmental transfers that are applicable to
the period for which the CMS approval is received.
(2) The gross HASP reimbursements to hospitals approved by CMS for a fiscal
year are less than one billion five hundred million dollars ($1,500,000,000).
(3) The gross HASP reimbursements paid to hospitals, calculated on an accrual
basis, for a fiscal year are less than one billion five hundred million dollars
($1,500,000,000).
(4) A change in federal law or regulation resulted in adjusted hospital
intergovernmental transfers, in any quarter, that were at least twenty percent
(20%) lower than the amount of base hospital intergovernmental transfers for
that quarter. For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:
a. Actual hospital intergovernmental transfers. – The sum of all
intergovernmental transfers designated in DHHS's accounting system
as either a receipt for health advancement or a receipt related to the
modernized assessments.
b. Adjusted hospital intergovernmental transfers. – The amount of the
base hospital intergovernmental transfers adjusted to account for any
new federal restrictions on intergovernmental transfers established
through federal law or regulation.
c. Base hospital intergovernmental transfers. – The sum of actual hospital
intergovernmental transfers collected during the quarter of fiscal
year 2025-2026 beginning on October 1, 2025, plus the amount of
hospital assessments under Article 7B of Chapter 108A of the
General Statutes collected in that quarter from public acute care
hospitals, adjusted for any changes in hospital status that occurred after
October 1, 2025.
d. Changes in hospital status. – As defined in G.S. 108A-146.17.
e. Public acute care hospital. – As defined in G.S. 108A-145.3.
SECTION 9E.9.7.(c) The report required by subsection (b) of this section is due 120
days after DHB's determination that one of the conditions has been met. Prior to submitting the
report, DHB shall allow at least 30 days for the North Carolina Healthcare Association to
review the determination and to provide written confirmation or disagreement with the
determination. Once a report required under subsection (b) of this section has been submitted,
DHB shall not be required to submit any further reports under subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 9E.9.7.(d) On the date DHB submits the report required by subsection
(b) of this section, DHB shall notify, in writing, the Revisor of Statutes that the report has
been submitted.
Page 72 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9E.9.7.(e) G.S. 108A-147.7A, as enacted by Section 9E.9.4.(b) reads
as rewritten:
"§ 108A-147.7A. Supplemental administration component.
(a) The supplemental administration component is an amount of money that is calculated
by adding the supplemental State administration subcomponent calculated under subsection (b)
of this section and the supplemental county administration subcomponent calculated under
subsection (c) of this section.
(b) For the quarter of the 2026-2027 fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2026, the
supplemental State administration subcomponent is zero. For the quarter of the 2026-2027 fiscal
year beginning on October 1, 2026, the supplemental State administration subcomponent is three
million three hundred thousand dollars ($3,300,000). For the quarter of the 2026-2027 fiscal year
beginning on January 1, 2027, the supplemental State administration subcomponent is two
million three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,350,000). For the quarter of the 2026-2027 fiscal
year beginning on April 1, 2027, the supplemental State administration subcomponent is three
million three hundred thousand dollars ($3,300,000). For each quarter of the 2027-2028 fiscal
year, the supplemental State administration subcomponent shall be three million three hundred
thousand dollars ($3,300,000) increased by a percentage that is the sum of each monthly
percentage change in the Consumer Price Index: All Urban Consumers for the most recent 12
months available on March 1 of the previous Sstate fiscal year. For each subsequent State fiscal
year through the 2035-2036 State fiscal year, the supplemental State administration
subcomponent shall be increased over the prior year’s quarterly amount by a perentage that is the
sum of each monthly percentage change in the Consumer Price Index: All Urban Consumers for
the most recent 12 months available on March 1 of the previous State fiscal year. For each State
fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2036, the The supplemental State administration
subcomponent quarterly amount is zero.
(c) For each quarter of the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the supplemental county administration
component is seven million eight hundred thousand dollars ($7,800,000). For each subsequent
State fiscal year through the 2035-2036 State fiscal year, the supplemental county administration
subcomponent shall be increased over the prior year’s quarterly amount by a percentage that is
the sum of each monthly percentage change in the Consumer Price Index: All Urban Consumers
for the most recent 12 months available on March 1 of the previous State fiscal year. For each
State fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2036, theThe supplemental county administration
subcomponent quarterly amount is zero."
SECTION 9E.9.7.(f) Section 9E.6 of this act is repealed.
SECTION 9E.9.7.(g) Subsections (e) and (f) of this section are effective on the
first day of the next assessment quarter that is two years after the date the report required by
subsection (b) of this section is submitted. Subsection (e) of this section applies to assessments
imposed on or after the date subsection (e) of this section becomes effective.
SECTION 9E.9.7.(h) This section expires on July 1, 2034, if no report required
by subsection (b) of this section has been submitted by that date.

REPORT ON OPTIONS FOR CONTINUED FUNDING AFTER JUNE 30, 2036
SECTION 9E.9.8. No later than October 1, 2031, the Department of Health and
Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), shall submit a report, in consultation with
relevant stakeholders, to the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Health and
Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the
Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid, and the Fiscal Research Division
outlining options for the continued funding of the increased administrative costs described in
Section 9E.9 of this act after June 30, 2036.

EFFECTIVE DATE
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 73

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9E.9.9. Except as otherwise provided in Sections 9E.9.1 through 9E.9.8
of this act, those sections of this act are effective when they become law.

PART IX-F. HEALTH SERVICES REGULATION

CONSTRUCTION SECTION PLAN REVIEW FEES REMAIN IN DHSR
SECTION 9F.1. G.S. 131E-267(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 131E-267. Fees for departmental review of licensed health care facility or Medical Care
Commission bond-financed construction projects.
(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall charge a fee for the review of
each health care facility construction project to ensure that project plans and construction are in
compliance with State law. The fee shall be charged on a one-time, per-project basis as provided
in this section. In no event shall a fee imposed under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000) for any single project. The first seven hundred twelve thousand six hundred
twenty-six dollars ($712,626) one million dollars ($1,000,000) in plan review fees collected
under this section shall remain in the Division of Health Service Regulation. Additional fees
collected shall be credited to the General Fund as nontax revenue and are intended to offset rather
than replace appropriations made for this purpose."

PART IX-G. MENTAL HEALTH/DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES/SUBSTANCE
USE SERVICES

SINGLE STREAM FUNDING FOR DMH/DD/SUS COMMUNITY SERVICES
SECTION 9G.1.(a) For the purpose of mitigating cash flow problems that many
local management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs) experience at the
beginning of each fiscal year relative to single stream funding, the Department of Health and
Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use
Services (DMH/DD/SUS), shall distribute not less than one-twelfth of each LME/MCO's base
budget allocation at the beginning of the fiscal year and subtract the amount of that distribution
from the LME/MCO's total reimbursements for the fiscal year. For each month of the fiscal year
after July, DMH/DD/SUS shall distribute, on the third working day of the month, one eleventh
of the amount of each LME/MCO's single stream allocation that remains after subtracting the
amount of the distribution that was made to the LME/MCO in July of the fiscal year.
SECTION 9G.1.(b) If, on or after June 1, 2027, the Office of State Budget
Management (OSBM) certifies a Medicaid budget surplus and sufficient case in Budget Code
14445 to meet total obligations for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, then DHB shall transfer to
DMH/DD/SUS funds not to exceed the amount of the certified surplus or thirty million dollars
($30,000,000), whichever is less, to be used for single stream funding.

LOCAL INPATIENT PSYCHIATRIC BEDS OR BED DAYS
SECTION 9G.2.(a) Use of Funds. – Funds appropriated in this act to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and
Substance Use Services, shall continue to be used for the purchase of local inpatient psychiatric
beds or bed days. The Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall continue to
implement a two-tiered system of payment for purchasing these local inpatient psychiatric beds
or bed days based on acuity level with an enhanced rate of payment for inpatient psychiatric beds
or bed days for individuals with higher acuity levels, as defined by DHHS. The enhanced rate of
payment for inpatient psychiatric beds or bed days for individuals with higher acuity levels shall
not exceed the lowest average cost per patient bed day among the State psychiatric hospitals. In
addition, at the discretion of the Secretary of Health and Human Services, existing funds allocated
to LME/MCOs for community-based mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance
Page 74 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
use disorder services may be used to purchase additional local inpatient psychiatric beds or bed
days. DHHS may allocate funding to the LME/MCOs for the purchase of facility-based crisis,
nonhospital detoxification services and peer respite services to support individuals that do not
meet the medical necessity for inpatient treatment and can be diverted from an inpatient hospital
stay.
SECTION 9G.2.(b) Distribution and Management of Beds or Bed Days. – DHHS
shall work to ensure that any local inpatient psychiatric beds or bed days purchased in accordance
with this section are utilized solely for individuals who are medically indigent, except that DHHS
may use up to forty percent (40%) of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and
Substance Use Services, for the purchase of local inpatient psychiatric beds, bed days to pay for
facility-based crisis services, non-hospital detoxification services, and peer respite services for
individuals in need of these services, regardless of whether the individuals are medically indigent.
For the purposes of this subsection, "medically indigent" shall mean uninsured persons who (i)
are financially unable to obtain private insurance coverage, as determined by DHHS and (ii) are
not eligible for government-funded health coverage such as Medicare or Medicaid.
In addition, DHHS shall work to ensure that any local inpatient psychiatric beds or
bed days purchased in accordance with this section are distributed across the State and according
to need, as determined by DHHS. DHHS shall ensure that beds or bed days for individuals with
higher acuity levels are distributed across the State and according to greatest need based on
hospital bed utilization data. DHHS shall enter into contracts with LME/MCOs and local
hospitals for the purchase and management of the local inpatient psychiatric beds or days and
allocate up to forty percent (40%) of the total funding to the LME/MCO’s for the purpose of
facility-based crisis services, nonhospital detoxification services, and peer respite services.
DHHS shall work to ensure that these contracts are awarded equitably around all regions of the
State. LME/MCOs shall manage and control these local inpatient psychiatric beds or bed days,
including the determination of the specific local hospital or State psychiatric hospital to which
an individual should be admitted pursuant to an involuntary commitment order.
SECTION 9G.2.(c) Funds to be Held in Statewide Reserve. – Funds appropriated in
this act to DHHS for the purchase of local inpatient psychiatric beds or bed days shall not be
allocated to LME/MCOs but shall be held in a statewide reserve at the Division of Mental Health,
Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services to pay for services authorized by the
LME/MCOs and billed by the hospitals through the LME/MCOs. LME/MCOs shall remit claims
for payment to DHHS within 15 working days after receipt of a clean claim from the hospital
and shall pay the hospital within 30 working days after receipt of payment from DHHS.
SECTION 9G.2.(d) Ineffective LME/MCO Management of Beds or Bed Days. – If
DHHS determines that (i) an LME/MCO is not effectively managing the beds or bed days for
which it has responsibility, as evidenced by beds or bed days in the local hospital not being
utilized while demand for services at the State psychiatric hospitals has not decreased, or (ii) the
LME/MCO has failed to comply with the prompt payment provisions of this section, DHHS may
contract with another LME/MCO to manage the beds or bed days or, notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, may pay the hospital directly.
SECTION 9G.2.(e) Reporting by LME/MCOs. – LME/MCOs shall be required to
report to DHHS regarding the utilization of these beds or bed days.
SECTION 9G.2.(f) Reporting by DHHS. – By no later than December 1, 2025, and
by no later than December 1, 2026, DHHS shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on all of the
following:
(1) A uniform system for beds or bed days purchased during the preceding fiscal
year from (i) existing State appropriations and (ii) local funds.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 75

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) An explanation of the process used by DHHS to ensure that, except as
otherwise provided in subsection (a) of this section, local inpatient psychiatric
beds or bed days purchased in accordance with this section are utilized solely
for individuals who are medically indigent, along with the number of
medically indigent individuals served by the purchase of these beds or bed
days.
(3) The amount of funds used to pay for facility-based crisis services, along with
the number of individuals who received these services and the outcomes for
each individual.
(4) The amount of funds used to pay for nonhospital detoxification services, along
with the number of individuals who received these services and the outcomes
for each individual.
(5) Other DHHS initiatives funded by State appropriations to reduce State
psychiatric hospital use.

PART IX-H. PUBLIC HEALTH

USE OF JUUL SETTLEMENT FUNDS
SECTION 9H.1.(a) There is appropriated from the Youth Electronic Nicotine
Dependence Abatement Fund created in Section 9G.10(a) of S.L. 2021-180 to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health (DPH), the sum of six million dollars
($6,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated and used as
follows:
(1) One million two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($1,250,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year shall be used to support data
monitoring to track tobacco/nicotine use and exposure among youth and
young adults and populations at risk; for independent evaluation of the reach,
effectiveness, and outcomes of the State's evidence based programs designed
to help youth addicted to nicotine through electronic cigarettes and other new
and emerging tobacco and nicotine products quit; and to prepare the report
required by subsection (f) of this section.
(2) One million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year shall be used for tobacco cessation media campaigns, resources,
and programs to help both youth and young adults who have become addicted
to nicotine using e-cigarettes and other tobacco/nicotine products quit.
(3) One million seven hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($1,750,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year shall be used for
evidence-based media and education campaigns to prevent initiation of
tobacco use, especially with respect to e-cigarettes and other new and
emerging tobacco/nicotine products.
(4) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year shall be used for staff and projects and systems to educate partners
and stakeholders about evidence-based approaches that help youth quit
tobacco/nicotine products and prevent initiation of tobacco/nicotine products.
SECTION 9H.1.(b) Funds allocated under subsections (a) and (b) of this section
shall remain available for expenditure in the amounts and for the purposes specified in those
sections until expended.
SECTION 9H.1.(c) Annually on November 1 the Department of Health and Human
Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services
and the Fiscal Research Division on the expenditures made from the Youth Electronic Nicotine
Page 76 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Dependence Abatement Fund during the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include at least
all of the following:
(1) An itemized list of expenditures and for each expenditure, an indication of the
authority under this section for the expenditure.
(2) An evaluation of the reach, effectiveness, and outcomes of each activity
funded pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section.
(3) An evaluation of the reach, effectiveness, and outcomes of each activity
funded by Section 9G.10 of S.L. 2021-180, as amended by Section 9G.3 of
S.L. 2022-74.

USE OF ELECTRIC TOBACCONIST SETTLEMENT FUNDS
SECTION 9H.2.(a) The Electric Tobacconist Fund (Fund) is created within the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, as a non-reverting special
fund. The Fund shall consist of (i) monies received by the State as a beneficiary of the final
consent judgment resolving the case, State of North Carolina, ex rel. Joshua H. Stein, Attorney
General v. The Electric Tobacconist, LLC, in the General Court of Justice, Superior Court
Division, Durham County (Electric Tobacconist Case) and (ii) all interest and investment
earnings received on monies in the Fund. Monies in the Fund shall be expended only by an act
of appropriation by the General Assembly and in accordance with the final consent judgment
resolving the Electric Tobacconist Case.
SECTION 9H.2.(b) There is appropriated from the Electric Tobacconist Fund
created in Section 9H.2.(a) to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public
Health (DPH), the sum of two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($275,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated and used as follows:
(1) Forty thousand seven hundred and fifty dollars ($40,750) shall be transferred
to the Department of Justice to cover the costs of litigation incurred by the
Office of the Attorney General with respect to the Electric Tobacconist case.
(2) Two hundred thirty-four thousand, two hundred and fifty dollars ($234,250)
shall be used for staff, projects and systems to educate partners and
stakeholders about evidence-based approaches that help youth quit
tobacco/nicotine products and prevent initiation of tobacco/nicotine products.
SECTION 9H.2.(c) Funds allocated under subsection (a) of this section shall remain
available for expenditure in the amounts and for the purposes specified in those sections until
expended.

USE OF BEARD VAPE SETTLEMENT FUNDS
SECTION 9H.3.(a) The Beard Vape Fund (Fund) is created within the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, as a non-reverting special fund. The
Fund shall consist of (i) monies received by the State as a beneficiary of the final consent
judgment resolving the case, State of North Carolina, ex rel. Joshua H. Stein, Attorney General
v. Beard Vape Co., LLC, in the General Court of Justice, Superior Court Division, Durham
County (Beard Vape Case) and (ii) all interest and investment earnings received on monies in the
Fund. Monies in the Fund shall be expended only by an act of appropriation by the General
Assembly and in accordance with the final consent judgment resolving the Beard Vape Case.
SECTION 9H.3.(b) There is appropriated from the Beard Vape Fund created in
Section XX.X(a) to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health
(DPH), the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated and used as follows:
(1) Four thousand seventy-five dollars ($4,075) shall be transferred to the
Department of Justice to cover the costs of litigation incurred by the Office of
the Attorney General with respect to the Beard Vape case.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 77

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Forty-five thousand and nine hundred twenty-five dollars ($20,925) shall be
used for staff, projects and systems to educate partners and stakeholders about
evidence-based approaches that help youth quit tobacco/nicotine products and
prevent initiation of tobacco/nicotine products.
SECTION 9H.3.(c) Funds allocated under subsection (a) of this section shall remain
available for expenditure in the amounts and for the purposes specified in those sections until
expended.

PART IX-I. SERVICES FOR THE BLIND/DEAF/HARD OF HEARING [RESERVED]

PART IX-J. SOCIAL SERVICES

TANF BENEFIT IMPLEMENTATION
SECTION 9J.1.(a) Beginning October 1, 2025, the General Assembly approves the
plan titled "North Carolina Temporary Assistance for Needy Families State Plan FFY
2026-2028," prepared by the Department of Health and Human Services and presented to the
General Assembly. The North Carolina Temporary Assistance for Needy Families State Plan
covers the period of October 1, 2025, through September 30, 2028. The Department shall submit
the State Plan, as revised in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, to the United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
SECTION 9J.1.(b) The counties approved as Electing Counties in the North
Carolina Temporary Assistance for Needy Families State Plan FFY 2026-2028, as approved by
this section, are Beaufort, Caldwell, Catawba, Lenoir, Lincoln, Macon, and Wilson.
SECTION 9J.1.(c) Counties that submitted the letter of intent to remain as an
Electing County or to be redesignated as an Electing County and the accompanying county plan
for years 2026 through 2028, pursuant to G.S. 108A-27(e), shall operate under the Electing
County budget requirements effective July 1, 2025. For programmatic purposes, all counties
referred to in this subsection shall remain under their current county designation through
September 30, 2028.
SECTION 9J.1.(d) For each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, Electing
Counties shall be held harmless to their Work First Family Assistance allocations for the 2024-
2025 fiscal year, provided that remaining funds allocated for Work First Family Assistance and
Work First Diversion Assistance are sufficient for payments made by the Department on behalf
of Standard Counties pursuant to G.S. 108A-27.11(b).
SECTION 9J.1.(e) In the event that departmental projections of Work First Family
Assistance and Work First Diversion Assistance for the 2025-2026 fiscal year or the 2026-2027
fiscal year indicate that remaining funds are insufficient for Work First Family Assistance and
Work First Diversion Assistance payments to be made on behalf of Standard Counties, the
Department is authorized to deallocate funds, of those allocated to Electing Counties for Work
First Family Assistance in excess of the sums set forth in G.S. 108A-27.11, up to the requisite
amount for payments in Standard Counties. Prior to deallocation, the Department shall obtain
approval by the Office of State Budget and Management. If the Department adjusts the allocation
set forth in subsection (d) of this section, then a report shall be made to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division.

INTENSIVE FAMILY PRESERVATION SERVICES FUNDING, PERFORMANCE
ENHANCEMENTS, AND REPORT
SECTION 9J.2.(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 143B-150.6, the
Intensive Family Preservation Services (IFPS) Program shall provide intensive services to
children and families in cases of abuse, neglect, and dependency where a child is at imminent
risk of removal from the home and to children and families in cases of abuse where a child is not
Page 78 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
at imminent risk of removal. The Program shall be implemented statewide on a regional basis.
The IFPS shall ensure the application of standardized assessment criteria for determining
imminent risk and clear criteria for determining out-of-home placement.
SECTION 9J.2.(b) The Department of Health and Human Services shall require that
any program or entity that receives State, federal, or other funding for the purpose of IFPS shall
provide information and data that allows for the following:
(1) An established follow-up system with a minimum of six months of follow-up
services.
(2) Detailed information on the specific interventions applied, including
utilization indicators and performance measurement.
(3) Cost-benefit data.
(4) Data on long-term benefits associated with IFPS. This data shall be obtained
by tracking families through the intervention process.
(5) The number of families remaining intact and the associated interventions
while in IFPS and 12 months thereafter.
(6) The number and percentage, by race, of children who received IFPS compared
to the ratio of their distribution in the general population involved with Child
Protective Services.
SECTION 9J.2.(c) The Department shall continue implementing a
performance-based funding protocol and shall only provide funding to those programs and
entities providing the required information specified in subsection (b) of this section. The amount
of funding shall be based on the individual performance of each program.
SECTION 9J.2.(d) The Department shall submit an annual report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division by December 1 of each year that provides the information and data collected pursuant
to subsection (b) of this section.

CHILD CARING INSTITUTIONS
SECTION 9J.3. Until the Social Services Commission adopts rules setting
standardized rates for child caring institutions as authorized under G.S. 143B-153(8), the
maximum reimbursement for child caring institutions shall not exceed the rate established for the
specific child caring institution by the Department of Health and Human Services, Office of the
Controller. In determining the maximum reimbursement, the State shall include county and IV-E
reimbursements.

USE FOSTER CARE BUDGET FOR GUARDIANSHIP ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
SECTION 9J.4. Of the funds available for the provision of foster care services, the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, may continue to provide
for the financial support of children who are deemed to be (i) in a permanent family placement
setting, (ii) eligible for legal guardianship, and (iii) otherwise unlikely to receive permanency.
No additional expenses shall be incurred beyond the funds budgeted for foster care for the
Guardianship Assistance Program (GAP). The Guardianship Assistance Program shall include
provisions for extending guardianship services for individuals and youth who exited foster care
through the Guardianship Assistance Program after 14 years of age or who have attained the age
of 18 years and opt to continue to receive guardianship services until reaching 21 years of age if
the individual is (i) completing secondary education or a program leading to an equivalent
credential, (ii) enrolled in an institution that provides postsecondary or vocational education, (iii)
participating in a program or activity designed to promote, or remove barriers to, employment,
(iv) employed for at least 80 hours per month, or (v) incapable of completing the educational or
employment requirements of this section due to a medical condition or disability. The
Guardianship Assistance Program rates shall reimburse the legal guardian for room and board
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 79

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and be set at the same rate as the foster care room and board rates in accordance with rates
established under G.S. 108A-49.1.

CHILD WELFARE POSTSECONDARY SUPPORT PROGRAM (NC REACH)
SECTION 9J.5.(a) Funds appropriated in this act from the General Fund to the
Department of Health and Human Services for the child welfare postsecondary support program
shall be used to continue providing assistance with the "cost of attendance" as that term is defined
in 20 U.S.C. § 1087ll for the educational needs of foster youth aging out of the foster care system,
youth who exit foster care to a permanent home through the Guardianship Assistance Program
(GAP), or special needs children adopted from foster care after age 12. These funds shall be
allocated by the State Education Assistance Authority.
SECTION 9J.5.(b) Of the funds appropriated in this act from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for
each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be allocated to the North Carolina State
Education Assistance Authority (SEAA). The SEAA shall use these funds only to perform
administrative functions necessary to manage and distribute scholarship funds under the child
welfare postsecondary support program.
SECTION 9J.5.(c) Of the funds appropriated in this act from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, the sum of three hundred thirty-nine thousand
four hundred ninety-three dollars ($339,493) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall
be used to contract with an entity to administer the child welfare postsecondary support program
described under subsection (a) of this section, which administration shall include the performance
of case management services.
SECTION 9J.5.(d) Funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and
Human Services for the child welfare postsecondary support program shall be used only for
students attending public institutions of higher education in this State.

FEDERAL CHILD SUPPORT INCENTIVE PAYMENTS
SECTION 9J.6.(a) Centralized Services. – The North Carolina Child Support
Services Section (NCCSS) of the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social
Services, shall retain up to fifteen percent (15%) of the annual federal incentive payments it
receives from the federal government to enhance centralized child support services. To
accomplish this requirement, NCCSS shall do the following:
(1) In consultation with representatives from county child support services
programs, identify how federal incentive funding could improve centralized
services.
(2) Use federal incentive funds to improve the effectiveness of the State's
centralized child support services by supplementing and not supplanting State
expenditures for those services.
(3) Continue to develop and implement rules that explain the State process for
calculating and distributing federal incentive funding to county child support
services programs.
SECTION 9J.6.(b) County Child Support Services Programs. – NCCSS shall
allocate no less than eighty-five percent (85%) of the annual federal incentive payments it
receives from the federal government to county child support services programs to improve
effectiveness and efficiency using the federal performance measures. To that end, NCCSS shall
do the following:
(1) In consultation with representatives from county child support services
programs, examine the current methodology for distributing federal incentive
funding to the county programs and determine whether an alternative formula
Page 80 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
would be appropriate. NCCSS shall use its current formula for distributing
federal incentive funding until an alternative formula is adopted.
(2) Upon adopting an alternative formula, develop a process to phase in the
alternative formula for distributing federal incentive funding over a four-year
period.
SECTION 9J.6.(c) Reporting by County Child Support Services Programs. –
NCCSS shall continue implementing guidelines that identify appropriate uses for federal
incentive funding. To ensure those guidelines are properly followed, NCCSS shall require county
child support services programs to comply with each of the following:
(1) Submit an annual plan describing how federal incentive funding would
improve program effectiveness and efficiency as a condition of receiving
federal incentive funding.
(2) Report annually on the following: (i) how federal incentive funding has
improved program effectiveness and efficiency and been reinvested into their
programs, (ii) provide documentation that the funds were spent according to
their annual plans, and (iii) explain any deviations from their plans.
SECTION 9J.6.(d) Reporting by NCCSS. – NCCSS shall submit a report on federal
child support incentive funding to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and
Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division by November 1 of each year. The report shall
describe how federal incentive funds enhanced centralized child support services to benefit
county child support services programs and improved the effectiveness and efficiency of county
child support services programs. The report shall further include any changes to the State process
that NCCSS used in calculating and distributing federal incentive funding to county child support
services programs and any recommendations for further changes.

SUCCESSFUL TRANSITION/FOSTER CARE YOUTH
SECTION 9J.7. The Foster Care Transitional Living Initiative Fund shall continue
to fund and support transitional living services that demonstrate positive outcomes for youth,
attract significant private sector funding, and lead to the development of evidence-based
programs to serve the at-risk population described in this section. The Fund shall continue to
support a demonstration project with services provided by Youth Villages to (i) improve
outcomes for youth ages 17-21 years who transition from foster care through implementation of
outcome-based Transitional Living Services, (ii) identify cost-savings in social services and
juvenile and adult correction services associated with the provision of Transitional Living
Services to youth aging out of foster care, and (iii) take necessary steps to establish an
evidence-based transitional living program available to all youth aging out of foster care. In
continuing to implement these goals, the Foster Care Transitional Living Initiative Fund shall
support the following strategies:
(1) Transitional Living Services, which is an outcome-based program that follows
the Youth Villages Transitional Living Model. Outcomes on more than 7,000
participants have been tracked since the program's inception. The program has
been evaluated through an independent randomized controlled trial. Results
indicate that the Youth Villages Transitional Living Model had positive
impacts in a variety of areas, including housing stability, earnings, economic
hardship, mental health, and intimate partner violence in comparison to the
control population.
(2) Public-Private Partnership, which is a commitment by private-sector funding
partners to match at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds appropriated
to the Foster Care Transitional Living Initiative Fund for the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium for the purposes of providing Transitional Living Services through
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 81

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the Youth Villages Transitional Living Model to youth aging out of foster
care.
(3) Impact Measurement and Evaluation, which are services funded through
private partners to provide independent measurement and evaluation of the
impact the Youth Villages Transitional Living Model has on the youth served,
the foster care system, and on other programs and services provided by the
State which are utilized by former foster care youth.
(4) Advancement of Evidence-Based Process, which is the implementation and
ongoing evaluation of the Youth Villages Transitional Living Model for the
purposes of establishing the first evidence-based transitional living program
in the nation. To establish the evidence-based program, additional randomized
controlled trials may be conducted to advance the model.

PART IX-K. DIVISION OF EMPLOYMENT AND INDEPENDENCE FOR PEOPLE
WITH DISABILITIES [RESERVED]

PART IX-L. DHHS BLOCK GRANTS

DHHS BLOCK GRANTS
SECTION 9L.1.(a) Except as otherwise provided, appropriations from federal Block
Grant funds are made for each year of the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2027, according to the
following schedule:

TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
FAMILIES (TANF) FUNDS

Local Program Expenditures

Division of Social Services

01. Work First Family Assistance $23,259,794 $23,259,794

02. Work First County Block Grants 80,093,566 80,093,566

03. Work First Electing Counties 2,378,213 2,378,213

04. Adoption Services – Special Children
Adoption Fund 4,001,676 4,001,676

05. Child Protective Services – Child Welfare
Workers for Local DSS 11,387,190 11,387,190

06. Child Welfare Program Improvement Plan 775,176 775,176

07. Child Welfare Collaborative 400,000 400,000

08. Child Welfare Initiatives 1,400,000 2,900,000

Division of Child Development and Early Education

09. Subsidized Child Care Program 67,913,694 67,913,694
Page 82 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

10. Swap-Child Care Subsidy 0 0

11. NC Pre-K Services 68,300,000 68,300,000

Division of Public Health

12. Teen Pregnancy Prevention Initiatives 3,538,541 3,538,541

DHHS Administration

13. Division of Social Services 2,478,284 2,478,284

14. Division of Child and Family Well Being 3,976 3,976

15. Office of the Secretary 34,042 34,042

16. Eligibility Systems – Operations and
Maintenance 431,733 431,733

17. NC FAST Implementation 428,239 428,239

18. Division of Social Services – Workforce
Innovation & Opportunity Act (WIOA) 93,216 93,216

19. Division of Social Services TANF Modernization 2,000,000 2,000,000

Transfers to Other Block Grants

Division of Child Development and Early Education

20. Transfer to the Child Care and
Development Fund 21,773,001 21,773,001

Division of Social Services

21. Transfer to Social Services Block
Grant for Child Protective Services –
Training 285,612 2,285,612

22. Transfer to Social Services Block
Grant for Child Protective Services 5,040,000 5,040,000

23. Transfer to Social Services Block
Grant for County Departments of
Social Services for Children's Services 13,166,244 22,413,218

24. Transfer to Social Services Block
Grant – Foster Care Services 3,422,219 3,422,219

25. Transfer to Social Services Block
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 83

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Grant – Child Advocacy Centers 1,582,000 1,582,000

26. Transfer to Social Services Block
Grant – Adult Protective Services 0 5,000,000

TOTAL TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR
NEEDY FAMILIES (TANF) FUNDS $314,186,416 $331,933,390

TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES (TANF)
EMERGENCY CONTINGENCY FUNDS

Local Program Expenditures

Division of Child Development and Early Education

01. Subsidized Child Care 34,337,395 34,337,395

TOTAL TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR
NEEDY FAMILIES (TANF) EMERGENCY
CONTINGENCY FUNDS $34,337,395 $34,337,395

SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT

Local Program Expenditures

Divisions of Social Services and Aging and Adult Services

01. County Departments of Social Services 19,837,388 19,837,388

02. County Departments of Social Services
(Transfer From TANF) 13,166,244 22,413,218

03. EBCI Tribal Public Health and Human Services 244,740 244,740

04. Child Protective Services
(Transfer From TANF) 5,040,000 5,040,000

05. State In-Home Services Fund 1,943,950 1,943,950

06. Adult Protective Services 3,864,547 3,820,378

07. Adult Protective Services
(Transfer from TANF) 0 5,000,000

08. State Adult Day Care Fund 1,994,084 1,994,084

09. Child Protective Services/CPS
Investigative Services – Child Medical
Evaluation Program 901,868 901,868

10. Special Children Adoption Incentive Fund 462,600 462,600
Page 84 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

11. Child Protective Services – Child
Welfare Training for Counties
(Transfer From TANF) 285,612 2,285,612

12. Home and Community Care Block
Grant (HCCBG) 2,696,888 2,696,888

13. Child Advocacy Centers
(Transfer from TANF $1,582,000) 1,582,000 1,582,000

14. Guardianship – Division of Social Services 1,802,671 1,802,671

15. Foster Care Services
(Transfer From TANF) 3,422,219 3,422,219

15A. Big Brothers Big Sisters of the Triangle, Inc. 350,000 350,000

Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services

16. Mental Health Services – Adult and
Child/Developmental Disabilities Program/
Substance Abuse Services – Adult 4,149,595 4,149,595

16A. Autism Society of North Carolina, Inc. 2,541,392 2,541,392

16B. The Arc of North Carolina, Inc. 271,074 271,074

16C. Easterseals UCP North Carolina & Virginia, Inc. 1,612,059 1,612,059

DHHS Program Expenditures

Division of Services for the Blind

17. Independent Living Program & Program Oversight 4,237,849 4,237,849

Division of Health Service Regulation

18. Adult Care Licensure Program 891,520 1,209,402

19. Mental Health Licensure and
Certification Program 266,158 266,158

Division of Social Services

20. Guardianship 3,825,443 3,825,443

DHHS Administration

21. Division of Aging and Adult Services 188,787 188,787

Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 85

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
22. Division of Social Services 1,724,551 1,724,551

23. Office of the Secretary/Controller's Office 673,990 673,990

24. Legislative Increases/Fringe Benefits 293,655 587,310

25. Division of Child Development and
Early Education 13,878 13,878

26. Division of Mental Health, Developmental
Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services 29,966 29,966

27. Division of Health Service Regulation 592,882 275,000

TOTAL SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT $78,907,610 $95,404,070

LOW-INCOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE BLOCK GRANT

Local Program Expenditures

Division of Social Services

01. Low-Income Energy Assistance
Program (LIEAP) 56,369,281 62,655,888

02. Crisis Intervention Program (CIP) 44,804,354 48,995,425

Local Administration

Division of Social Services

03. County DSS Administration 8,037,889 8,037,889

DHHS Administration

Division of Central Management and Support

04. Administration 10,000 10,000

05. Energy Portal (FIS Transaction Fees) 25,000 25,000

06. Office of the Secretary/ Division of Information Resource
Management (DIRM) (Accountable Results for
Community Action (AR4CA) Replacement System) 166,750 166,750

07. Office of the Secretary/DIRM 278,954 278,954

08. Office of the Secretary/Controller's Office 18,378 18,378

09. NC FAST Development 627,869 627,869

Page 86 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
10. NC FAST Operations and Maintenance 1,330,323 1,330,323

Transfers to Other State Agencies

Department of Environmental Quality

11. Weatherization Program 10,356,943 10,356,943

12. Heating Air Repair and Replacement
Program (HARRP) 5,898,508 5,898,508

13. Local Residential Energy Efficiency Service
Providers – Weatherization 574,945 574,945

14. Local Residential Energy Efficiency Service
Providers – HARRP 319,414 319,414

15. DEQ – Weatherization Administration 628,180 628,180

16. DEQ – HARRP Administration 393,944 393,944

Department of Administration

17. N.C. Commission on Indian Affairs 87,736 87,736

TOTAL LOW-INCOME ENERGY
ASSISTANCE BLOCK GRANT $129,928,468 $140,406,146

CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT FUND BLOCK GRANT

Local Program Expenditures

Division of Child Development and Early Education

01. Child Care Services 347,089,929 387,089,929

02. Smart Start Subsidy 7,392,654 7,392,654

03. Transfer from TANF Block Grant
for Child Care Subsidies 21,773,001 21,773,001

04. Quality and Availability Initiatives
(TEACH Program $3,800,000) 77,480,526 67,780,527

DHHS Administration

Division of Child Development and Early Education

05. DCDEE Administrative Expenses 9,710,886 12,710,886

06. Indirect Cost 7,346 7,346
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 87

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

Division of Social Services

07. Direct Deposit for Child Care Payments 5,000 5,000

08. Local Subsidized Child Care
Services Support 18,780,355 18,780,355

Division of Central Management and Support

09. NC FAST Operations and Maintenance 1,450,316 1,450,316

10. DHHS Central Administration – DIRM
Technical Services 1,029,762 1,029,762

11. DHHS Central Administration 118,000 118,000

Division of Child and Family Well-Being

12. Child Care Health Consultation Contracts 62,205 62,205

TOTAL CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT
FUND BLOCK GRANT $484,899,980 $518,199,981

MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT

Local Program Expenditures

01. Mental Health Services – Child 2,477,666 2,477,666

02. Mental Health Services – Adult/Child 19,443,833 22,815,152

03. Mental Health Services – First
Psychotic Symptom Treatment 4,208,378 4,208,378

04. Child Behavioral Health (Division of Child
and Family Well-Being) 5,246,350 5,246,350

DHHS Administration

Division of Child and Family Well Being

05. Administration 140,000 140,000

Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services

06. Crisis Services 2,377,047 7,377,047

07. Administration 332,351 332,351

08. Adult/Child Mental Health Services 350,150 375,150
Page 88 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

Division of Public Health

09. NC Detect – Behavioral Health ER 35,000 35,000

TOTAL MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
BLOCK GRANT $34,610,775 $43,007,094

SUBSTANCE ABUSE PREVENTION, TREATMENT, AND RECOVERY SERVICES
BLOCK GRANT

Local Program Expenditures

Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services

01. Substance Abuse – IV Drug 2,000,000 2,000,000

02. Substance Abuse Prevention 13,351,864 13,351,864

03. Substance Use Services – Treatment for
Children/Adults 40,038,949 50,696,855

04. Crisis Solutions Initiatives – Collegiate
Wellness/Addiction Recovery 1,545,205 6,545,205

05. Veterans Initiatives 250,000 10,000,000

DHHS Administration

Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services

06. Administration $2,297,852 $2,617,280

07. Controlled Substance Reporting System
Enhancement 675,000 675,000

TOTAL SUBSTANCE ABUSE PREVENTION
AND TREATMENT BLOCK GRANT $60,158,870 $85,886,204

MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT

Local Program Expenditures

Division of Child and Family Well-Being

01. Children’s Health Services 11,646,618 11,572,418

Division of Public Health

02. Women’s and Children’s Health Services 5,453,930 5,453,930

Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 89

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
03. Oral Health 58,413 60,523

04. Evidence-Based Programs in Counties
With Highest Infant Mortality Rates 1,727,307 1,727,307

DHHS Program Expenditures

05. Children's Health Services 1,287,619 1,287,619

06. Women's Health – Maternal Health 489,568 489,568

07. Women's and Children's Health – Perinatal
Strategic Plan Support Position 81,112 84,067

08. State Center for Health Statistics 158,583 158,583

09. Health Promotion – Injury and
Violence Prevention 87,271 87,271

DHHS Administration

11. Division of Public Health Administration 340,646 340,646

12. Division of Child and Family Well Being
Administration 211,925 211,925

TOTAL MATERNAL AND CHILD
HEALTH BLOCK GRANT $21,542,992 $21,963,519

PREVENTIVE HEALTH AND HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT

Local Program Expenditures

01. Physical Activity and Prevention $3,081,442 $3,081,442

DHHS Program Expenditures

Division of Public Health

02. HIV/STD Prevention and
Community Planning 135,063 135,063

03. Oral Health Preventive Services 150,000 150,000

04. Injury and Violence Prevention
(Services to Rape Victims – Set-Aside) 217,935 217,935

05. Performance Improvement and
Accountability 1,384,421 1,199,557

06. State Center for Health Statistics 48,000 48,000
Page 90 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

DHHS Administration

Division of Public Health

07. Division of Public Health 65,000 65,000

TOTAL PREVENTIVE HEALTH AND HEALTH
SERVICES BLOCK GRANT $5,081,861 $4,896,997

COMMUNITY SERVICES BLOCK GRANT

01. Community Action Agencies 22,370,334 23,286,497

02. Limited Purpose Agencies/Discretionary Funding 504,718 541,000

03. Office of Economic Opportunity 1,070,001 1,015,712

04. Office of the Secretary/DIRM (Accountable Results for
Community Action (AR4CA) Replacement System) 394,964 414,713

05. Office of Economic Opportunity – Workforce
Investment Opportunities Act (WIOA) 60,000 60,000

TOTAL COMMUNITY SERVICES
BLOCK GRANT $24,400,017 $25,317,922

GENERAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 9L.1.(b) Information to be Included in Block Grant Plans. – The
Department of Health and Human Services shall submit a separate plan for each Block Grant
received and administered by the Department, and each plan shall include the following:
(1) A delineation of the proposed allocations by program or activity, including
State and federal match requirements.
(2) A delineation of the proposed State and local administrative expenditures.
(3) An identification of all new positions to be established through the Block
Grant, including permanent, temporary, and time-limited positions.
(4) A comparison of the proposed allocations by program or activity with two
prior years' program and activity budgets and two prior years' actual program
or activity expenditures.
(5) A projection of current year expenditures by program or activity.
(6) A projection of federal Block Grant funds available, including unspent federal
funds from the current and prior fiscal years.
(7) The required amount of maintenance of effort and the amount of funds
qualifying for maintenance of effort in the previous year delineated by
program or activity.
SECTION 9L.1.(c) Changes in Federal Fund Availability. – If the Congress of the
United States increases the federal fund availability for any of the Block Grants or contingency
funds and other grants related to existing Block Grants administered by the Department of Health
and Human Services from the amounts appropriated in this act, the Department shall allocate the
increase proportionally across the program and activity appropriations identified for that Block
Grant in this section. In allocating an increase in federal fund availability, the Office of State
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 91

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Budget and Management shall not approve funding for new programs or activities not
appropriated in this act.
If the Congress of the United States decreases the federal fund availability for any of
the Block Grants or contingency funds and other grants related to existing Block Grants
administered by the Department of Health and Human Services from the amounts appropriated
in this act, the Department shall develop a plan to adjust the Block Grants based on reduced
federal funding.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, for fiscal years 2025-2026 and
2026-2027, increases in the federal fund availability for the Temporary Assistance to Needy
Families (TANF) Block Grant shall be used only for the North Carolina Child Care Subsidy
program to pay for child care and shall not be used to supplant State funds.
Prior to allocating the change in federal fund availability, the proposed allocation
must be approved by the Office of State Budget and Management. If the Department adjusts the
allocation of any Block Grant due to changes in federal fund availability, then a report shall be
made to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal
Research Division.
SECTION 9L.1.(d) Except as otherwise provided, appropriations from federal
Block Grant funds are made for each year of the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2027, according
to the schedule enacted for State fiscal years 2025-2026 and 2026-2027, or until a new schedule
is enacted by the General Assembly.
SECTION 9L.1.(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e1) of this section,
all changes to the budgeted allocations to the Block Grants or contingency funds and other grants
related to existing Block Grants administered by the Department of Health and Human Services
that are not specifically addressed in this section shall be approved by the Office of State Budget
and Management. The Office of State Budget and Management shall not approve. funding for
new programs or activities not appropriated in this section The Office of State Budget and
Management shall consult with the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human
Services for review prior to implementing any changes. In consulting, the report shall include an
itemized listing of affected programs, including associated changes in budgeted allocations. All
changes to the budgeted allocations to the Block Grants shall be reported immediately to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division. This subsection does not apply to Block Grant changes caused by legislative salary
increases and benefit adjustments.
SECTION 9L.1.(e) The Department of Health and Human Services shall have the
authority to realign appropriated funds under subsection (a) of this section for Item 01 or 02 in
the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant to maintain federal compliance and programmatic
alignment, so long as the realignment does not result in a reduction of funds designated for
subrecipients under subsection (a) of this section. The Department of Health and Human Services
is authorized to realign appropriated funds between the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant
categories as provided in this subsection without prior consultation with the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services or without exceeding the total amount
appropriated for the items.
SECTION 9L.1.(f) Except as otherwise provided, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall have flexibility to transfer funding between the Temporary Assistance for
Needy Families (TANF) Block Grant and the TANF Emergency Contingency Funds Block Grant
so long as the total allocation for the line items within those Block Grants remains the same.

TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES (TANF) FUNDS
SECTION 9L.1.(g) The sum of eighty million ninety-three thousand five hundred
sixty-six dollars ($80,093,566) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium appropriated in
this act in TANF funds to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social
Page 92 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Services, shall be used for Work First County Block Grants. The Division shall certify these
funds in the appropriate State-level services based on prior year actual expenditures. The Division
has the authority to realign the authorized budget for these funds among the State-level services
based on current year actual expenditures. The Division shall also have the authority to realign
appropriated funds from Work First Family Assistance for electing counties to the Work First
County Block Grant for electing counties based on current year expenditures so long as the
electing counties meet Maintenance of Effort requirements.
SECTION 9L.1.(h) The sum of eleven million three hundred eighty-seven thousand
one hundred ninety dollars ($11,387,190) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium
appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social
Services, in TANF funds for child welfare improvements shall be allocated to the county
departments of social services for hiring or contracting staff to investigate and provide services
in Child Protective Services cases; to provide foster care and support services; to recruit, train,
license, and support prospective foster and adoptive families; and to provide interstate and
post-adoption services for eligible families.
Counties shall maintain their level of expenditures in local funds for Child Protective
Services workers. Of the Block Grant funds appropriated for Child Protective Services workers,
the total expenditures from State and local funds for fiscal years 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 shall
not be less than the total expended from State and local funds for the 2012-2013 fiscal year.
SECTION 9L.1.(i) The sum of four million one thousand six hundred seventy-six
dollars ($4,001,676) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium appropriated in this act in
TANF funds to the Department of Health and Human Services, Special Children Adoption Fund,
shall be used in accordance with G.S. 108A-50.2. The Division of Social Services, in consultation
with the North Carolina Association of County Directors of Social Services and representatives
of licensed private adoption agencies, shall develop guidelines for the awarding of funds to
licensed public and private adoption agencies upon the adoption of children described in
G.S. 108A-50 and in foster care. Payments received from the Special Children Adoption Fund
by participating agencies shall be used exclusively to enhance the adoption services program. No
local match shall be required as a condition for receipt of these funds.
SECTION 9L.1.(j) The sum of one million four hundred thousand ($1,400,000) in
for the 2025-26 fiscal year and two million nine hundred thousand dollars ($2,900,000) for the
2026-27 fiscal year appropriated in this act in TANF funds to the Department of Health and
Human Services, Division of Social Services, shall be used for child welfare initiatives to (i)
enhance the skills of social workers to improve the outcomes for families and children involved
in child welfare and (ii) enhance the provision of services to families in their homes in the least
restrictive setting.

SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT
SECTION 9L.1.(k) The sum of nineteen million eight hundred thirty-seven
thousand three hundred eighty-eight dollars ($19,837,388) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the
sum of nineteen million eight hundred thirty-seven thousand three hundred eighty-eight dollars
($19,837,388) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year appropriated in this act in the Social Services Block
Grant to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, and the sum
of thirteen million one hundred sixty-six thousand two forty-four dollars ($13,166,244) for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of twenty-two million four hundred thirteen thousand two
hundred eighteen dollars ($22,413,218) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year transferred from funds
appropriated in the TANF Block Grant shall be used for county Block Grants. The Division shall
certify these funds in the appropriate State-level services based on prior year actual expenditures.
The Division has the authority to realign the authorized budget for these funds, as well as State
Social Services Block Grant funds, among the State-level services based on current year actual
expenditures.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 93

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9L.1.(l) The sum of two hundred eighty-five thousand six hundred twelve
dollars ($285,612) for the 2025-26 fiscal year and the sum of two million two hundred eighty-five
six hundred twelve dollars ($2,285,612) for the 2026-27 fiscal year appropriated in this act in the
Social Services Block Grant to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social
Services, shall be used to support the state’s child welfare training system. Training is delivered
to county child welfare staff that addresses the knowledge and skills needed to complete their
daily tasks in the areas of child protective services, foster care, on-going child welfare services,
and adoption.
SECTION 9L.1.(m) The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized,
subject to the approval of the Office of State Budget and Management, to transfer Social Services
Block Grant funding allocated for departmental administration between divisions that have
received administrative allocations from the Social Services Block Grant.
SECTION 9L.1.(n) Social Services Block Grant funds appropriated for the Special
Children Adoption Incentive Fund shall require a fifty percent (50%) local match.
SECTION 9L.1.(o) The sum of five million forty thousand dollars ($5,040,000)
appropriated in this act in the Social Services Block Grant for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027
fiscal biennium transferred from funds appropriated in the TANF Block Grant shall be allocated
to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services. The Division shall
allocate these funds to local departments of social services to replace the loss of Child Protective
Services State funds that are currently used by county governments to pay for Child Protective
Services staff at the local level. These funds shall be used to maintain the number of Child
Protective Services workers throughout the State. These Social Services Block Grant funds shall
be used to pay for salaries and related expenses only and are exempt from 10A NCAC 71R
.0201(3) requiring a local match of twenty-five percent (25%).
SECTION 9L.1.(p) The sum of one million five hundred eighty-two thousand
dollars ($1,582,000) appropriated in this act in the Social Services Block Grant for each fiscal
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division
of Social Services, shall be used to continue support for the Child Advocacy Centers. These funds
are exempt from the provisions of 10A NCAC 71R .0201(3).
SECTION 9L.1.(q) The sum of three million eight hundred twenty-five thousand
four hundred forty-three dollars ($3,825,443) for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium appropriated in this act in the Social Services Block Grant to the Department of Health
and Human Services, Division of Social Services, shall be used for guardianship services
pursuant to Chapter 35A of the General Statutes. The Department may expend funds allocated in
this section to support existing corporate guardianship contracts during the 2025-2026 and
2026-2027 fiscal years.
SECTION 9L.1.(r) Of the three million eight hundred sixty-four thousand five
hundred forty-seven dollars ($3,864,547) in the 2025-2026 fiscal year and three million eight
hundred twenty-two three hundred seventy-eight dollars ($3,820,378) for the 2026-2027 fiscal
year appropriated in this act in the Social Services Block Grant to the Division of Aging and
Adult Services for Adult Protective Services, the sum of eight hundred ninety-three thousand
forty-one dollars ($893,041) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be used to
increase the number of Adult Protective Services workers where these funds can be the most
effective. These funds shall be used to pay for salaries and related expenses and shall not be used
to supplant any other source of funding for staff. These funds are also exempt from 10A NCAC
71R .0201(3) requiring a local match of twenty-five percent (25%).
SECTION 9L.1.(s) The following amounts appropriated in this act in the Social Services
Block Grant for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to the Department of Health
and Human Services, Division of Social Services or Division of Mental Health, Developmental
Disabilities, and Substance Use Services, for the nonprofit organizations described in this
subsection shall be exempt from the provisions of 10A NCAC 71R .0201(3):
Page 94 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The sum of three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) for each fiscal
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for Big Brothers Big Sisters of the
Triangle, Inc.
(2) The sum of two million five hundred forty-one thousand three hundred
ninety-two dollars ($2,541,392) for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium for Autism Society of North Carolina, Inc.
(3) The sum of two hundred seventy-one thousand seventy-four dollars
($271,074) for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for The Arc
of North Carolina, Inc.
(4) The sum of one million six hundred twelve thousand fifty-nine dollars
($1,612,059) for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for
Easterseals UCP of North Carolina & Virginia, Inc.

LOW-INCOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE BLOCK GRANT
SECTION 9L.1.(t) The Division of Social Services shall have the authority to
realign appropriated funds between the State-level services Low-Income Energy Assistance
Payments and Crisis Assistance Payments without prior consultation with the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services to ensure needs are effectively met without
exceeding the total amount appropriated for these State-level service items. Additional
emergency contingency funds received may be allocated for Energy Assistance Payments or
Crisis Intervention Payments without prior consultation with the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services. Additional funds received shall be reported to the
Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division upon notification of the award. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
not allocate funds for any activities, including increasing administration, other than assistance
payments, without prior consultation with the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health
and Human Services.
SECTION 9L.1.(u) The sum of fifty-six million three hundred sixty-nine thousand
two hundred eighty-one dollars ($56,369,281) in the 2025-26 fiscal year and sixty-two million
six hundred fifty-five thousand eight hundred eighty-eight dollars ($62,655,888) in the 2026-27
fiscal year appropriated in this act in the Low-Income Energy Assistance Block Grant to the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, shall be used for Energy
Assistance Payments for the households of (i) elderly persons age 60 and above with income up
to one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty level and (ii) disabled persons eligible
for services funded through the Division of Aging and Adult Services.
County departments of social services shall submit to the Division of Social Services
an outreach plan for targeting households with 60-year-old household members no later than
August 1 of each year. The outreach plan shall comply with the following:
(1) Ensure that eligible households are made aware of the available assistance,
with particular attention paid to the elderly population age 60 and above and
disabled persons receiving services through the Division of Aging and Adult
Services.
(2) Include efforts by the county department of social services to contact other
State and local governmental entities and community-based organizations to
(i) offer the opportunity to provide outreach and (ii) receive applications for
energy assistance.
(3) Be approved by the local board of social services or human services board
prior to submission.

CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT FUND BLOCK GRANT
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 95

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9L.1.(v) Payment for subsidized child care services provided with federal
TANF funds shall comply with all regulations and policies issued by the Division of Child
Development and Early Education for the subsidized child care program.
SECTION 9L.1.(w) If funds appropriated through the Child Care and Development
Fund Block Grant for any program cannot be obligated or spent in that program within the
obligation or liquidation periods allowed by the federal grants, the Department may move funds
to child care subsidies, unless otherwise prohibited by federal requirements of the grant, in order
to use the federal funds fully.

COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT
SECTION 9L.1.(x) The sum of five million four hundred sixteen thousand seven
hundred fifty-six dollars ($4,208,378) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and four million two hundred
and eight thousand, three hundred and seventy-eight dollars ($4,208,378) for the 2026-2027
fiscal year appropriated in this act in the Community Mental Health Services Block Grant to the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental
Disabilities, and Substance Use Services, is to be used for Mental Health Services – First
Psychotic Symptom Treatment.

MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT
SECTION 9L.1.(y) The sum of one million seven hundred twenty-seven thousand
three hundred seven dollars ($1,727,307) appropriated in this act in the Maternal and Child
Health Block Grant to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health,
for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be used for evidence-based programs in
counties with the highest infant mortality rates. The Division shall report on (i) the counties
selected to receive the allocation, (ii) the specific evidence-based services provided, (iii) the
number of women served, and (iv) any impact on the counties' infant mortality rate. The Division
shall report its findings to the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Health
and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and
the Fiscal Research Division no later than December 31 of each year.
SECTION 9L.1.(z) The sum of eighty-one thousand one hundred twelve dollars
($81,112) for fiscal year 2025-26 and eighty-four thousand sixty-seven dollars ($84,067) for
fiscal year 2026-27, allocated in this section in the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant to the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, Women and Children's
Health Section, shall not be used to supplant existing State or federal funds. This allocation shall
be used for a Public Health Program Consultant position assigned full-time to manage the North
Carolina Perinatal Health Strategic Plan and provide staff support for the stakeholder work group.
SECTION 9L.1.(aa1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, shall have the authority
to realign appropriated funds between the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant categories to
maintain federal compliance and programmatic alignment without exceeding the total amount
appropriated for the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant.

PART X. AGRICULTURE AND CONSUMER SERVICES [RESERVED]

PART XI. COMMERCE

COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANTS
SECTION 11.1.(a) Allocations. – Of the funds appropriated in this act for federal
block grant funds, the following allocations are made for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
according to the following schedule:

Page 96 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT

01. State Administration $1,484,872

02. Neighborhood Revitalization $27,662,645

03. Economic Development $14,065,752

04. Rural Community Development $5,157,442

TOTAL COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT
2024 Program Year $46,308,393
2025 Program Year $46,272,979
2026 Program Year $46,272,979
2027 Program Year $48,370,711

SECTION 11.1.(b) Availability Reduction. – If federal funds are reduced below the
amounts specified in this section after the effective date of this act, then every program in each
of these federal block grants shall be reduced by the same percentage as the reduction in federal
funds.
SECTION 11.1.(c) Availability Increase. – Any block grant funds appropriated by
the Congress of the United States in addition to the funds specified in this section shall be
expended as follows: each program category under the Community Development Block Grant
shall be increased by the same percentage as the increase in federal funds.
SECTION 11.1.(d) Reallocation. – The Department of Commerce shall consult with
the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations (Commission) prior to
reallocating Community Development Block Grant Funds. Notwithstanding the provisions of
this subsection, whenever the Director of the Budget finds either of the following conditions
exist:
(1) If a reallocation is required because of an emergency that poses an imminent
threat to public health or public safety, then the Director of the Budget may
authorize the reallocation without consulting the Commission. The
Department of Commerce shall report to the Commission on the reallocation
no later than 30 days after it was authorized and shall identify in the report the
emergency, the type of action taken, and how it was related to the emergency.
(2) If the State will lose federal block grant funds or receive less federal block
grant funds in the next fiscal year unless a reallocation is made, then the
Department of Commerce shall provide a written report to the Commission
on the proposed reallocation and shall identify the reason that failure to take
action will result in the loss of federal funds. If the Commission does not hear
the issue within 30 days of receipt of the report, the Department of Commerce
may take the action without consulting the Commission.
SECTION 11.1.(e) Report. – By October 1, 2026, and September 1, 2027, the
Department of Commerce shall report to the chairs of the House of Representatives
Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources; the chairs of
the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources; the
chairs of the Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight
Committee; and the Fiscal Research Division on the use of Community Development Block
Grant Funds appropriated in the prior fiscal year. The report shall include the following:
(1) A discussion of each of the categories of funding, including information on
the statewide need in each category.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 97

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Information on the number of applications that were received in each category
and the total dollar amount requested in each category.
(3) A list of grantees, including the grantee's name, county, category under which
the grant was funded, the amount awarded, and a narrative description of the
project.
SECTION 11.1.(f) Neighborhood Revitalization. – Funds allocated to the
Neighborhood Revitalization Category in subsection (a) of this section shall be made available
as grants for eligible activities listed in this subsection. The funds available for grants under this
category may be used for all of the following, subject to the national objectives and eligible
activities allowed under guidance issued by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development (HUD):
(1) Essential repairs to prevent abandonment and deterioration of housing in
low- and moderate-income neighborhoods.
(2) Demolition and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements.
(3) Public improvements, including parks, streets, sidewalks, and water and sewer
lines.
SECTION 11.1.(g) Economic Development. – Funds allocated to the Economic
Development Category in subsection (a) of this section shall be made available as grants for
eligible activities listed in this subsection. The funds available for grants under this category may
be used for all of the following, subject to the national objectives and eligible activities allowed
under guidance issued by HUD:
(1) Acquisition of real property.
(2) Demolition and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements.
(3) Removal of material and architectural barriers.
(4) Public improvements, including parks, streets, sidewalks, and water and sewer
lines.
(5) Loans and grants to public or private nonprofit entities for construction and
rehabilitation activities.
(6) Assistance to private, for-profit entities for economic development.
(7) Technical assistance to public or nonprofit entities for neighborhood
revitalization or economic development activities.
(8) Assistance to for-profit and nonprofit entities to facilitate economic
development activities.
SECTION 11.1.(h) Rural Community Development. – Funds allocated for the Rural
Community Development Category in subsection (a) of this section shall be made available as
grants for eligible activities listed in this subsection. These funds shall provide grants that support
community development and comprehensive growth projects to be awarded by the North
Carolina Department of Commerce. The Rural Community Development Category will provide
grants to units of local government in development Tier one and development Tier two areas, as
defined in G.S. 143B-437.08, and in rural census tracts, as defined in G.S. 143B-472.127(a)(2),
in any other area to support projects that promote broad-based community development
activities, increased local investment and economic growth, and stronger and more viable rural
neighborhoods. In awarding grants under this section, preference shall be given to projects in
development tier one areas, as defined in G.S. 143B-437.08. The funds available for grants under
this category may be used for all of the following, subject to the national objectives and eligible
activities allowed under guidance issued by HUD:
(1) Essential repairs to prevent abandonment and deterioration of housing in low
and moderate-income neighborhoods.
(2) Public improvements, including parks, streets, sidewalks, and water and sewer
lines.
Page 98 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Public facilities, including neighborhood and community facilities and
facilities for individuals with special needs.
(4) Public services, including employment, crime prevention, and energy
conservation.
(5) Assistance to private, for-profit entities for economic development.
(6) Technical assistance to public or nonprofit entities for neighborhood
revitalization or economic development activities.
(7) Assistance to for-profit and nonprofit entities to facilitate economic
development activities.
SECTION 11.1.(i) Deobligated Funds. – Throughout each year, deobligated funds
arise in the various funding categories and program years of the Community Development Block
Grant (CDBG) program as a result of (i) projects coming in under budget, (ii) projects being
cancelled, or (iii) projects being required to repay funds. Surplus federal administrative funds in
the CDBG program may vary from year to year based upon the amount of State appropriated
funds allocated and the amount of eligible in-kind funds identified. To allow the Department of
Commerce to quickly deploy deobligated and surplus federal administrative funds as they are
identified throughout the program year, the following shall apply to the use of deobligated CDBG
funds and surplus federal administrative funds:
(1) All surplus federal administrative funds shall be divided proportionally
between the Department of Commerce programs and shall be used as provided
in subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection.
(2) All deobligated funds allocated to the Department of Commerce and any
surplus federal administrative funds, as provided for in subdivision (1) of this
subsection, may be used by the Department for all of the following:
a. To issue grants in the CDBG Economic Development or
Neighborhood Revitalization Program Category.
b. For providing training and guidance to local governments relative to
the CDBG program, its management, and administrative requirements.
c. For any other purpose consistent with the Department's administration
of the CDBG program if an equal amount of State matching funds is
available.

COMMERCE NONPROFITS/REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 11.2.(a) The entities listed in subsection (b) of this section shall do the
following for each year that State funds are expended:
(1) By September 1 of each year, and more frequently as requested, report to the
chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and
Natural and Economic Resources; the chairs of the House of Representatives
Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic
Resources; the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture,
Natural, and Economic Resources; and the Fiscal Research Division on prior
State fiscal year program activities, objectives, and accomplishments and prior
State fiscal year itemized expenditures and fund sources. If State funds are
used to provide matching funds for competitive grants from the federal
government or a nongovernmental entity, the report should include a list and
description of the grants that are awarded.
(2) Provide to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources; the chairs of the House of
Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and
Economic Resources; the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on
Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources; and the Fiscal Research
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 99

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Division a copy of the entity's annual audited financial statement within 30
days of issuance of the statement.
SECTION 11.2.(b) The following entities shall comply with the requirements of
subsection (a) of this section:
(1) North Carolina Biotechnology Center.
(2) High Point Market Authority.
(3) RTI International.
(4) Carolina Small Business Development Fund.

ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES FOR ONE NC SMALL BUSINESS PROGRAM
SECTION 11.3.(a) G.S. 143B-437.71 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-437.71. One North Carolina Fund established as a special fund.
…
(c) [Special Account. –]There is created in the One North Carolina Fund a special
account, the One North Carolina Small Business Account, to be used for the North Carolina
SBIR/STTR Incentive Program and the North Carolina SBIR/STTR Matching Funds Program,
as specified in Part 2I of Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes. Of the total moneys
in the One North Carolina Small Business Account, the Department may use up to two percent
(2%) annually for costs associated with administration of the North Carolina SBIR/STTR
Incentive Program and the North Carolina SBIR/STTR Matching Funds Program."

NC BIOTECHNOLOGY CENTER
SECTION 11.4.(a) Except for the funds appropriated in subsection (b) of this
section, funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Commerce for the North Carolina
Biotechnology Center (Center) in the fiscal year 2026-27 shall be allocated for the following
purposes in the following proportions:
(1) Twenty-one percent (21%) for job creation, including funding for the
AgBiotech Initiative, economic and industrial development, and related
activities.
(2) Sixty-five percent (65%) for science and commercialization, including
science and technology development, Centers of Innovation, business and
technology development, education and training, and related activities.
(3) Fourteen percent (14%) for Center operations, including administration,
professional and technical assistance and oversight, corporate
communications, human resource management, financial and grant
administration, legal, and accounting.
SECTION 11.4.(b) Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of
Commerce for the Center, five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of recurring funds in each
fiscal year of the biennium shall be used to support funding for early stage loans to North Carolina
agricultural technology companies.
SECTION 11.4.(c) The Center shall not use any of the recurring funds allocated in
subsection (b) of this section for administrative costs and shall report on the expenditure of those
funds each year pursuant to Section 11.2 of this act.
SECTION 11.4.(d) The Center shall prioritize funding and distribution of loans over
funding and distribution of grants.
SECTION 11.4.(e) Up to ten percent (10%) of the sum of each of the allocations in
subsection (a) of this section may be reallocated to subdivision (a)(1) or subdivision (a)(2) of this
section if, in the judgment of Center management, the reallocation will advance the mission of
the Center.

STRATEGIC WORKFORCE TRAINING FUND AND BUSINESS TAX CUT
Page 100 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 11.5.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 96 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 96-6.3. Strategic WorkForce Training fund.
(a) Establishment and Use. – There is established in the Department of Commerce a
Strategic WorkForce Training fund for the purposes of providing job training,
employment-related services, and economic development services to North Carolina job seekers
and employers in order to increase or improve labor supply, connect employers with employees,
and enhance the employer experience with the Division. The Trust consists of the revenues
derived from the Strategic WorkForce Training assessment imposed as outlined in 96-6.3.(b).
(b) Assessment Imposed. – An assessment is imposed on an employer who is required to
make a contribution to the Unemployment Insurance equal to a percentage of the required
contribution calculated in accordance with G.S. 96-9.2 prior to the application of the reduction
in G.S. 96-9.2(f). The Division shall calculate the assessment percentage, rounded up to the
nearest half percent (0.5%), as the ratio of the Strategic WorkForce Training fund Annual Target
Amount divided by the total required contributions estimated using the most recently available
Experience Rating Report (ETA 204) prepared for the Employment and Training Administration
within the U.S. Department of Labor. The Annual Target Amount shall be one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000) for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before
January 1, 2028, and shall increase by three and one-half percent (3.5%) in each subsequent
taxable year, rounded to the nearest one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). Except as provided
in this section, the assessment is collected and administered in the same manner as contributions
as described in Article 2A of this Chapter, except that the full assessment amount is due on the
same date as the first quarterly payment of contributions. Assessments collected under this
section must be credited to the Strategic WorkForce Training fund established under subsection
(a) of this section. Interest and penalties collected on unpaid assessments imposed by this section
must be credited to the Supplemental Employment Security Administration. Penalties collected
on unpaid assessments imposed by this section must be transferred to the Civil Penalty and
Forfeiture established in G.S. 115C-457.1.
(c) Suspension of Assessment. – The assessment does not apply in a taxable year if, as
of September 1 of the preceding calendar year, the amount in the State's account in the
Unemployment Trust is less than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000)."
SECTION 11.5.(b) G.S. 96-9.2 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"§ 96‑9.2. Required contributions to the Unemployment Insurance Fund.
…
(f) Strategic Workforce Contribution Tax Credit. – Except when the surtax imposed
under G.S. 96-9.7 is in effect, an employer is allowed a tax credit for a contribution to the
Unemployment Insurance Fund payable under this section each calendar year equal to one
hundred and fifty percent (150%) of the amount of the Strategic WorkForce Training assessment
calculated pursuant to G.S. 96-6.3. An employer may claim the full amount of the credit against
the contributions payable with the report due on or before April 30 of each calendar year. The
Division may suspend the Strategic Workforce Contribution Tax Credit for any employer with
contributions more than 90 days past due."

ENHANCE UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFITS
SECTION 11.6.(a) G.S. 96-14.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 96-14.2. Weekly benefit amount.
(a) Weekly Benefit Amount. – The weekly benefit amount for an individual who is totally
unemployed is an amount equal to the wages paid to the individual in the last two completed
quarters of the individual's base period divided by 52 and rounded to the next lower whole dollar.
If this amount is less than fifteen dollars ($15.00), the individual is not eligible for benefits. The
weekly benefit amount may not exceed three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00).four hundred ninety-
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 101

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
five dollars ($495.00), adjusted annually for inflation. Beginning July 1, 2027, and on each July
1 thereafter, the Division shall adjust the maximum weekly benefit for claims filed on or after
that date by the percentage change in the annual average Consumer Price Index for All Items for
All Urban Consumers published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics for the preceding calendar
year, rounded to the nearest dollar."
SECTION 11.6.(b) G.S. 96-14.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 96-14.3. Duration of benefits.
(a) Duration. – The number of weeks an individual is allowed to receive unemployment
benefits depends on the seasonal adjusted statewide unemployment rate that applies to the
six-month base period in which the claim is filed. One six-month base period begins on January
1 and one six-month base period begins on July 1. For the base period that begins January 1, the
average of the seasonal adjusted unemployment rates for the State for the preceding months of
July, August, and September applies. For the base period that begins July 1, the average of the
seasonal adjusted unemployment rates for the State for the preceding months of January,
February, and March applies. The Division must use the most recent seasonal adjusted
unemployment rate determined by the U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, and
not the rate as revised in the annual benchmark.
Seasonal Adjusted Number
Unemployment Rate of Weeks
Less than or equal to 5.5%4.5% 1220
Greater than 5.5%4.5% up to 6%5.5% 1322
Greater than 6%5.5% up to 6.5% 1424
Greater than 6.5% up to 7% 1526
Greater than 7% up to 7.5% 16
Greater than 7.5% up to 8% 17
Greater than 8% up to 8.5% 18
Greater than 8.5% up to 9% 19
Greater than 9% 20
…."
SECTION 11.6.(c) Subsections (a) and (b) apply to claims for benefits filed on or
after July 1, 2026.

PART XII. ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY

ESTABLISH NON-TITLE V FEES IN STATUTE
SECTION 12.1. G.S. 143-215.3(a)(1b) reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-215.3. General powers of Commission and Department; auxiliary powers.
(a) Additional Powers. – In addition to the specific powers prescribed elsewhere in this
Article, and for the purpose of carrying out its duties, the Commission shall have the power:
…
(1b) The fee to be charged pursuant to G.S. 143-215.3(a)(1a) for processing an
application for a permit under G.S. 143-215.108 and G.S. 143-215.109 of
Article 21B of this Chapter may not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00).
The Department shall charge permit fees pursuant to G.S. 143-215.3(a)(1a) to
non-Title V facilities subject to permitting under G.S. 143-215.108 and
G.S. 143-215.109 of Article 21B according to the following schedule:
(a) For facilities seeking federally enforceable limits to avoid Title V
permitting, application fees of eight hundred dollars ($800.00) and
annual fees of three thousand seventy dollars ($3,070.00).
Page 102 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) For facilities with a potential to emit below Title V thresholds, except
for general permits, application fees of one hundred dollars ($100.00)
and annual fees of four hundred dollars ($400.00).
(c) The fee for an ownership change shall be fifty dollars ($50).
(d) The Department may provide a discount of up to twenty-five percent
on annual fees authorized by subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection.
The fee to be charged pursuant to G.S. 143-215.3(a)(1a) for processing a
registration under Part 2A of this Article or Article 38 of this Chapter may not
exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for any single registration. An additional fee of
twenty percent (20%) of the registration processing fee may be assessed for a
late registration under Article 38 of this Chapter. The fee for administering
and compliance monitoring under Article 21, other than Parts 1 and 1A, and
G.S. 143-215.108 and G.S. 143-215.109 of Article 21B shall be charged on
an annual basis for each year of the permit term and may not exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per year. Fees for processing all
permits under Article 21A and all other sections of Article 21B shall not
exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) for any single permit. The total payment
for fees that are set by the Commission under this subsection for all permits
for any single facility shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars
($7,500) per year, which amount shall include all application fees and fees for
administration and compliance monitoring. A single facility is defined to be
any contiguous area under one ownership and in which permitted activities
occur. For all permits issued under these Articles where a fee schedule is not
specified in the statutes, the Commission, or other commission specified by
statute shall adopt a fee schedule in a rule following the procedures established
by the Administrative Procedure Act. Fee schedules shall be established to
reflect the size of the emission or discharge, the potential impact on the
environment, the staff costs involved, relative costs of the issuance of new
permits and the reissuance of existing permits, and shall include adequate
safeguards to prevent unusual fee assessments which would result in serious
economic burden on an individual applicant. A system shall be considered to
allow consolidated annual payments for persons with multiple permits. In its
rulemaking to establish fee schedules, the Commission is also directed to
consider a method of rewarding facilities which achieve full compliance with
administrative and self-monitoring reporting requirements, and to consider, in
those cases where the cost of renewal or amendment of a permit is less than
for the original permit, a lower fee for the renewal or amendment."

QUADRENNIAL FEE ADJUSTMENT REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 12.2. G.S. 143B-279.19 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-279.19. Quadrennial adjustment of certain fees and rates.
(a) Adjustment for Legislatively Mandated Salaries and Benefits. – Beginning July 1,
2025, and every four years thereafter, the Department shall adjust the fees and rates imposed
pursuant to the statutes listed in this subsection in accordance with the Consumer Price Index
computed by the Bureau of Labor Statistics during the prior two bienniums. The adjustment for
per transaction rates shall be rounded to the nearest dollar ($1.00):
…
(21) G.S. 143-215.3(1b).
…."

Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 103

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
MAKING INUNDATION MAPS PUBLICLY AVAILABLE
SECTION 12.3.(a) G.S. 143-215.31 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-215.31. Supervision over maintenance and operation of dams.
…
(a1) The owner of a dam classified by the Department as a high-hazard dam or an
intermediate-hazard dam shall develop an Emergency Action Plan for the dam as provided in this
subsection:
…
(6) Information included in an Emergency Action Plan that constitutes sensitive
public security information, as provided in G.S. 132-1.7, shall be maintained
as confidential information and shall not be subject to disclosure under the
Public Records Act. For purposes of this section, "sensitive public security
information" shall include Critical Energy Infrastructure Information
protected from disclosure under rules adopted by the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission in 18 C.F.R. § 388.112. § 388.112, but shall not
include Emergency Action Plans or inundation maps for any impoundments
or dams not regulated by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.
…."
SECTION 12.3.(b) G.S. 66-58 is amended to read:
"§ 66‑58. Sale of merchandise or services by governmental units.
…
(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to any of the following:
…
(29) The Department of Environmental Quality in the provision of inundation
maps for the preparation of Emergency Action Plans to owners or operators
of high hazard potential dams.
…."

SOLID WASTE BENEFICIAL REUSE CLARIFICATION
SECTION 12.4.(a) G.S. 130A-309.05 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-309.05. Regulated wastes; certain exclusions.
(a) Certain Wastes Regulated as Nonhazardous. – Notwithstanding other provisions of
this Article, the following waste shall be regulated pursuant to this Part:
…
(b) Management of Ash Generated From Burning of Solid Waste. – Ash generated by a
solid waste management facility from the burning of solid waste shall be disposed of in a properly
designed solid waste disposal area that complies with standards developed by the Department for
the disposal of the ash. The Department shall work with solid waste management facilities that
burn solid waste to identify and develop methods for recycling and reusing incinerator ash or
treated ash.
(c) Recovered Material. – Recovered material is not subject to regulation as permitting
requirements for solid waste under this Article. In order for a material that would otherwise be
regulated as solid waste to qualify as a recovered material, the The Department may require any
person who owns or has control over the material to demonstrate that the material meets the
requirements of this subsection. In order to protect public health and the environment, the
Commission subsection or may require the person to obtain a beneficial use determination from
the Department in accordance with subsection (d) of this section. The Department may adopt
rules to implement this subsection. Materials that are accumulated speculatively, as that term is
defined under 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 261 (July 1, 2014 Edition), shall not qualify as
a recovered material, and shall be subject to regulation as solid waste. In order to qualify as a
recovered material, thematerial. The material shall be managed as a valuable commodity in a
Page 104 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
manner consistent with the desired use or end use, and all of the following conditions shall be
met:
…
(d) Beneficial Use Determination. – For the purposes of preservation of landfill capacity,
economic development, energy savings, and reduction of greenhouse emissions, the Department
may determine whether nonhazardous solid waste may be used or reused for a particular site or
application as an alternative to disposal at a permitted solid waste management facility as set
forth in this subsection.
(1) A person seeking a beneficial use determination shall submit an application to
the Department. The Department, after a review of an application submitted
under this subsection, may take any of the following actions:
a. Authorize management of a specified type of nonhazardous solid
waste at a site other than a permitted solid waste management facility.
b. Issue a beneficial use determination with appropriate conditions for
use of specific types of solid waste in construction, land application,
or other projects and applications.
(2) An applicant for a determination under this subsection shall submit
information on forms prescribed by the Department and any additional
information required by the Department necessary for a determination under
this subsection. In its review of the application and additional information, the
Department shall also consider internal research or information submitted by
any person or entity concerning the potential hazard to public health or the
environment of any type of solid waste.
(3) The Department may require submittal of a demonstration that the solid waste
is being managed in a manner to protect public health or the environment and
may include any of the following as a part of an authorization under
subdivision (1) of this subsection:
a. Requirements for periodic testing of solid wastes; and
b. Conditions to ensure that the product or by-products of a material
recovered or diverted for beneficial use shall not be discharged,
deposited, injected, dumped, spilled, leaked, or placed into or upon
any land or water so that the products or by-products or any
constituents thereof may enter other lands or be emitted into the air, or
discharged into any waters, including groundwaters, or otherwise enter
the environment or pose a threat to public health and safety.
(4) Approvals granted under this subsection are valid for no longer than five
years. Requests for renewal shall be made at least 60 days in advance of the
expiration date of the approval.
(5) The applicant for a determination under this subdivision shall submit to the
Department on an annual basis a report detailing the usage of material under
the approval and certifying compliance with this Article and any applicable
rules adopted under this Article.
(6) The Department may suspend or revoke an authorization and may modify an
authorization if it is determined that the activity is not in compliance with the
requirements of applicable laws or rules or if new information is provided to
the Department that impacts the determination of protection of public health
or the environment.
(7) The Department shall provide notice on its website of approved beneficial use
determinations.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 105

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) Facilities that manage source-separated materials for the purpose of recycling
as defined in G.S. 130A-290 are not subject to the provisions of this
subsection.
(9) The Department may adopt rules to implement this subsection and establish
application fees for a reuse determination under this subsection. All fees
collected under this subdivision shall be credited to the Solid Waste
Management Account established under G.S. 130A-295.8(a). In determining
the amount of the total application fee in rule, the Department shall have the
authority to establish separate fee amounts for annual fees for each year based
on the length of time for which the approval will be valid as requested by the
applicant."
SECTION 12.4.(b) This section becomes effective January 1, 2027.

EXPAND ELIGIBILITY FOR TARGETED INTEREST RATES
SECTION 12.5. G.S. 159G-20(21) reads as rewritten:
"§ 159G-20. Definitions.
…
(21) Targeted interest rate project. – Either one of the following types of projects:
a. A project that is awarded a loan from the Drinking Water Reserve or the
Wastewater Reserve based on affordability.
b. A project that is awarded a loan from the CWSRF or the DWSRF and is
in a category for which federal law or the Department encourages a special
focus.
…."

RAISE LIMITS FOR MRF AND AIA GRANT FUNDING
SECTION 12.6. G.S. 159G-36(c) is amended to read:
"§ 159G-36. Limits on loans and grants.
…
(c) Certain Reserve Recipient Limit. – The following limits apply to the loan or grant
types made from the Wastewater Reserve or the Drinking Water Reserve to the same local
government unit or nonprofit water corporation:
…
(4) The amount of merger/regionalization feasibility grants awarded for three
consecutive fiscal years for a fiscal year may not exceed fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).
(5) The amount of asset inventory and assessment grants awarded for three
consecutive fiscal years may not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars
($150,000)two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000).
…."

PART XIII. LABOR [RESERVED]

PART XIV. NATURAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES

JOHNSTON COUNTY/BENTONVILLE BATTLEFIELD GRANT EXTENSION
SECTION 14.1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the funds
appropriated in S.L. 2023-134, Sec. 2.2 to be allocated as a directed grant to Johnston County to
be used for the Bentonville Battlefield State Historic Site shall not revert until June 30, 2028.

FRIENDS OF NC MARITIME MUSEUM AT SOUTHPORT GRANT EXTENSION
Page 106 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 14.2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the funds
appropriated in S.L. 2023-134, Sec. 2.2 to be allocated as a directed grant to the Friends of the
North Carolina Maritime Museum at Southport to be used for fire suppression system and related
costs shall not revert until June 30, 2028.

CODIFY EXEMPTION FROM STATE PARKS FEES FOR ELIGIBLE DISABLED
VETERANS
SECTION 14.3. Article 2 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-135.17. Exemption of State Parks fees for eligible disabled veterans.
(a) Definitions. – As used in this section, the following words and phrases have the
following meanings:
(1) Annual Pass Program. – The North Carolina State Parks Annual Pass program
offered by the Division that includes the following passes: (i) seasonal access
passes, (ii) annual passes, and (iii) four-wheel-drive beach access annual
passes.
(2) Disabled Veteran. – A veteran of any branch of the Armed Forces of the
United States who character of service at separation was honorable or under
honorable conditions and who satisfies either of the following requirements:
a. As of the date of application required by this section is submitted, the
veteran has received benefits under 38 U.S.C. §2101; or
b. The veteran has received a certification by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or another federal agency indicating
that, as of the date the application required by this section is submitted,
the veteran has a service-connected disability.
(3) Division. – The North Carolina Division of Parks and Recreation of the North
Carolina Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.
(4) Eligible Disabled Veteran. – A Disabled Veteran who (i) has submitted an
application for a pass included within the Annual Pass Program and (ii) has
provided the Division a copy of the veteran's disability certification or
evidence of benefits received under 38 U.S.C. § 2101.
(b) Fee Exemption. – An Eligible Disabled Veteran seeking a pass under the Annual Pass
Program shall apply for the pass on a forum and in a manner prescribed by the Division.
(c) Application Required. – A Disabled Veteran seeking a pass under the Annual Pass
Program shall apply for the pass on a form and in a manner prescribed by the Division.
(d) Rulemaking. – The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall adopt rules,
or amend any current rules, necessary to implement this section."

GRASSROOTS ARTS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATIVE COST ALLOWANCE
SECTION 14.4. G.S. 143B-122 reads as rewritten:
"§143-122. Distribution of funds.
(a) Administrative Expenses. – Of the funds appropriated to the Fund, the Trustees may
use no more than five percent (5%) for operating expenses associated with programs and
activities authorized by this Section.
(b) After administrative expenses are deducted from Of the funds available under
Grassroots Arts Program, 20% total shall be distributed among counties equally, and the
remaining eighty percent (80%) shall be distributed among the counties on a per capita basis."

AUTHORIZE PARTF MATCH FOR SHALLOWDRAFT NAVIGATION CHANNEL
DREDGING AND AQUATIC WEED FUND
SECTION 14.5. G.S. 143-215.73F reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 107

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§143-215.73F. Shallow Draft Navigation Channel Dredging and Aquatic Weed Fund.
…
(c) Cost-Share. – Any project funded by revenue from the Fund must be cost-shared with
non-State dollars as follow:
…
(3) The cost-share for an aquatic weed control or navigation channel dredging
project shall be at least one non-State dollar for every dollar from the Fund.
The cost-share for an aquatic weed control or navigation channel dredging
project located within a component of the State Parks System shall be
provided by the Division of Parks and Recreation of the Department of
Natural and Cultural Resources. The Division of Parks and Recreation may
use funds allocated to the State parks System for capital projects under
G.S. 143B-135.56 for the cost share.
…."

AMEND CONTINUING RESOLUTIONS TO ALLOW ACTING PAY
SECTION 14.6. G.S. 143-5-4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-5-4. Enactment deadline; procedures to be followed when the Current Operations
Appropriations Act does not become law prior to the end of certain fiscal years.
(a) Procedure for Budget Continuation. – If a fiscal year begins for which no Current
Operations Appropriation Act providing for current operations of State government during that
fiscal year has become law, then the following procedures shall be followed and the following
limitations shall apply;
…
(5) State employee salaries. – The salary schedules and specific salaries
established for the prior fiscal year and in effect on June 30 of the prior fiscal
year for offices and positions shall remain in effect until the Current
Operations Appropriations Act for the fiscal year becomes law. State
employees subject to G.S. 7A-102(c), 7A-171.1, 143B-1715, or any other
statutory salary schedule, shall not move up on salary schedules or receive
automatic increases including automatic step increases, until authorized by the
General Assembly. State employees, including those exempt from the
classification and compensation rules established by the State Human
Resources Commission, shall not receive any automatic step increases,
annual, performance, merit, bonuses, or other increments until authorized by
the General Assembly. Notwithstanding these restrictions, acting pay may still
be offered when an employee has a temporary assignment in which he or she
remains in the same position, but assumes a higher-level duties or when an
employee has a temporary assignment with a change in the variety and scope
of duties.
…."

SALUDA GRADE TRAILS CONSERVATORY
SECTION 14.7. The funds allocated by Section 2H.7(1) of S.L. 2024-57 of the
Department of Natural and Cultural Resources to provide a directed grant to the Saluda Grade
Trails Conservancy, a nonprofit corporation, may, notwithstanding that provision, also be used
for the purposes of designing, planning, and developing a recreational trail along the Saluda
Grade, including but not limited to the provision of matching funds for grants related to
recreational trail development along the Saluda Grade. For purposes of this subsection, "Saluda
Grade" means that portion of the Norfolk Southern W-Line railroad between milepost 26 in the
Page 108 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
unincorporated community of Zirconia in Henderson County and the boundary between North
Carolina and South Carolina.

PART XV. WILDLIFE RESOURCES COMMISSION [RESERVED]

PART XVI. ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE COURTS

IOLTA FUNDS TRANSFER
SECTION 16.1. Section 25 of Session Law 2025-70 is repealed.

CRIMINAL JUSTICE INFORMATION NETWORK TRANSFER
SECTION 16.2. G.S. 143B-1203 reads as re-written:
"§ 143B-1203. Transfer; definitions.
(a) The statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, and
unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds of the Criminal Justice
Information Network Governing Board are transferred to the Department of Public Safety
Administrative Office of the Courts as a Type II transfer as defined in G.S. 143A-6.
(b) As used in this Part:
(1) "Board" means the Criminal Justice Information Network Governing Board
established by G.S. 143B-1204.
(2) "Department" means the Department of Public Safety. Administrative Office
of the Courts.
(3) "Local government user" means a unit of local government of this State having
authorized access to the Network.
(4) "Network" means the Criminal Justice Information Network established by
the Board pursuant to this Part.
(5) "Network user" or "user" means any person having authorized access to the
Network.
(6) "State agency" means any State department, agency, institution, board,
commission, or other unit of State government."

PART XVII. INDIGENT DEFENSE SERVICES [RESERVED]

PART XVIII. JUSTICE

STATE CRIME LABORATORY FEASIBILITY STUDY
SECTION 18.1. Of the funds appropriated in Section 18.9 of S.L. 2021-180 to the
Department of Justice (Department) for the 2021-2022 fiscal year to conduct a study on the siting
of an Eastern Regional Laboratory to be located on the campus of Elizabeth City State University,
the remainder shall be used to conduct a study for a permanent laboratory facility for the Triad
Laboratory to replace the current location, which the Department is currently leasing, and to do
a feasibility and advanced planning study for a new Raleigh laboratory due to the age of the
building. The Department shall report on the study outlined in this section to the Chairs of the
House Justice and Public Safety Appropriations Committee, the Chairs of the Senate
Appropriations on Justice and Public Safety Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division on or
before June 30, 2027. The report shall include (i) the estimated cost of completing the laboratory,
(ii) the estimated cost of operating the laboratory during its first five years of operation, (iii) an
estimated time line for completion of the laboratory, and (iv) any other relevant information.

PART XIX. ADULT CORRECTION

Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 109

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART XIX-A. DEPARTMENT OF ADULT CORRECTION ADMINISTRATION

STATEWIDE MISDEMEANANT CONFINEMENT PROGRAM FUNDING TRANSFER
SECTION 19A.1. Of the funds appropriated in this act for the Statewide
Misdemeanant Confinement Program:
(1) The sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be transferred each fiscal
year to the North Carolina Sheriffs' Association, Inc., a nonprofit corporation,
to support the Program and for administrative and operating expenses of the
Association and its staff.
(2) The sum of two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000) shall be
allocated each fiscal year to the Department of Adult Correction for its
administrative and operating expenses for the Program.
(3) Up to the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) may be used in
each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to reimburse sheriffs
utilizing inmate labor pursuant to the provisions of Section 19C.10 of S.L.
2021-180.

INMATE MEDICAL REPORTING
SECTION 19A.2. G.S. 143B-1470 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1470. Medical costs for inmates.
…
(c) The Department of Adult Correction shall report quarterly annually by September 1
of each year to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the
chairs of the Justice and Public Safety Appropriations Committees on:
(1) The percentage of the total inmates requiring hospitalization or hospital
services who receive that treatment at each hospital.
…
(10) The reimbursement rate for contracted providers. The Department shall
randomly audit high-volume contracted providers to ensure adherence to
billing at the contracted rate.
Reports submitted on August 1 shall include totals for the previous fiscal year for all the
information requested."

REIMBURSE COUNTIES FOR HOUSING AND EXTRAORDINARY MEDICAL
EXPENSES
SECTION 19A.3. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-6-9, the Department of Adult
Correction may use funds available to the Department for the 2025-27 fiscal biennium to
reimburse counties for the cost of housing convicted inmates, parolees, and post-release
supervisees awaiting transfer to the State prison system, as provided in G.S. 148-29. The
reimbursement may not exceed forty dollars ($40.00) per day per prisoner awaiting transfer.
The Department shall report annually by February 1 of each year to the chairs of the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the chairs of the House of
Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Senate
Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety on the expenditure of funds to
reimburse counties for prisoners awaiting transfer.

PART XIX-B. PRISONS

CENTER FOR COMMUNITY TRANSITIONS/CONTRACT AND REPORT
SECTION 19B.1. The Department of Adult Correction may continue to contract
with The Center for Community Transitions, Inc., a nonprofit corporation, for the purchase of
Page 110 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
prison beds for minimum security female inmates during the 2025-27 fiscal biennium. The
Center for Community Transitions, Inc., shall report by February 1 of each year to the chairs of
the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the
Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety on the annual cost per inmate and
the average daily inmate population compared to bed capacity using the same methodology as
that used by the Department of Adult Correction.

NURSE STAFFING AT STATE PRISONS
SECTION 19B.2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of
Adult Correction may, in its discretion and subject to the approval of the Office of State Budget
and Management, convert funds appropriated for contractual nursing services to permanent
nursing positions when it is determined to promote security, generate cost savings, and improve
health care quality. The Department shall report on any such conversions to the Fiscal Research
Division.

DOT CONTRACT OF INMATE LITTER CREW
SECTION 19B.3.(a) After the issuance of a request for information (RFI) and
receipt of bids by the Department of Transportation for litter pickup on State highways and roads,
the Department of Transportation shall first offer the contract to the Department of Adult
Correction upon the same terms and conditions as the most favorable bid received by the
Department of Transportation from a suitable contractor. The Department of Adult Correction
shall have 30 days to accept or decline the offered contract.
SECTION 19B.3.(b) It is the policy of the General Assembly that the Department
of Transportation shall utilize inmate litter crews for litter pickup on State highways and roads
as often as is necessary and practicable.

PART XIX-C. COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

INTERSTATE COMPACT FEES TO SUPPORT TRAINING PROGRAMS AND
EQUIPMENT PURCHASES SECTIONS
SECTION 19C.1. Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 148-65.7, fees collected
for the Interstate Compact Fund during the 2025-27 fiscal biennium may be used by the
Department of Adult Correction during the 2025-27 fiscal biennium to provide training programs
and equipment purchases for the Division of Community Supervision, but only to the extent
sufficient funds remain available in the Fund to support the mission of the Interstate Compact
Program.

PART XIX-D. REHABILITATION AND REENTRY [RESERVED]

PART XIX-E. PUBLIC SAFETY [RESERVED]

PART XIX-F. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY ADMINISTRATION
[RESERVED]

PART XIX-G. LAW ENFORCEMENT [RESERVED]

PART XIX-H. JUVENILE JUSTICE [RESERVED]

PART XIX-I. EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AND NATIONAL GUARD [RESERVED]

PART XIX-J. STATE BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 111

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

CODIFY USE OF SEIZED AND FORFEITED PROPERTY
SECTION 19J.1. G.S. 14-2.3 reads as re-written:
"§ 14-2.3. Forfeiture of gain acquired through criminal activity.
…
(d) Seized and forfeited assets transferred to the Department of Justice, Department of
Adult Correction, the State Bureau of Investigation, the State Highway Patrol, and the
Department of Public Safety, pursuant to applicable federal law shall be credited to the budget
of the recipient department and shall result in an increase of law enforcement resources for that
department. The Department of Justice, Department of Adult Correction, State Bureau of
Investigation, State Highway Patrol, and the Department of Public Safety shall each make the
following reports to the chairs of House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice
and Public Safety and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety:
(1) A report upon receipt of any assets.
(2) A report that shall be made prior to the use of the assets on their intended use
and the departmental priorities on which the assets may be expended.
(3) A report on receipts, expenditures, encumbrances, and availability of these
assets for the previous fiscal year, which shall be
(e) The General Assembly finds that the use of seized and forfeited assets transferred
pursuant to federal law for new personnel positions, new projects, acquisition of real property,
repair of buildings where the repair includes structural change, and construction of or additions
to buildings may result in additional expenses for the State in future fiscal periods. Therefore, the
Department of Justice, Department of Adult Correction, State Bureau of Investigation, State
Highway Patrol, and the Department of Public Safety are prohibited from using these assets for
such purposes without the prior approval of the General Assembly.
(f) Nothing in this section prohibits State law enforcement agencies from receiving funds
from the United States Department of Justice, the United States Department of the Treasury, and
the United States Department of Health and Human Services."

CONTINUED EXEMPTION FROM IT CONSOLIDATION
SECTION 19J.2. G.S. 143B-1320 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1320. Definitions; scope; exemptions.
…
(b) Exemptions. – Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, this Article does not
apply to the following entities: the General Assembly, the Judicial Department, the Community
Colleges System Office, The University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions, the
Office of the State Auditor, the State Board of Elections, the State Highway Patrol, and the
Department of State Treasurer. Treasurer, and the State Bureau of Investigation. These entities
may elect to participate in the information technology programs, services, or contracts offered
by the Department, including information technology procurement, in accordance with the
statutes, policies, and rules of the Department. The election shall be made in writing, as follows:
(1) For the General Assembly, by the Legislative Services Commission.
…
(9) For the Investment Authority under Part I of Article 6 of Chapter 147 of the
General Statutes, by the Board of Directors of the Authority.
(10) For the State Bureau of Investigation, by the Director.
…."

ADD OFFENSES FOR WHICH ORDERS FOR ELECTRONIC SURVEILLANCE MAY
BE GRANTED
SECTION 19J.3. G.S. 15A-290 reads as rewritten:
Page 112 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 15A-290. Offenses for which orders for electronic surveillance may be granted.
(a) Orders authorizing or approving the interception of wire, oral, or electronic
communications may be granted, subject to the provisions of this Article and Chapter 19 of Title
18 of the United States Code, when the interception does any of the following:
(1) May provide or has provided evidence of the commission of, or any
conspiracy to commit, any of the following:
a. Any of the drug-trafficking violations listed in G.S. 90-95(h).
b. A continuing criminal enterprise in violation of G.S. 90-95.1.
c. The offense of money laundering in violation of G.S. 14-118.8.
…
(c) Orders authorizing or approving the interception of wire, oral, or electronic
communications may be granted, subject to the provisions of this Article and Chapter 119 of
Title 18 of the United States Code, when the interception may provide, or has provided, evidence
of any of the following offenses, or any conspiracy to commit these offenses, or when the
interception may expedite the apprehension of persons indicted for the commission of these
offenses:
(1) Any felony offense against a minor, including any violation of G.S. 14-27.31
(Sexual activity by a substitute parent or custodian), G.S. 14-27.32 (Sexual
activity with a student), G.S. 14-41 (Abduction of children), G.S. 14-43.11
(Human trafficking), G.S. 14-43.12 (Involuntary servitude), G.S. 14-43.13
"(Sexual servitude), G.S. 14-190.16 (First degree sexual exploitation of a
minor), G.S. 14-190.17 (Second degree sexual exploitation of a minor),
G.S. 14-202.1 (Taking indecent liberties with children), G.S. 14-205.2(c) or
(d) (Patronizing a prostitute who is a minor or has a mental disability), or
G.S. 14-205.3(b) (Promoting prostitution of a minor or a person who has a 1
mental disability).
…
(5) Any offense involving the manufacture, assembly, possession, storage,
transportation, sale, purchase, delivery, or acquisition of weapons of mass
death or destruction in violation of G.S. 14-288.8 or the adulteration or
misbranding of food, drugs, cosmetics, etc., with the intent to cause serious
injury in violation of G.S. 14-34.4.
(6) Any felony offense involving human trafficking of an adult, including but not
limited to violation of G.S. 14-43.11 (Human trafficking), G.S. 14-43.12
(Involuntary servitude), or G.S. 14-43.13 (Sexual servitude).
…."

TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS RELATED TO MAKING THE STATE BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION AN INDEPENDENT DEPARTMENT
SECTION 19J.4. The Revisor of Statutes shall replace a reference to the Department
of Public Safety with a reference to the State Bureau of Investigation in the following statutes:
(1) Article 27A of Chapter 14.
(2) G.S. 18B-902.
(3) G.S. 74C-8.1.
(4) G.S. 74D-2.1.
(5) G.S. 84-24.
(6) G.S. 90D-7.
(7) G.S. 90-11.
(8) G.S. 90-30.
(9) G.S. 90-102.1.
(10) G.S. 90-210.25.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 113

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(11) G.S. 90-224.
(12) G.S. 93A-4.
(13) G.S. 95-47.2.
(14) G.S. 110-90.2.
(15) G.S. 143B-901.
(16) G.S. 143B-902.
(17) G.S. 143B-903.
(18) G.S. 143B-904.
(19) G.S. 160A-304.

CONTINUE POLICE AUTHORITY
SECTION 19J.5. G.S. 20-49 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-49. Police authority of Division.
All members of the Highway Patrol and law enforcement officers of the Department of Public
Safety and the State Bureau of Investigation shall have the power:
…."

CONTINUE EXPANDED SCOPE OF CONCEALED HANDGUN PERMITS
SECTION 19J.6. G.S. 14-415.27 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-415.27. Expanded permit scope for certain persons.
Notwithstanding G.S. 14-415.11(c), any of the following persons who has a concealed
handgun permit issued pursuant to this Article or that is considered valid under G.S. 14-415.24
is not subject to the area prohibitions set out in G.S. 14-415.11(c) and may carry a concealed
handgun in the areas listed in G.S. 14-415.11(c) unless otherwise prohibited by federal law:
…
(8) A person employed by the Department of Public Safety who has been 8
designated in writing by the Secretary of the Department and who has in the
9 person's possession written proof of the designation.
(8a) A person employed by the State Bureau of Investigation who has been
designated in writing by the Director of the Bureau and who has in the
person’s possession written proof of the designation.
…."

DIVISION OF CRIMINAL INFORMATION UPDATES
SECTION 19J.7. G.S. 143B-905 is recodified as G.S. 143B-208.19.
G.S. 143B-208.19 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-208.19. Division of Criminal Information.
(a) The Department of Public SafetyState Bureau of Investigation (Bureau) is authorized
to establish, devise, maintain and operate a system for receiving and disseminating to
participating agencies information collected, maintained and correlated under authority of
G.S. 143B-902. The system shall be known as the Criminal Information Network. Division of
Criminal Information (DCI).
(b) The Department of Public SafetyBureau is authorized to cooperate with the Division
of Motor Vehicles, Department of Administration, and other State, local and federal agencies and
organizations in carrying out the purpose and intent of this section, and to utilize, in cooperation
with other State agencies and to the extent as may be practical, computers and related equipment
as may be operated by other State agencies.
(c) The Department of Public Safety,Bureau, after consultation with participating
agencies, shall adopt rules and regulations governing the organization and administration of the
Criminal Information Network,DCI, including rules and regulations governing the types of
information relating to the administration of criminal justice to be entered into the system, and
Page 114 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
who shall have access to such information. The rules and regulations governing access to the
Criminal Information NetworkDCI shall not prohibit an attorney who has entered a criminal
proceeding in accordance with G.S. 15A-141 from obtaining information relevant to that
criminal proceeding. The rules and regulations governing access to the Criminal Information
NetworkDCI shall not prohibit an attorney who represents a person in adjudicatory or
dispositional proceedings for an infraction from obtaining the person's driving record or criminal
history.
(d) The Department Bureau may impose monthly fees on participating agencies. The
monthly fees collected under this subsection shall be used to offset the cost of operating and
maintaining the Criminal Information Network.DCI. The fee amount varies depending upon the
type of device. For a desktop device, the monthly fee is twenty-five dollars ($25) per device. For
a mobile device, the monthly fee is twelve dollars ($12) per device.
(1) The Department may impose a monthly circuit fee on agencies that access the
Criminal Information Network through a circuit maintained and operated by
the Department of Public Safety. The amount of the monthly fee is three
hundred dollars ($300.00) plus an additional fee amount for each device
linked to the Network. The additional fee amount varies depending upon the
type of device. For a desktop device after the first seven desktop devices, the
additional monthly fee is twentyfive dollars ($25.00) per device. For a mobile
device, the additional monthly fee is twelve dollars ($12.00) per device.
(2) The Department may impose a monthly device fee on agencies that access the
Criminal Information Network through some other approved means. The
amount of the monthly device fee varies depending upon the type of device.
For a desktop device, the monthly fee is twentyfive dollars ($25.00) per
device. For a mobile device, the fee is twelve dollars ($12.00) per device."

SBI/WORKERS' COMPENSATION FOR RESERVE LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS
SECTION 19J.8. G.S. 143B-1208.13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1208.13. Personnel of the State Bureau of Investigation.
The Director of the State Bureau of Investigation may appoint a sufficient number of
assistants who shall be competent and qualified to do the work of the Bureau. The Director shall
be responsible for making all hiring and personnel decisions of the Bureau. Persons serving as
reserve law enforcement officers of the Bureau are considered employees of the Bureau for
workers' compensation purposes while performing duties assigned or approved by the Director
of the Bureau or the Director's designee."

PART XIX-K. STATE HIGHWAY PATROL [RESERVED]

PART XX. ADMINISTRATION

SALE OF STATE PROPERTY/NEGATIVE RESERVE
SECTION 20.1.(a) There is established a negative reserve in the amount of
twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be supported by the
sale of State-owned real property.
SECTION 20.1.(b) The Department of Administration (DOA) shall identify, market,
and execute the sale of State property sufficient to generate proceeds to fill the negative reserve
established by subsection (a) of this section. DOA shall take all actions necessary to ensure the
timely deposit of proceeds into the appropriate budget code to offset the reserve.
SECTION 20.1.(c) DOA shall report quarterly to the Office of State Budget and
Management (OSBM) and the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations on the
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 115

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
status of property sales and the amount of proceeds collected toward satisfying the negative
reserve.

PROCUREMENT SAVINGS/NEGATIVE RESERVE
SECTION 20.2.(a) The Department of Administration (DOA) and the Department
of Information Technology (DIT) shall jointly develop and implement procurement strategies,
including strategic sourcing, consolidated procurement, enterprise contracts, and improved
demand management, to achieve statewide savings of at least forty million dollars ($40,000,000),
of which no less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be recurring savings, with the
remainder being nonrecurring.
SECTION 20.2.(b) A negative reserve in the amount of thirty million dollars
($30,000,000), of which at least ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be recurring, is
established for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be supported by procurement savings achieved
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 20.2.(c) State agencies that generate procurement savings pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section may retain twenty-five percent (25%) of the savings realized. The
remaining seventy-five percent (75%) of savings, including no less than ten million dollars
($10,000,000) in recurring savings, shall be transferred and credited toward filling the negative
reserve established by subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 20.2.(d) The Office of State Budget and Management (OSBM) shall
work jointly with DOA and DIT to (i) verify procurement savings, (ii) administer the retention
of savings by agencies, (iii) ensure the transfer of savings necessary to fill the negative reserve,
and (iv) reconcile savings across the fiscal year.
SECTION 20.2.(e) DOA, DIT, and OSBM shall provide quarterly reports to the
Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations on procurement savings achieved,
agency savings retained, and progress toward filling the negative reserve.

PART XXI. ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS [RESERVED]

PART XXII. OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR

DIRECTED GRANTS REVIEW BY THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR
SECTION 22.1. G.S. 143C-6-23 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"§ 143C-6-23. State grant funds: administration; oversight and reporting requirements.
…
(g1) Enhanced Audit Review of Directed Grants. – The following applies to directed
grants to non-State entities:
(1) Definitions. – For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:
a. Directed grant. – Nonrecurring funds allocated by a State agency to a
non-State entity as directed by an act of the General Assembly.
(2) Review required. – Beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year and each fiscal
year thereafter, the Office of the State Auditor shall conduct direct review of
directed grants to non-State entities. In carrying out this subsection, the Office
of the State Auditor shall conduct audits, investigations, verification audits, or
other examinations authorized by Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General
Statutes sufficient to determine whether directed grant funds were used for
authorized purposes and in accordance with applicable law and grant terms.
(3) Scope of review. – Reviews conducted under this subsection shall extend
beyond confirmation that a recipient or administering State agency has
submitted required certifications, reports, or policies and shall include testing,
as the State Auditor deems appropriate, of all the following:
Page 116 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Whether directed grant funds were used only for the purposes for
which they were appropriated or otherwise authorized by law.
b. Whether expenditures were supported by adequate documentation and
were properly charged to the directed grant.
c. Whether transactions involving officers, directors, employees, family
members, affiliated entities, or related parties present actual or
apparent conflicts of interest, self-dealing, or other misuse of public
funds.
d. Whether funds were transferred, subgranted, retained, or commingled
in a manner inconsistent with law, grant terms, or the purposes of the
appropriation.
e. Whether there is evidence of fraud, misrepresentation, waste, abuse,
or other improper governmental activity involving directed grant
funds.
f. Whether the recipient maintained adequate internal controls to
safeguard directed grant funds and prevent or detect unauthorized
transactions.
(4) Selection of recipients. – Each fiscal year, the Office of the State Auditor shall
select directed grant recipients for review as follows:
a. The Office of the State Auditor shall review not less than five percent
(5%) of directed grant recipients with active directed grants during that
fiscal year. In selecting recipients for review, the Office of the State
Auditor shall include recipients from multiple administering State
agencies and multiple grant-size tiers.
b. The Office of the State Auditor shall review not less than five percent
(5%) of recently closed directed grants selected from grants that
remained active or were closed out during the preceding 24 months.
c. The Office of the State Auditor shall employ an appropriate sampling
or selection methodology that is reasonable and consistent with
accepted auditing practices and the requirements of (4a) and (4b) of
this subsection.
d. The Office of the State Auditor shall review each directed grant
recipient identified in writing by an administering State agency or the
Director of the Budget upon identification of potential risks or
indications of improper management of funds.
e. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the authority of the State Auditor
to conduct additional reviews of directed grant recipients as otherwise
authorized by law.
(5) Direct access to information. – For reviews conducted under this subsection,
the Office of the State Auditor may obtain information directly from the
recipient or any subrecipient, contractor, affiliate, or other person or entity
handling directed grant funds on behalf of the recipient to the full extent
authorized by Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes. The
administering State agency shall provide to the Office of the State Auditor,
upon request, copies of grant agreements, amendments, reports, payment
records, and other documents already in its possession relating to a selected
directed grant.
(6) Agency monitoring not sufficient. – Compliance by the recipient with
reporting requirements, the filing of a conflict-of-interest policy, the
submission of audit reports, or monitoring by the administering State agency
shall not satisfy or limit the review required by this subsection and shall not
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 117

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
restrict the scope of examination undertaken by the Office of the State
Auditor.
(7) Annual report. – No later than October 15 of each year, the State Auditor shall
submit a report on the reviews conducted under this subsection to the Joint
Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations the chairs of the Senate
Committee on Appropriations/Base Budget, the chairs of the House
Appropriations Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall
include all of the following:
a. The number of active and closed directed grant recipients and directed
grants eligible for review during the prior fiscal year.
b. The sampling and selection methodology used to select recipients and
grants for review.
c. The number and type of audits, investigations, or other examinations
performed.
d. A summary of findings, including questioned costs, unsupported
expenditures, internal control weaknesses, related-party transactions,
actual or apparent conflicts of interest, and any evidence of fraud,
waste, abuse, or other improper governmental activity.
e. The number of recipients reviewed because they were on the
Suspension of Funding List or were identified by an administering
State agency, the Office of State Budget and Management, or the
Director of the Budget.
f. Any referrals made to the Attorney General, the State Bureau of
Investigation, the Department of Revenue, or any other agency.
g. Any recommendations for statutory or administrative changes to
improve oversight of directed grants.
(8) Public record. Notwithstanding G.S. 147-64(d), the report required by
subdivision (7) of this subsection is a public record pursuant to G.S. 132-1(a)."

PART XXIII. BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT

STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND FLEXIBILITY 2026
SECTION 23.1. S.L. 2025-97 reads as rewritten:
"…
"SECTION 6.9.(c) To implement subsection (b) of this section, the Director of the Budget
shall make nonrecurring, budget-neutral adjustments as follows:
(1) Reduce, on a nonrecurring basis, the 2025-2026 or 2026-2027 fiscal year net
General Fund appropriation for each agency receiving SFRF pursuant to this
section by an amount equal to the SFRF reclassified to that agency.
(2) Increase, on a nonrecurring basis, the net General Fund appropriation for each
agency from which SFRF were reclassified under this section by an amount
equal to the SFRF removed from that agency.
(3) Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-1-2(b), the net General Fund appropriations made
under subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be used only for the projects for
which SFRF were reduced under this section and shall not revert but shall
remain available until the earlier of project completion or June 30, 2027.
(4) In no event shall a project from which SFRF are reclassified receive net
General Fund appropriations in excess of the project's unexpended SFRF
balance as of the date of reclassification.
"SECTION 6.9.(d) To reconcile project-level allocations with available SFRF balances,
OSBM, through NCPRO, may adjust SFRF project allocations by up to ten dollars ($10.00) per
Page 118 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
project. Adjustments under this subsection are technical and shall not change project scope or
shift funds between projects. Nothing in this subsection limits or supersedes a reclassification
authorized by subsection (b) of this section.
"SECTION 6.9.(e) No later than April 15, 2026 December 15, 2026, OSBM and NCPRO
shall jointly report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the
Fiscal Research Division on all actions taken under this section, including:
(1) For each agency and project meeting the revenue-loss criteria in subsection
(a) of this section, the project name and the amount of remaining unexpended
SFRF as of December 31, 2025 June 30, 2026. The report shall also identify
which projects are complete and have excess SFRF funds and which SFRF
projects need additional funds for completion.
(2) For each agency and project from which unexpended SFRF were reclassified,
the project name and the amount of the corresponding nonrecurring net
General Fund appropriation provided in lieu of SFRF. (3) For each agency
and project receiving SFRF pursuant to the reclassification, the project name
and the amount of SFRF provided. The report shall also certify that all SFRF
were obligated on or before December 31, 2024, and that expenditures are
being made consistent with 31 C.F.R. Part 35 and related United States
Department of the Treasury guidance.
"SECTION 6.9.(f) The Director of the Budget shall ensure that implementation of this
section results in no change to the net General Fund appropriations in the 2025-2026 or
2026-2027 fiscal year."

ADDITIONAL STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND FLEXIBILITY
SECTION 23.2.(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, and
subject to the conditions set out in part (b) of this section, below, the North Carolina Pandemic
Recovery Office (NCPRO), in consultation with the Director of the Budget, may reallocate State
Fiscal Recovery Funds (SFRF) appropriated by this act or any act of the General Assembly,
including but not limited to:
(a) S.L. 2021-180.
(b) S.L. 2021-189.
(c) S.L. 2022-6.
(d) S.L. 2022-74.
(e) S.L. 2023-134.
(f) S.L. 2024-1.
(g) S.L. 2024-40.
(h) S.L. 2024-53.
(i) S.L. 2024-55.
SECTION 23.2.(b) The funds set out in part (a) of this section may be reallocated
only when all of the following conditions are met:
(a) The appropriated funds have not been expended by September 30, 2026.
(b) There is a reasonable expectation that the funds will not be expended before the
deadline established by applicable federal law or guidance.
(c) The reallocation is made to support SFRF related activities authorized and receiving
appropriations under this act or one of the acts listed above in part (a) of this Section, and adhering
to Federal SFRF Expenditure Category 5 (Water, Sewer, or Broadband Infrastructure) guidance.
Reallocated funds shall not be used for any new activity, purpose, or program.
SECTION 23.2.(c) Any funds remain after the reallocation process authorized in
subsection (b) shall be allocated to the State Treasurer up to an amount equal to the remaining
unreimbursed COVID-19 related expenses incurred by the North Carolina State Health Plan for
Teachers and State Employees between March 3, 2021 and December 31, 2024.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 119

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 23.2.(d) To the extent that funds reallocated pursuant to this section are
unappropriated, including interest accrual exceeding that which is anticipated in this act, those
funds are hereby appropriated and available for use pursuant to this section.
SECTION 23.2.(e) Reporting. – Beginning September 30, 2026, the Office of State
Budget and Management (OSBM) shall report to the Fiscal Research Division quarterly on the
reallocations made pursuant to this section in the same manner as required in S.L. 2025-97,
Section 6.9.(e).

INTEREST TO SUPPORT NC PANDEMIC RECOVERY EFFORTS
SECTION 23.3. Any interest earned on the following is appropriated to the Office
of State Budget and Management (OSBM) for operations pertaining to pandemic recovery and
may be utilized in accordance with the requirements set out in Section 6.9 of S.L. 2025-97:
(a) Local Fiscal Recovery Fund, Budget Code 63009, Budget Fund 610000;
(b) Homeowner Assistance Fund, Budget Code 23023, Budget Fund 214150, that is
allowed to be retained by the State; and
(c) Economic Development Assistance Strategy and Tourism grant funds, Budget Code
23025, Budget Funds 214250 and 214251, that is allowed to be retained by the State.
(d) Project Fund, Budget Code 23022, Budget Fund 214102, that is allowed to be retained
by the state.

REMOVE DIRECTOR OF THE BUDGET FROM APPROVAL OF RIF SEVERANCE
WAGES AND RIF DISCONTINUED SERVICE RETIREMENT ALLOWANCES
SECTION 23.4.(a) G.S. 126-8.5(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 126-8.5. Discontinued service retirement allowance and severance wages for certain
State employees.
(a) When the Director of the Budget determines that the closing of a State institution or
a reduction in force will accomplish economies in the State Budget, the State employees who
were separated from employment as a result of the closure or reduction in force shall receive
from the last employing agency either a discontinued service retirement allowance or severance
wages, wages to any affected State employee, provided reemployment is not available. As used
in this section, "economies in the State Budget" means economies resulting from elimination of
a job and its responsibilities or from a lack of funds to support the job. The agency head shall
determine, in his or her discretion, In determining whether to pay a discontinued service
retirement allowance or severance wages, the Director of the Budget shall consider the
recommendation of the department head involved and any recommendation of after the
opportunity for consultation with the Director of the Office of State Budget and Management and
the Director of the Office of State Human Resources. Severance wages shall not be paid to an
employee who chooses a discontinued service retirement. Severance wages shall not be subject
to employer or employee retirement contributions. Severance wages shall be paid according to
the policies adopted by the State Human Resources Commission.
…."
SECTION 23.4.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to all
discontinued service retirement allowances and severance wages paid on or after that date.

ADDRESS RESPONSIBILITIES FOR QUALIFIED EXCESS BENEFIT
ARRANGEMENT WHEN THE FINAL EMPLOYER OF A MEMBER IS NOT THE
MEMBER'S EMPLOYER FOR AVERAGE FINAL COMPENSATION
CALCULATIONS
SECTION 23.5.(a) G.S. 135-151(d1) reads as rewritten:
"(d1) The last employer of a payee who retires on or after August 1, 2016, and who receives
any supplemental benefit payment under this section shall be required to reimburse the QEBA in
Page 120 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the amount of any supplemental benefit payment made to that payee. If the employer associated
with the payee member's last month of membership service did not report to the Retirement
System any compensation paid to the payee member during the period used to compute the payee
member's average final compensation, then that last employer of the payee shall not reimburse
the QEBA as described in this subsection, but instead the employer or employers who reported
compensation during the payee member's average final compensation period shall each reimburse
the QEBA in an amount equal to the employer's share of the total reimbursement required under
this subsection, allocated proportionally to each employer based on the total amount of
compensation to the payee member that each employer reported during the period used to
compute the payee member's average final compensation. The reimbursement amount shall be
calculated on an annual basis every calendar year. For purposes of calculating the reimbursement
amount, the Board of Trustees may include a pro rata share of direct costs attributable to
administration of the QEBA. The total amount of reimbursement owed by The University of
North Carolina and UNC Health Care shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000)
annually. The Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly shall be required to review all
reimbursement amounts prior to notifying an employer of the reimbursement amount owed.
The employer shall have 60 calendar days from the date of notification of the reimbursement
amount owed to pay the amount in full or the employer shall be assessed a penalty, in lieu of
interest, of one percent (1%) per month, or fraction thereof, that the payment is made beyond the
due date."
SECTION 23.5.(b) G.S. 128-38.10(d1) reads as rewritten:
"(d1) The last employer of a payee who retires on or after August 1, 2016, and who receives
any supplemental benefit payment under this section shall be required to reimburse the QEBA in
the amount of any supplemental benefit payment made to that payee. The reimbursement amount
shall be calculated on an annual basis every calendar year. For purposes of calculating the
reimbursement amount, the Board of Trustees may include a pro rata share of direct costs
attributable to administration of the QEBA. If the employer associated with the payee member's
last month of membership service did not report to the Retirement System any compensation
paid to the payee member during the period used to compute the payee member's average final
compensation, then that last employer of the payee shall not reimburse the QEBA as described
in this subsection, but instead the employer or employers who reported compensation during the
payee member's average final compensation period shall each reimburse the QEBA in an amount
equal to the employer's share of the total reimbursement required under this subsection, allocated
proportionally to each employer based on the total amount of compensation to the payee member
that each employer reported during the period used to compute the payee member's average final
compensation. The Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly shall be required to review
all reimbursement amounts prior to notifying an employer of the reimbursement amount owed.
The employer shall have 60 calendar days from the date of notification of the reimbursement
amount owed to pay the amount in full or the employer shall be assessed a penalty, in lieu of
interest, of one percent (1%) per month, or fraction thereof, that the payment is made beyond the
due date."
SECTION 23.5.(c) This section becomes effective January 1, 2026 and applies to
all reimbursements assessed on or after that date under G.S. 135-151(d1) or 128-38.10(d1) for
past, existing, and future retirements.

MITIGATE FEDERAL FUNDING ACTIONS
SECTION 23.6.(a) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the Office of State Budget and
Management (OSBM) may use funds available in the Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve to
assist state agencies in mitigating the fiscal impacts of federal spending freezes, federal
government shutdowns, or federal spending reductions. This assistance includes, but is not
limited to, providing legally required personnel-related or contractual expenses resulting from
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 121

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the discontinuation or delay of federal funds that an agency cannot otherwise support within
existing resources.
SECTION 23.6.(b) Agencies shall submit documentation of the shortfall resulting
from the discontinuation or delay of federal funds to the Director of the Budget. The Office of
State Budget and Management (OSBM) may, at the discretion of the Director, allocate funds
available to the state agency to meet current liabilities. The funds are appropriated from the
Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve for the purposes set out in this section, at the time the
Director deems such a transfer necessary.
SECTION 23.6.(c) To the extent possible, state agencies shall reimburse these funds
to OSBM. OSBM shall revert all reimbursed funds to the Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve
by June 30, 2027.
SECTION 23.6.(d) Not later than September 1, 2027, OSBM shall submit a written
report to the Senate Appropriations Committee on General Government and Information
Technology, the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on General Government,
the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government, the Joint Legislative
Commission on Governmental Operations, and the Fiscal Research Division which shall include
all of the following for each recipient of funds from OSBM:
(a) The name of any state agency receiving funds pursuant to in subsection (a) of this
section.
(b) The reason for the request for funds, including name of each federal program that was
impacted by a funding spending freeze, a federal government shutdown, or a federal spending
reduction, and a brief description of the impact.
(c) The amount of funds provided from the Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve.
(d) The amount of funds reimbursed to the Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve.

PAYROLL MODERNIZATION RESERVE AND OVERSIGHT BOARD
SECTION 23.7.(a) There is established in the General Fund a Payroll Modernization
Reserve (Reserve) to provide funds for the replacement of the State’s payroll and Core HR
systems. The State Budget Director shall reserve to the Payroll Modernization Reserve from
funds available in the IT Reserve the sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. Funds in the Reserve shall not revert and shall
remain available until expended for the purposes set forth in this section.
SECTION 23.7.(b) There is established the Payroll Modernization Oversight Board
(Board) to oversee the planning, procurement, and implementation of the replacement payroll
system. The Board shall consist of the following five members:
(1) The State Chief Information Officer, who will serve as chair.
(2) The State Controller.
(3) The State Budget Director.
(4) The State Treasurer.
(5) The Director of the Office of State Human Resources.
SECTION 23.7.(c) The Board shall:
(1) Determine the payroll functions and requirements necessary for the State’s
payroll system.
(2) Develop and issue a request for proposals (RFP) for the replacement payroll
system.
(3) Evaluate proposals and select the vendor or solution that best meets the State's
needs no later than July 1, 2027.
(4) Make all decisions by majority vote.
SECTION 23.7.(d) Beginning January 30, 2027, and semiannually thereafter on
January 30 and June 30 of each year, the Board shall report on its progress to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on General Government. The report shall include, at a minimum, updates
Page 122 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
on planning, procurement, implementation milestones, expenditures from the Reserve, and any
recommendations for legislative action.

REMOVING OBSOLETE REPORTING REQUIREMENTS TO STREAMLINE
GOVERNMENT
SECTION 23.8.(a) The following statutes related to reporting requirements are
repealed:
(a) G.S. 150B-21.28.
(b) S.L. 2023-134-5.6.(j).
(c) G.S. 166A-19.42.(c).
SECTION 23.8.(b) G.S. 143C-4-6(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Fiscal Reports. – In years when the most recent enacted budget exceeds six percent
(6%) of State personal income, theThe Office of State Budget and Management and the Fiscal
Research Division of the General Assembly shall each submit an a tentative estimate of total
State personal income for the upcoming fiscal year to the General Assembly alongside each
issuance of a joint General Fund revenue forecastno later than February 1 of each year. The
Office and the Fiscal Research Division shall each submit a final projection of total State personal
income for the upcoming fiscal year to the General Assembly no later than May 1 of each year.
The General Assembly shall use the lower of the two final projections to calculate the limitation
on the size of the General Fund operating budget provided in this section."
SECTION 23.8.(c) G.S. 20-7.(i1) reads as rewritten:
"(i1) Restoration Fee. – Any person whose drivers license has been revoked pursuant to
the provisions of this Chapter, other than G.S. 20-17(a)(2) shall pay a restoration fee of
eighty-three dollars and 50 cents ($83.50). A person whose drivers license has been revoked
under G.S. 20-17(a)(2) shall pay a restoration fee of one hundred sixty-seven dollars and
twenty-five cents ($167.25). The fee shall be paid to the Division prior to the issuance to such
person of a new drivers license or the restoration of the drivers license. The restoration fee shall
be paid to the Division in addition to any and all fees which may be provided by law. This
restoration fee shall not be required from any licensee whose license was revoked or voluntarily
surrendered for medical or health reasons whether or not a medical evaluation was conducted
pursuant to this Chapter. The eighty-three dollars and 50 cents ($83.50) fee, and the first one
hundred five dollars ($105.00) of the one hundred sixty-seven dollars and twenty-five cents
($167.25) fee, shall be deposited in the Highway Fund. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of the one
hundred sixty-seven dollars and twenty-five cents ($167.25) fee shall be used to fund a statewide
chemical alcohol testing program administered by the Forensic Tests for Alcohol Branch of the
Chronic Disease and Injury Section of the Department of Health and Human Services.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a restoration fee assessed pursuant to this subsection
may be waived by the Division when (i) the restoration fee remains unpaid for more than 10
years from the date of assessment and (ii) the person responsible for payment of the restoration
fee has been issued a drivers license by the Division after the effective date of the revocation for
which the restoration fee is owed. The Office of State Budget and Management shall annually
report to the General Assembly the amount of fees deposited in the General Fund and transferred
to the Forensic Tests for Alcohol Branch of the Chronic Disease and Injury Section of the
Department of Health and Human Services under this subsection."

PART XXIV. BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT – SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
[RESERVED]

PART XXV. OFFICE OF STATE CONTROLLER

OVERPAYMENTS AUDITS
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 123

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 25. G.S. 147-86.22(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Collection Techniques. – The State Controller, in conjunction with the Office of the
Attorney General, shall establish policies and procedures to govern techniques for collection of
accounts receivable. These techniques may include use of credit reporting bureaus, judicial
remedies authorized by law, and administrative setoff by a reduction of a tax refund pursuant to
the Setoff Debt Collection Act, Chapter 105A of the General Statutes, or a reduction of another
payment, other than payroll, due from the State to a person to reduce or eliminate an account
receivable that the person owes the State.
The State Controller shall negotiate a contract with a third party to perform an audit and
collection process of inadvertent overpayments by State agencies to vendors as a result of pricing
errors, neglected rebates and discounts, miscalculated freight charges, unclaimed refunds,
erroneously paid excise taxes, and related errors. The third party shall be compensated only from
funds recovered as a result of the audit. Of the recovered funds and subject to availability, the
State Controller may use up to three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to develop and provide
governmental accounting education for state agency fiscal staff. Savings realized in excess of
costs and any funds used by the State Controller for the aforementioned purpose shall be
transferred from the agency to the Office of State Budget and Management and placed in a special
reserve account for future direction by the General Assembly. Any disputed savings shall be
settled by the State Controller. This paragraph does not apply to the purchase of medical services
by State agencies or payments used to reimburse or otherwise pay for health care services."

ELECTRONIC PAYMENT PROCESSING
SECTION 25.2. G.S. 147-86.22 reads as rewritten:
"§ 147-86.22. Statewide accounts receivable program.
…
(b) Electronic Payment. – Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 147-86.20 and
G.S. 147-86.21, this subsection applies to debts owed a community college, a local school
administrative unit, an area mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse
authority, and the Administrative Office of the Courts, and to debts payable to or through the
office of a clerk of superior court or a magistrate, as well as to debts owed to other State agencies
as defined in G.S. 147-86.20.
The State Controller shall establish policies that allow accounts receivable to be payable
under certain conditions by electronic payment. These policies shall be established with the
concurrence of the State Treasurer. In addition, any policies that apply to debts payable to or
through the office of a clerk of superior court or a magistrate shall be established with the
concurrence of the Administrative Officer of the Courts. The Administrative Officer of the Courts
may also establish policies otherwise authorized by law that apply to these debts as long as those
policies are not inconsistent with the Controller's policies.
A condition of payment by electronic payment is receipt by the appropriate State agency of
the full amount of the account receivable owed to the State agency. A Notwithstanding the
provisions of this section or any other provision of law, a State agency may enter into a contract
with a payment processor that authorizes the processor to retain their fee for providing the
processing service at the time each transaction is made. The terms of any contract executed under
this subsection shall be approved by the State Controller with the concurrence of the State
Treasurer and the Administrative Office of the Courts, as applicable. In the absence of a contract
with a processor to retain service fees, the State agency may charge a debtor who pays by
electronic payment may be required to pay any fee or charge associated with the use of electronic
payment. Fees fees to cover the costs incurred in accepting the payment electronically, but in no
event shall the debtor be required to pay a fee that is greater than four percent (4%) of the
electronic payment. If the State agency does not require the debtor to pay a fee associated with
processing electronic paymentspayments, the fee may be paid out of the General Fund and
Page 124 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Highway Fund if the payment of the fee by the State is economically beneficial to the State and
the payment of the fee by the State has been approved by the State Controller and State Treasurer.
The State Controller and State Treasurer shall consult with the Joint Legislative Commission
on Governmental Operations before establishing policies that allow accounts receivable to be
payable by electronic payment and before authorizing fees associated with electronic payment to
be paid out of the General Fund and Highway Fund. A payment of an account receivable that is
made by electronic payment and is not honored by the issuer of the card or the financial institution
offering electronic funds transfer does not relieve the debtor of the obligation to pay the account
receivable.
…
(d) Annual Report. – The State Controller shall report annually to the Joint Legislative
Commission on Governmental Operations and the Fiscal Research Division on the revenue
deposited into Special Reserve Account 24172 and the disbursement of that revenue."

PART XXVI. ELECTIONS [RESERVED]

PART XXVII. GENERAL ASSEMBLY [RESERVED]

PART XXVIII. GOVERNOR [RESERVED]

PART XXIX. HOUSING FINANCE AGENCY [RESERVED]

PART XXIXA. OFFICE OF STATE HUMAN RESOURCES

HUMAN CAPITAL MANAGEMENT PROJECT PHASE I IMPLEMENTATION
SECTION 29A.1.(a) Section 6.8(b) of S.L. 2025-97 is repealed.
SECTION 29A.1.(b) Section 6.8(c) of S.L. 2025-97 is repealed.
"…
"SECTION 6.8.(c) OSHR may establish one or time limited permanent positions funded by
this section to support the implementation and operation of the HCM system.system; any such
positions may begin in the 2025-2026 fiscal year and may continue into the 2026-2027 fiscal
year, but shall expire no later than June 30, 2027, and shall not be continued or converted to
permanent positions without further legislative authorization."

HCM PHASE I ENHANCEMENTS
SECTION 29A.2.(a) In implementing enhancements to Phase I of the new Human
Capital Management project, in order to reduce duplication of effort and increase accuracy, OSC
shall work with OSHR to automate a bidirectional (two-way) integration, ensuring employee data
is synchronized between the Workday HCM and the current Integrated HR/Payroll system.

PART XXX. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE

DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE LEASE EXPENSES
SECTION 30.1. Section 7(a) of S.L. 2023-114 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 7.(a) The General Assembly authorizes the Department of Insurance to fund,
with receipts or from other non-General Fund and non-State Capital and Infrastructure Fund
sources available to the Department, a sum not to exceed eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000)
to enter into a lease agreement for the temporary relocation of the Department's offices and a sum
not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) for costs associated with the temporary relocation.
The lease agreement funded by the sum authorized in this subsection shall be for a term not to
exceed five years, with the option to renew for two additional five-year consecutive periods. and
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 125

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
shall not be renewed without prior approval from the General Assembly. The Department shall
complete the relocation process no later than October 15, 2023."

PART XXXI. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE – INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
[RESERVED]

PART XXXII. LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR [RESERVED]

PART XXXIII. MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS

CLARIFICATION OF VETERANS DEFINITIONS
SECTION 33.1. G.S. 143B-1213 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1213. Definitions.
Except where provided otherwise, the following definitions apply in this Chapter:
(1) Department. – The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.
(2) Secretary. – The Secretary of Military and Veterans Affairs.
(3) Veteran. – One of the following, as applicable.
a. For qualifying as a voting member of the State Board of Veterans
served honorably during a period of war as defined in Title 38, United
States Code.
b. For entitlement to the services of the Department of Military and
Veterans Affairs, a person who may be entitled to any benefits or rights
under the laws of the United States by reason of service in the Armed
Forces of the United States. under the U.S. Department of Defense
(Army, Marine Corps, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, National Guard)
and the U.S. Department of Homeland Security (Coast Guard), and the
reserve components thereof.
c. For this Chapter, unless otherwise stated "Armed Forces of the United
States" means the Armed Forces of the United States under the United
States Department of Defense (Army, Marine Corps, Navy, Air Force,
Space Force, National Guard) and the United States Department of
Homeland Security (Coast Guard), the reserve components thereof."

UPDATE NORTH CAROLINA VETERANS HOME TRUST FUND TO REFLECT
GENERAL ASSEMBLY APPROPRIATION
SECTION 33.2. G.S. 143B-1293 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1293. North Carolina Veterans Home Trust Fund.
(a) Establishment. – A trust fund shall be established in the State treasury, for the
Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, to be known as the North Carolina Veterans Home
Trust Fund.
(b) Composition. – The trust fund shall consist of all funds and monies received by the
Veterans' Affairs Commission or the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs from the
United States, any federal agency or institution, and any other source, whether as a grant,
appropriation, gift, contribution, devise, or individual reimbursement, for the care and support of
veterans who have been admitted to a State veterans home.
(c) Use of Fund. – The trust fund created in subsection (a) of this section shall be used
by the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs to do the following:
(1) To pay for the care of veterans in said State veterans homes;
(2) To pay the general operating expenses of the State veterans homes,
including the payment of salaries and wages of officials and employees of
Page 126 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
said homes; the Department to the extent such personnel support the
operations, administration, and oversight of said homes;
(3) To remodel, repair, construct, modernize or add improvement to buildings
and facilities at the homes."

AUTHORITY TO APPROVE CAPITAL PROJECTS FUNDED BY THE STATE
VETERANS HOME TRUST FUND
SECTION 33.3. G.S. 143C-8-12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C-8-12. Capital improvement projects from sources other than the General Fund.
…
(c) National Guard Projects. – Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, the
North Carolina National Guard may approve expenditures for a capital project of the North
Carolina National Guard if (i) the project will be funded entirely with federal funds and (iii) any
operating costs associated with the project will be paid entirely with federal funds.
(c1) The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs – Notwithstanding any other
provisions of this chapter, the Department may approve State Veterans Homes capital projects
funded by non-general Fund monies.
(d) Reporting. – The Board of Governors, and the National Guard, and Department of
Military and Veterans Affairs shall report any expenditure made pursuant to this section to the
Office of State Budget and Management and to the Joint Legislative Commission on
Governmental Operations."

NORTH CAROLINA VETERANS CEMETERY TRUST FUND
SECTION 33.4. Article 14 of Chapter 143B of the General Statute is amended by
adding a new Section to read:
"§ 143B-1219. North Carolina Veterans Cemeteries Trust Fund.
(a) There is established the North Carolina Veterans Cemetery Trust Fund (hereinafter
"Fund"), a special fund within the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs. The Fund shall
be maintained as a special fund and shall be administered by the Department to carry out the
provisions of this section for the operations and maintenance of State veterans' cemeteries. Fund
resources may also be used to cover the projected cashflow needs of cemetery expansion projects
funded by grants from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs. Interest accruing from the
monies in the Fund shall be credited to the Fund. The Fund shall consist of the following sources
of funding:
(1) All interest and investment earnings received on monies in the Fund.
(2) Funds or monies received by the Department, the receipt of which does not
exclude any other source of revenue, from the United States, any federal
agency or institution, or individual reimbursement, for the support of veterans
cemeteries.
(3) Any other funds, as directed by the General Assembly.
(b) The Department is authorized to use up to seven hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars ($775,000) of the interest earned on the Fund to create up to ten positions to
maintain and operate the existing state veterans cemeteries. The amount allowed to
the Department for costs under this section may be increased as needed to reflect
legislatively mandated salaryor benefit increases.
(c) The Department is authorized to use an additional twenty-three thousand dollars
($23,000) in the 2026-27 fiscal year to pay for nonrecurring costs associated with these positions
and maintenance costs.
(d) In the event annual earned interest in the Fund is insufficient to cover seven hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars ($775,000), the Department may withdraw additional funds from
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 127

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the balance of the Fund so the total amount withdrawn from the balance and interest are equal to
seven hundred and seventy-five thousand dollars ($775,000)."

PART XXXIV. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE

SCRAP TIRE DISPOSAL TAX
SECTION 34.1. G.S. 105-187.19(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-187.19. Use of tax proceeds.
(a) The Secretary shall distribute the taxes collected under this Article, less the allowance
to the Department of Revenue for administrative expenses, in accordance with this section. The
Secretary may retain the cost of collection by the Department, not to exceed four hundred twenty-
five thousand dollars ($425,000)six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($675,000) a year as
reimbursed to the Department."

WHITE GOODS DISPOSAL TAX
SECTION 34.2. G.S. 105-187.24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-187.24. Use of tax proceeds.
The Secretary shall distribute the taxes collected under this Article, less the Department of
Revenue's allowance for administrative expenses, in accordance with this section. The Secretary
may retain the Department's cost of collection, not to exceed four hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($425,000)six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($675,000) a year, as reimbursement
to the Department.
…."

PART XXXV. SECRETARY OF STATE [RESERVED]

PART XXXVI. TREASURER [RESERVED]

PART XXXVII. GENERAL GOVERNMENT – MISCELLANEOUS [RESERVED]

PART XXXVIII. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY [RESERVED]

PART XXXIX. SALARIES AND BENEFITS

ELIGIBLE STATE-FUNDED EMPLOYEES AWARDED COST-OF-LIVING
ADJUSTMENT/LEGISLATIVE SALARY INCREASES
SECTION 39.1.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, except as provided by subsection (c) of
this section, a person (i) whose salary is set by this Part, pursuant to the North Carolina Human
Resources Act or as otherwise authorized in this act and (ii) who was employed in a State-funded
position on June 30, 2024, is awarded a compensation adjustment as follows:
(1) Two percent and one-half (2.5%) effective July 1, 2025.
(2) As otherwise allowed or provided by law.
SECTION 39.1.(a1) Effective July 1, 2026, except as provided by subsection (c) of
this section, a person (i) whose salary is set by this Part, pursuant to the North Carolina Human
Resources Act or as otherwise authorized in this act and (ii) who is employed in a State-funded
position on June 30, 2025, is awarded a compensation adjustment as follows:
(1) Two percent and one-half (2.5%) effective July 1, 2026.
(2) As otherwise allowed or provided by law.
SECTION 39.1.(b) For the 2025-27 fiscal biennium, the following persons are not
eligible to receive the legislative salary increases provided by subsections (a) and (a1) of this
section:
Page 128 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Employees of local boards of education.
(2) Local community college employees.
(3) Employees of The University of North Carolina
(4) Clerks of superior court compensated under G.S. 7A-101.
(5) Correctional employees to which Section 39.18 of this Part applies.
(6) Law enforcement officers to which Section 39.19.(a) of this Part applies.
(7) Probation and parole officers to which Section 39.20.(a) of this Part applies.
(8) Employees of schools operated by the Department of Health and Human
Services, the Department of Public Safety, and the State Board of Education
who are paid based on the Teacher Salary Schedule.
SECTION 39.1.(c) Permanent part-time employees shall receive the increase
authorized by this section on a prorated and equitable basis.
SECTION 39.1.(d) No eligible State-funded employee shall be prohibited from
receiving the full salary increase provided in this section solely because the employee's salary
after applying the legislative increase is above the maximum of the salary range prescribed by
the State Human Resources Commission.

STATE EMPLOYEE BONUS
SECTION 39.2.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-6-4, any person (i) whose salary is
set by Section 7A.(5), Section 7A.(8), Section 7A.(9) or by this Part, pursuant to the North
Carolina Human Resources Act, who is employed on September 30th, 2026, shall be awarded a
bonus for the 2026-27 fiscal year in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), payable
during the month of October 2026.
SECTION 39.2.(b) Employers of State employees and local education employees
shall provide an additional bonus of five hundred dollars ($500.00), payable during the month
of October 2026, to all permanent full-time State employees and local education employees who
are employed on September 30th, 2026, and who earn an annual salary that does not exceed
seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).
SECTION 39.2.(c) Notwithstanding Subsection (d) of Section 39.33, any funds
appropriated for bonuses in excess of the amounts required to implement the bonuses shall revert
and not be credited to the Pay Plan Reserve.
SECTION 39.2.(d) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the compensation bonuses
awarded by this section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General
Statutes, the Teachers' and State Employees' Retirement System.
SECTION 39.2.(e) The compensation bonuses awarded by this section are not part
of annual salary and shall be paid out separately. The compensation bonus shall be awarded to
eligible permanent employees without regard to an employee's placement within the salary range,
including employees at the top of the salary range. The compensation bonus shall be adjusted pro
rata for permanent part-time employees.

GOVERNOR AND COUNCIL OF STATE
SECTION 39.3.(a) The salary of the Governor, as provided by G.S. 147-11(a), shall
remain unchanged.
SECTION 39.3.(b) The annual salaries for members of the Council of State, payable
monthly, for the 2025-27 fiscal biennium are as follows:

Council of State FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
Lieutenant Governor $172,594 $176,909
Attorney General 172,594 176,909
Secretary of State 172,594 176,909
State Treasurer 172,594 176,909
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 129

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
State Auditor 172,594 176,909
Superintendent of Public Instruction 172,594 176,909
Agriculture Commissioner 172,594 176,909
Insurance Commissioner 172,594 176,909
Labor Commissioner 172,594 176,909

CERTAIN EXECUTIVE BRANCH OFFICIALS
SECTION 39.4.(a) The annual salaries, payable monthly, for the following
executive branch officials for the 2025-27 fiscal biennium are as follows:

Executive Branch Officials FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
Chairman, Alcoholic Beverage
Control Commission $144,365 $147,974
State Controller 201,022 206,048
Commissioner of Banks 162,028 166,079
Chair, Board of Review, Division
of Employment Security 158,931 162,904
Members, Board of Review,
Division of Employment Security 156,989 160,914
Chairman, Parole Commission 158,931 162,904
Full-Time Members of the Parole Commission 146,948 150,622
Chairman, Utilities Commission 180,159 184,663
Members of the Utilities Commission 162,028 166,079
Executive Director, North Carolina
Agricultural Finance Authority 140,590 144,105
State Fire Marshall 142,526 146,089

JUDICIAL BRANCH
SECTION 39.5.(a) The annual salaries, payable monthly, for the following judicial
branch officials for the 2025-27 fiscal biennium are as follows:

Judicial Branch Officials FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
Chief Justice, Supreme Court $208,150 $213,354
Associate Justice, Supreme Court 202,747 207,816
Chief Judge, Court of Appeals 199,541 204,530
Judge, Court of Appeals 194,362 199,221
Judge, Senior Regular Resident Superior Court 178,606 183,071
Judge, Superior Court 173,353 177,687
Chief Judge, District Court 171,737 176,030
Judge, District Court 166,686 170,853
Chief Administrative Law Judge 148,354 152,063
District Attorney 171,520 175,808
Assistant Administrative Officer of the Courts 155,610 159,500
Public Defender 171,520 175,808
Director of Indigent Defense Services 172,779 177,098
SECTION 39.5.(b) The district attorney or public defender of a judicial district, with
the approval of the Administrative Officer of the Courts or the Commission on Indigent Defense
Services, respectively, shall set the salaries of assistant district attorneys or assistant public
defenders, respectively, in that district such that the average salaries of assistant district attorneys
or assistant public defenders in that district, for the 2025-27 biennium, do not exceed one hundred
and three thousand eight hundred thirty-one dollars ($103,831) and the minimum salary of any
Page 130 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
assistant district attorney or assistant public defender is at least fifty-five thousand seven hundred
forty-nine dollars ($55,749), effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 39.5.(b1) The district attorney or public defender of a judicial district,
with the approval of the Administrative Officer of the Courts or the Commission on Indigent
Defense Services, respectively, shall set the salaries of assistant district attorneys or assistant
public defenders, respectively, in that district such that the average salaries of assistant district
attorneys or assistant public defenders in that district, for the 2025-27 biennium, do not exceed
one hundred and six thousand four hundred twenty-seven dollars ($106,427) and the minimum
salary of any assistant district attorney or assistant public defender is at least fifty-seven thousand
twenty-one dollars ($57,143), effective July 1, 2026.

CLERKS OF SUPERIOR COURT
SECTION 39.6.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 7A-101(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The clerk of superior court is a full-time employee of the State and shall receive an
annual salary, payable in equal monthly installments, based on the number of State-funded
assistant and deputy clerks of court as determined by the Administrative Office of Court's
workload formula, according to the following schedule:
Assistants and Deputies Annual Salary
0-19 $111,726$114,519
20-29 123,488126,575
30-49 135,248138,629
50-99 147,010150,685
100+ 149,949153,698."
SECTION 39.6.(a1) Effective July 1, 2026, G.S. 7A-101(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The clerk of superior court is a full-time employee of the State and shall receive an
annual salary, payable in equal monthly installments, based on the number of State-funded
assistant and deputy clerks of court as determined by the Administrative Office of Court's
workload formula, according to the following schedule:
Assistants and Deputies Annual Salary
0-19 $114,519$117,382
20-29 126,575129,739
30-49 138,629142,095
50-99 150,685154,452
100+ 153,698.157,540."

ASSISTANT AND DEPUTY CLERKS OF SUPERIOR COURT
SECTION 39.7.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 7A-102(c1) reads as rewritten:
"(c1) A full-time assistant clerk or a full-time deputy clerk, and up to one full-time deputy
clerk serving as head bookkeeper per county, shall be paid an annual salary subject to the
following minimum and maximum rates:
Assistant Clerks and Annual Salary
Head Bookkeeper
Minimum $40,482$41,494
Maximum 74,79276,662

Deputy Clerks Annual Salary
Minimum $36,315$37,223
Maximum 58,740.60,209."
SECTION 39.7.(a1) Effective July 1, 2026, G.S. 7A-102(c1) reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 131

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(c1) A full-time assistant clerk or a full-time deputy clerk, and up to one full-time deputy
clerk serving as head bookkeeper per county, shall be paid an annual salary subject to the
following minimum and maximum rates:
Assistant Clerks and Annual Salary
Head Bookkeeper
Minimum $41,494$42,531
Maximum 76,66278,579

Deputy Clerks Annual Salary
Minimum $37,22338,154
Maximum 60,209.61,714."

MAGISTRATES
SECTION 39.8.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 7A-171.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-171.1. Duty hours, salary, and travel expenses within county.
(a) The Administrative Officer of the Courts, after consultation with the chief district
judge and pursuant to the following provisions, shall set an annual salary for each magistrate:
(1) A full-time magistrate shall be paid the annual salary indicated in the table set
out in this subdivision. A full-time magistrate is a magistrate who is assigned
to work an average of not less than 40 hours a week during the term of office.
The Administrative Officer of the Courts shall designate whether a magistrate
is full-time. Initial appointment shall be at the entry rate. A magistrate's salary
shall increase to the next step every two years on the anniversary of the date
the magistrate was originally appointed for increases to Steps 1 through 3, and
every four years on the anniversary of the date the magistrate was originally
appointed for increases to Steps 4 through 6.
Table of Salaries of Full-Time Magistrates
Step Level Annual Salary
Entry Rate $47,228$48,409
Step 1 50,71451,982
Step 2 54,47555,837
Step 3 58,45759,918
Step 4 63,22864,809
Step 5 68,97370,697
Step 6 75,415.77,300."
SECTION 39.8.(a1) Effective July 1, 2026, G.S. 7A-171.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-171.1. Duty hours, salary, and travel expenses within county.
(a) The Administrative Officer of the Courts, after consultation with the chief district
judge and pursuant to the following provisions, shall set an annual salary for each magistrate:
(1) A full-time magistrate shall be paid the annual salary indicated in the table set
out in this subdivision. A full-time magistrate is a magistrate who is assigned
to work an average of not less than 40 hours a week during the term of office.
The Administrative Officer of the Courts shall designate whether a magistrate
is full-time. Initial appointment shall be at the entry rate. A magistrate's salary
shall increase to the next step every two years on the anniversary of the date
the magistrate was originally appointed for increases to Steps 1 through 3, and
every four years on the anniversary of the date the magistrate was originally
appointed for increases to Steps 4 through 6.
Table of Salaries of Full-Time Magistrates
Step Level Annual Salary
Entry Rate $48,409$49,619
Page 132 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Step 1 51,98253,282
Step 2 55,83757,233
Step 3 59,91861,416
Step 4 64,80966,429
Step 5 70,69772,464
Step 6 77,300.79,233."

LEGISLATIVE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 39.9.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, the annual salaries of the Legislative
Services Officer and of nonelected employees of the General Assembly in effect on June 30,
2025, shall be legislatively increased by two and one-half percent (2.5%).
SECTION 39.9.(a1) Effective July 1, 2026, the annual salaries of the Legislative
Services Officer and of nonelected employees of the General Assembly in effect on June 30,
2025, shall be legislatively increased by two and one-half percent (2.5%).
SECTION 39.9.(b) Nothing in this act limits any of the provisions of G.S. 120-32.

GENERAL ASSEMBLY PRINCIPAL CLERKS
SECTION 39.10.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 120-37(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The principal clerks shall be full-time officers. Each principal clerk shall be entitled
to other benefits available to permanent legislative employees and shall be paid an annual salary
of one hundred thirty-three thousand nine hundred thirty-six dollars ($133,936), one hundred
thirty-seven two hundred eighty-four ($137,284), payable monthly. Each principal clerk shall
also receive such additional compensation as approved by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, respectively, for additional
employment duties beyond those provided by the rules of their House. The Legislative Services
Commission shall review the salary of the principal clerks prior to submission of the proposed
operating budget of the General Assembly to the Governor and shall make appropriate
recommendations for changes in those salaries. Any changes enacted by the General Assembly
shall be by amendment to this paragraph."
SECTION 39.10.(a1) Effective July 1, 2026, G.S. 120-37(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The principal clerks shall be full-time officers. Each principal clerk shall be entitled
to other benefits available to permanent legislative employees and shall be paid an annual salary
of one hundred thirty seven thousand two hundred eighty-four dollars ($137,284), one hundred
forty thousand seven hundred sixteen dollars ($140,716), payable monthly. Each principal clerk
shall also receive such additional compensation as approved by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, respectively, for additional
employment duties beyond those provided by the rules of their House. The Legislative Services
Commission shall review the salary of the principal clerks prior to submission of the proposed
operating budget of the General Assembly to the Governor and shall make appropriate
recommendations for changes in those salaries. Any changes enacted by the General Assembly
shall be by amendment to this paragraph."

SERGEANTS-AT-ARMS AND READING CLERKS
SECTION 39.11.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 120-37(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The sergeant-at-arms and the reading clerk in each house shall be paid a salary of five
hundred twenty-eight dollars ($528) five hundred forty-one dollars ($541) per week plus
subsistence at the same daily rate provided for members of the General Assembly, plus mileage
at the rate provided for members of the General Assembly for one round trip only from their
homes to Raleigh and return. The sergeants-at-arms shall serve during sessions of the General
Assembly and at such time prior to the convening of, and subsequent to adjournment or recess
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 133

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of, sessions as may be authorized by the Legislative Services Commission. The reading clerks
shall serve during sessions only."
SECTION 39.11.(a) Effective July 1, 2026, G.S. 120-37(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The sergeant-at-arms and the reading clerk in each house shall be paid a salary of five
hundred forty-one dollars ($541) five hundred fifty-five dollars ($555) per week plus subsistence
at the same daily rate provided for members of the General Assembly, plus mileage at the rate
provided for members of the General Assembly for one round trip only from their homes to
Raleigh and return. The sergeants-at-arms shall serve during sessions of the General Assembly
and at such time prior to the convening of, and subsequent to adjournment or recess of, sessions
as may be authorized by the Legislative Services Commission. The reading clerks shall serve
during sessions only."

COMMUNITY COLLEGES
SECTION 39.12.(a) Community college personnel shall receive the following
cost-of-living adjustments:
(1) Effective July 1, 2025, the State Board of Community Colleges shall provide
community college faculty and non-faculty personnel with an
across-the-board salary increase in the amount of two and one-half percent
(2.5%).
(2) Effective July 1, 2026, the State Board of Community Colleges shall provide
community college faculty and non-faculty personnel with an
across-the-board salary increase in the amount of two and one-half percent
(2.5%).
SECTION 39.12.(b) The minimum salaries for nine-month, full-time curriculum
community college faculty for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium are as follows:
Education Level FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
Vocational Diploma/Certificate or Less $44,198 $45,303
Associate Degree or Equivalent 44,813 45,933
Bachelor's Degree 47,479 48,666
Master's Degree or Education Specialist 49,845 51,091
Doctoral Degree 53,255 54,586
SECTION 39.12.(c) No full-time faculty member shall earn less than the minimum
salary for his or her education level. The pro rata hourly rate of the minimum salary for each
education level shall be used to determine the minimum salary for part-time faculty members.

UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA SYSTEM
SECTION 39.13.(a) Effective for the 2025-27 fiscal biennium, the annual salaries
of University of North Carolina SHRA employees shall be increased as provided by Section 39.1
of this act.
SECTION 39.13.(b) For the 2025-27 fiscal biennium, the Board of Governors of
The University of North Carolina may provide EHRA employees a salary increase pursuant to
the policies adopted by the Board. Funds for EHRA compensation increases may be used for any
one or more of the following purposes: (i) merit pay, (ii) across the board increases, (iii)
recruitment bonuses, (iv) retention increases, and (v) any other compensation increase pursuant
to those policies.
SECTION 39.13.(c) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina
shall make a report on the use of compensation increase and bonus funds to the General Assembly
by no later than March 1 of each year of the biennium.

CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS/YOUTH COUNSELOR TECHNICIANS/YOUTH
SERVICES BEHAVIORAL SPECIALISTS – SALARY SCHEDULE
Page 134 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 39.14.(a) State employees serving as correctional officers in the
Department of Adult Correction shall be compensated at a specific pay rate on the basis of a
salary schedule determined according to the duration of the employee's correctional officer work
experience.
SECTION 39.14.(a1) State employees serving in the Department of Public Safety,
Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, shall be compensated at a specific pay
rate set on the basis of a salary schedule determined according to the duration of the employee's
work experience, as follows:
(1) Youth Counselor Technicians shall be paid under the Correctional Officer I
salary schedule.
(2) Youth Behavioral Specialists shall be paid under the Correctional Officer
salary schedule.
(3) Youth Counselors shall be paid under the Correctional Officer III salary
schedule.
SECTION 39.14.(b) The following annual salary schedule applies under subsections
(a) and (a1) of this section for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, effective for on July 1, 2025:

FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
Experience COI COII COIII COI COII COIII
0 $41,383 $42,745 $45,714 $43,452 $44,882 $48,000
1 $44,278 $45,736 $48,915 $46,492 $48,023 $51,361
2 $46,937 $48,529 $51,851 $49,284 $50,955 $54,444
3 $49,283 $50,905 $54,443 $51,747 $53,450 $57,165
4 $51,253 $52,941 $56,620 $53,816 $55,588 $59,451
5 $52,792 $54,528 $58,319 $55,432 $57,254 $61,235
6+ $53,848 $55,619 $59,486 $56,540 $58,400 $62,460

STATE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 39.15.(a) Law enforcement officers of the State Bureau of Investigation,
Alcohol Law Enforcement, and State Capitol Police shall be compensated pursuant to an
experience-based salary schedule and shall be compensated based on the officer's respective
work experience pursuant to the salary schedule in subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 39.15.(b) The following annual salary schedule applies under subsection
(a) of this section for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, effective July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, for
each respective fiscal year:

Years of Experience FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
0 58,825 61,766
1 62,649 65,781
2 66,722 70,058
3 71,059 74,612
4 75,678 79,462
5 80,597 84,627
6+ 85,836 90,128

STATE HIGHWAY PATROL/SALARY SCHEDULE/INCREASE
SECTION 39.16.(a) Law enforcement officers of the State Highway Patrol
compensated pursuant to an experience-based salary schedule shall be compensated based on the
officer's respective work experience pursuant to the salary schedule in subsection (b) of this
section.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 135

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 39.16.(b) The following annual salary schedule applies under subsection
(a) of this section for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, effective July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, for
each respective fiscal year:

Years of Experience FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
0 60,500 63,525
1 64,433 67,655
2 68,620 72,051
3 73,081 76,735
4 77,831 81,723
5 82,889 87,033
6+ 88,277 92,691

PROBATION AND PAROLE OFFICERS/JUVENILE COURT COUNSELORS –
SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 39.17.(a) Probation and parole officers shall be compensated pursuant to
the experience-based salary schedule based on the officer's respective work experience, as
established in subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 39.17.(a1) State employees serving in the Department of Public Safety,
Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, as Juvenile Court Counselors shall be
compensated under the probation and parole officer salary schedule.
SECTION 39.17.(b) The following annual salary schedule applies under subsection
(a) of this section for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, effective July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, for
each respective fiscal year:

Years of Experience FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
0 48,374 49,946
1 51,518 53,192
2 54,869 56,652
3 58,434 60,333
4 62,233 64,256
5 66,278 68,432
6+ 70,586 72,880

STATE AGENCY TEACHERS
SECTION 39.18.(a) Employees of schools operated by the Department of Health
and Human Services, the Department of Public Safety, and the State Board of Education who are
paid on the Teacher Salary Schedule shall be paid as authorized by Section 8.1 of this act.
SECTION 39.18.(b) Employees of the School of Science and Mathematics of The
University of North Carolina who are paid pursuant to a salary schedule adopted by the North
Carolina School of Science and Math Board of Trustees shall be paid in accordance with the
schedule adopted by the Board.

ALL STATE-SUPPORTED PERSONNEL/FLEXIBLE ADMINISTRATION OF
COST-OF-LIVING ADJUSTMENTS
SECTION 39.19.(a) The cost-of-living adjustments authorized by this act:
(1) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, shall be paid effective on July 1, 2025, and do
not apply to persons separated from service due to resignation, dismissal,
reduction in force, death, or retirement or whose last workday is prior to June
30, 2025.
Page 136 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, shall be paid effective on July 1, 2026, and do
not apply to persons separated from service due to resignation, dismissal,
reduction in force, death, or retirement or whose last workday is prior to June
30, 2026.
SECTION 39.19.(b) The Director of the Budget is granted flexibility to administer
the compensation increases enacted by this act.
SECTION 39.19.(c) The State employer contribution rates enacted by this act for
retirement and related benefits may be deemed by the Director of the Budget for administrative
purposes to become effective after July 1 of the applicable fiscal year to provide flexibility in the
collection and reconciliation of salary-related contributions as required by law, provided the
estimated amount contributed to any affected employee benefit trust equals the amount that
would have been contributed to the employee benefit trust if the enacted employer contribution
rates had been effective on July 1 of the applicable fiscal year.
SECTION 39.19.(d) This section applies to all employees paid from State funds,
whether or not subject to or exempt from the North Carolina Human Resources Act, including
employees of public schools, community colleges, and The University of North Carolina.
SECTION 39.19.(e) Notwithstanding any provision of this Part governing
cost‑of‑living adjustments, the salary increases and salary schedule adjustments authorized for
law enforcement officers, correctional officers, probation and parole officers, youth counselors,
juvenile court counselors, healthcare techs, and nurses may be applied to both filled and vacant
positions. These increases shall not be limited to employees employed on a specific date.

MOST STATE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 39.20.(a) Unless otherwise expressly provided by this part, the annual
salaries in effect for the following persons on June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, shall be
legislatively increased as provided by Section 39.1 of this act:
(1) Permanent, full-time State officials and persons whose salaries are set in
accordance with the State Human Resources Act.
(2) Permanent, full-time State officials and persons in positions exempt from the
State Human Resources Act.
(3) Permanent, part-time State employees.
(4) Temporary and permanent hourly State employees.

USE OF FUNDS APPROPRIATED FOR COST-OF-LIVING ADJUSTMENT/BENEFIT
INCREASES
SECTION 39.21.(a) The Office of State Budget and Management shall ensure that
the appropriations made in this act for cost-of-living adjustments and employee benefits are used
only for these purposes.
SECTION 39.21.(b) If the Director of the Budget determines that funds appropriated
to a State agency for mandated salary increases and employee benefits exceed the amount
required by that agency for those purposes, the Director may reallocate those funds to other State
agencies that received insufficient funds for required cost-of-living and benefit increases.
SECTION 39.21.(c) Funds appropriated for cost-of-living adjustments and
employee benefit increases may not be used to adjust the budgeted salaries of vacant positions,
or to provide salary increases in excess of those required by the General Assembly except to
increase the budgeted salary of any position to the minimum of the position's salary range.
SECTION 39.21.(d) Any funds appropriated for cost-of-living adjustment and
employee benefit increases or minimum of salary range adjustments in excess of the amounts
required to implement the increases shall be credited to the Pay Plan Reserve.
SECTION 39.21.(e) No later than March 1 of each year of the biennium, the Office
of State Budget and Management shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 137

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Governmental Operations on the expenditure of funds for legislatively mandated salary increases
and employee benefits. This report shall include at least the following information for each State
agency:
(1) The total amount of funds that the agency received for legislatively mandated
salary increases and employee benefits.
(2) The total amount of funds transferred from the agency to other State agencies
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. This section of the report shall
identify the amounts transferred to each recipient State agency.
(3) The total amount of funds used by the agency for legislatively mandated salary
increases and employee benefits.
(4) The amount of funds used pursuant so subsection (c) of this section.

SALARY-RELATED CONTRIBUTIONS
SECTION 39.22.(a) Section 3.6.(b) of Session Law 2025-89 reads a rewritten:
"SECTION 3.6.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, May 1, 2026 the State's employer contribution
rates budgeted for retirement, health, and related benefits as a percentage of covered salaries for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year for teachers and State employees, State law enforcement officers
(LEOs), the University and Community Colleges Optional Retirement Programs (ORPs), the
Consolidated Judicial Retirement System (CJRS), and the Legislative Retirement System (LRS)
are as set forth below:
Teachers State ORPs CJRS LRS
and State LEOs
Employees
Retirement 17.14%21.52%17.14%21.52% 6.84% 37.73%49.23% 18.26%27.02%
Health 7.33% 7.33% 7.33% 7.33% 7.33%
Disability 0.07% 0.07% 0.07% 0.00% 0.00%
Death 0.13% 0.13% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%
NC 401(k) 0.00% 5.00% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%

Total Contribution
Rate 24.67%29.41%29.67%34.41%14.24% 45.06%56.92% 25.59%34.71%
The rate for health includes two and four-tenths percent (2.40%) for the Public Employee
Health Benefit Fund and four and ninety-three hundredths percent (4.93%) for the Retiree Health
Benefit Fund."
SECTION 39.22.(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-8(d)(3a), effective July 1, 2026, the
State's employer contribution rates budgeted for retirement and related benefits as a percentage
of covered salaries for the 2025-26 fiscal year for teachers and State employees, State law
enforcement officers (LEOs), the University and Community Colleges Optional Retirement
Programs (ORPs), the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System (CJRS), and the Legislative
Retirement System (LRS) are as set forth below:
Teachers
and State State
Employees LEOs ORPs CJRS LRS
Retirement 17.87% 17.87% 6.84% 42.11% 19.40%
Disability 0.07% 0.07% 0.07% 0.00% 0.00%
Death 0.13% 0.13% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%
Retiree Health 7.69% 7.69% 7.69% 7.69% 7.69%
NC 401(k) 0.00% 5.00% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%

Total Contribution
Rate 25.76% 30.76% 14.60% 49.80% 27.09%
Page 138 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The rate for health includes two and two-tenths percent (2.20%) for the Public Employee
Health Benefit Fund and five and forty-nine hundredths percent (5.49%) for the Retiree Health
Benefit Fund.
SECTION 39.22.(c) Effective July 1, 2026, the annual employer contributions for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year, payable monthly, by the State to the North Carolina State Health Plan
for Teachers and State Employees for each covered employee is a maximum of eight thousand
nine hundred twenty-five dollars ($8,925).

PROVIDE SUPPLEMENT FOR RETIREES OF THE TEACHERS' AND STATE
EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM, THE CONSOLIDATED JUDICIAL
RETIREMENT SYSTEM, AND THE LEGISLATIVE RETIREMENT SYSTEM
SECTION 39.23.(a) G.S. 135-5 is amended by adding new subsections to read:
"…
(aaaa) After May 1, 2026, but on or before June 30, 2026, a onetime cost of living
supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of May 1,
2026, and whose retirement commenced on or before May 1, 2026. The payment shall be two
and one-half percent (2.5%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as of May
1, 2026, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies
before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's legal
representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future
supplemental payments.
(bbbb) After September 1, 2026, but on or before October 31, 2026, a onetime cost of living
supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of
September 1, 2025, and whose retirement commenced on or before September 1, 2025. The
payment shall be two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement
allowance payable as of September 1, 2025, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement
commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be
payable to the member's legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a
vested right to any future supplemental payments.
…."
SECTION 39.23.(b) G.S. 135-65 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"…
(ll) After May 1, 2026, but on or before June 30, 2026, a onetime cost of living
supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of May 1,
2026, and whose retirement commenced on or before May 1, 2026. The payment shall be two
and one-half percent (2.5%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as of May
1, 2026, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies
before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's legal
representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future
supplemental payments.
(mm) After September 1, 2026, but on or before October 31, 2026, a onetime cost of living
supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of
September 1, 2025, and whose retirement commenced on or before September 1, 2025. The
payment shall be two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement
allowance payable as of September 1, 2025, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement
commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be
payable to the member's legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a
vested right to any future supplemental payments."
SECTION 39.23.(c) G.S. 120-4.22A is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"…
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 139

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(ff) In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, after May 1, 2026, but on or before
June 30, 2026, a onetime cost of living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of
beneficiaries who are living as of May 1, 2026, and whose retirement commenced on or before
May 1, 2026. The payment shall be two and one-helf percent (2.5%) of the beneficiary's annual
retirement allowance payable as of May 1, 2026, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement
commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be
payable to the member's legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a
vested right to any future supplemental payments.
(gg) In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, after September 1, 2026, but on or
before October 31, 2026, a onetime cost of living supplement payment shall be made to or on
account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2025, and whose retirement
commenced on or before September 1, 2025. The payment shall be two and one-half percent
(2.5%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2025, and
shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the
payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's legal representative. No
beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental
payments."

PART XL. CAPITAL

GENERAL FUND CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS/INTRODUCTION
SECTION 40.1. The appropriations made by the 2026 General Assembly for capital
improvements are for constructing, repairing, or renovating State buildings, utilities, and other
capital facilities, for acquiring sites for them where necessary, and for acquiring buildings and
land for State government purposes.

ADJUSTMENTS TO THE STATE CAPITAL AND INFRASTRUCTURE FUND
SECTION 40.2.(a) G.S. 143C-3-5(b) reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C-3-5. Budget recommendations and budget message.
…
(b) Odd-Numbered Years. – In odd-numbered years the budget recommendations shall
include the following components:
(1) A Recommended State Budget setting forth goals for improving the State with
recommended expenditure requirements, funding sources, and performance
information for each State government program and for each proposed capital
improvement. The Recommended State Budget may be presented in a format
chosen by the Director, except that the Recommended State Budget shall
clearly distinguish program base budget requirements, program reductions,
program eliminations, changes in program fund sources, program expansions,
and new programs, and shall explain all proposed capital improvements in the
context of the Six-Year Capital Improvements Plan and as required by
G.S. 143C-8-6.
(1a) The Governor's Recommended State Budget shall include a base budget,
which shall be presented pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(2) A Recommended Base Budget showing, for each budget code and purpose or
program in State government, accounting detail corresponding to the
Recommended State Budget.
a. The Recommended Base Budget shall employ the North Carolina
Accounting System Uniform Chart of Accounts adopted by the State
Controller to show both uses and sources of funds and shall display in
separate parallel columns all of the following: (i) actual expenditures
Page 140 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and receipts for the most recent fiscal year for which actual
information is available, (ii) the certified budget for the preceding
fiscal year, (iii) the currently authorized budget for the preceding fiscal
year, (iv) program base budget requirements for each fiscal year of the
biennium, (v) proposed expenditures and receipts for each fiscal year
of the biennium, and (vi) proposed increases and decreases.
b. The Recommended Base Budget shall include detailed information on
recommended expenditures for capital improvements as required by
G.S. 143C-8-6.
c. The Recommended Base Budget shall include accurate projections of
receipts, expenditures, and fund balances. Estimated receipts,
including tuition collected by university or community college
institutions, shall be adjusted to reflect actual collections from the
previous fiscal year, unless the Director recommends a change that
will result in collections in the budget year that differ from prior year
actuals, or the Director otherwise determines there is a more
reasonable basis upon which to accurately project receipts. If receipts
are projected to decrease, the corresponding expenditure shall be
decreased in a like amount. Revenue and expenditure detail provided
in the Budget Support Document shall be no less detailed than the two-
digit level in the North Carolina Accounting System Uniform Chart of
Accounts as prescribed by the State Controller.
d. The Recommended Base Budget shall clearly identify all proposed
expenditures supported by existing or proposed appropriations,
including statutory appropriations.
(3) A recommended Current Operations Appropriations Act that makes
appropriations for each fiscal year of the upcoming biennium for the operating
and capital expenses of all State agencies as contained in the Recommended
State Budget.
(4) The biennial State Information Technology Plan as outlined in Part 2 of
Article 15 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes to be consistent in
facilitating the goals outlined in the Recommended State Budget.
(5) A list of budget adjustments made during the prior fiscal year pursuant to
G.S. 143C-6-4 that are included in the proposed base budget for the upcoming
fiscal year. The list of budget adjustments shall identify the revision number,
revision type, revision title, the purpose or programs affected, and the amount
of funds moving between the purpose or programs.
(6) The Governor's Recommended State Budget shall include a transfer to the
Savings Reserve of fifteen percent (15%) of the estimated growth in State tax
revenues that are deposited in the General Fund for each fiscal year of the
upcoming biennium. This subdivision applies only if, and to the extent that,
the balance of the Savings Reserve remains below the recommended Savings
Reserve balance developed pursuant to G.S. 143C-4-2(f).
(7) The Governor's Recommended State Budget shall include a transfer to the
State Capital and Infrastructure Fund of four percent (4%) of the estimated net
State tax revenues that are deposited in the General Fund for each fiscal year
of the upcoming biennium.
…."
SECTION 40.2.(b) G.S. 143C-4-3.1(b) reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C-4-3.1. State Capital and Infrastructure Fund.
…
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 141

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Creation and Source of Funds. – The State Capital and Infrastructure Fund (the Fund)
is established as a special fund in the General Fund to be administered by the Office of State
Budget and Management to carry out the provisions of this section. With the exception of debt
service obligations, appropriations from the Fund may be administered by other State agencies
as deemed necessary by the Office of State Budget and Management. Interest and investment
earnings received on monies in the Fund shall be credited to the Fund. The Fund shall consist of
the following additional sources:
(1) The following amounts transferred from the General Fund at the beginning of
the applicable fiscal year:
a. For the 2021-2022 fiscal year, the sum of one billion three hundred
million dollars ($1,300,000,000).
b. For the 2022-2023 fiscal year, the sum of one billion three hundred
sixty-five million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,365,500,000).
c. For the 2023-2024 fiscal year, the sum of one billion four hundred
twelve million five hundred ninety-two thousand five hundred dollars
($1,412,592,500).
d. For the 2024-2025 fiscal year, the sum of one billion four hundred
sixty-one million three hundred thirty-three thousand two hundred
thirty-eight dollars ($1,461,333,238).
e. For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the sum of one billion one hundred
twenty million dollars ($1,120,000,000).
f. For each fiscal year after the 2025‑2026 fiscal year, the transfer shall
be increased three and one‑half percent (3.5%) over the amount
required under this subdivision for the preceding fiscal year. For each
fiscal year after the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the transfer shall be equal
to the greater of the sum sufficient amount needed for annual debt
service, ongoing projects, and personnel costs funded by the Fund less
the cash balance in the Fund and anticipated interest earnings, or zero.
…."

CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS/STATE CAPITAL AND INFRASTRUCTURE FUND
SECTION 40.3. This subsection authorizes the capital projects listed in the
Committee Report, and appropriates funding from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund to
the Office of State Budget and Management for the 2026-27 fiscal year based upon projected
cash flow needs for the authorized projects. The amounts authorized in this subsection represent
the maximum amounts of funding from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund that may be
expended on each project. An additional action by the General Assembly is required to increase
the maximum authorization for any of the projects listed.

CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT & REPAIRS AND RENOVATIONS APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 40.3.(a) The following agency capital improvement projects have been
assigned a project code for reference to allocations in this Part, past allocations, and for intended
project support by the General Assembly for future fiscal years:

Agency Capital Improvement Project Project Code
Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services
Raleigh State Farmers Market–Improvements DACS23-3
D-6 HQ (Cumberland Co.)–Maintenance Shop Replacement DACS23-7
Research Stations–New Maintenance Shop Facilities DACS23-8
Piedmont Research Station–Bridge DACS23-9
Research Stations–Multipurpose Facilities DACS23-10
Page 142 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
NCFS–New County Offices, Region 3 DACS23-11

Department of Natural and Cultural Resources
Fort Fisher Aquarium–Aquarium Expansion DNCR21-5
NC Museum of History–Expansion DNCR21-13
NC Museum of Art at Winston-Salem/SECCA DNCR23-2
Zoo–
New Aviary DNCR23-1
Modular Staff Offices DNCR26-1
Park Security and Safety DNCR26-2
State Parks–
Access Areas DNCR26-3
Stone Mountain New Visitor Center DNCR26-4
State Historic Sites–
Maintenance and Service Facilities DNCR26-5
African American Monument at the State Capitol DNCR26-6

Department of Health and Human Services
Walter B. Jones–New Medical Office Bldg. DHHS23-1
Broughton Hospital–New Maintenance & Warehouse Facility DHHS23-2
Cherry Hospital–New Maintenance Bldg. DHHS23-3
O'Berry Neuro-Medical Treatment Center DHHS26-1
NC State Laboratory DHHS26-2
Raleigh Medical Examiner's Office Expansion DHHS26-3

Department of Environmental Quality
Water Resource Development Grant–
Tar-Pamlico Flood Mitigation DEQ26-1
Carolina Beach Storm Mitigation DEQ26-2
Kure Beach Storm Mitigation DEQ26-3
Wrightsville Beach Storm Mitigation DEQ26-4
Ocean Isle Storm Mitigation DEQ26-5
Holden Beach Storm Mitigation DEQ26-6
Oak Island Storm Mitigation DEQ26-7
B. Everette Jordan Reservoir DEQ26-8
State and Local Projects DEQ26-9
Environmental Quality Program DEQ26-10

Department of Administration
State Government Executive Headquarters DOA22-1
Department of Instruction Building Renovation DOA22-3
Service Campus DOA23-1
State Agency Lease DOA23-2
Archdale Building Demolition DOA23-3
Caswell Square Demolition DOA23-4
Parking Deck–Wilmington Street DOA23-5

Department of Adult Correction
Institution Roof Systems
DAC26-
1
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 143

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Institution Interior Life Safety Fire Alarm Systems
DAC26-
2
HVAC Enhancements
DAC26-
3

Department of Public InstructionNorth Carolina School for the Deaf
NC School for the Deaf
Superintendent's House DPI25-1
McCord Student Union Building Renovation NCSD26-1

Eastern North Carolina School for the Deaf
Eagles Hall Renovation ENCSD26-1
Vestal Hall and McAdams Hall Life Safety Upgrades ENCSD26-2

Governor Morehead School
Boiler Plant Replacement GMS26-1

Department of Public Instruction
Center for the Advancement of Teaching–
Ocracoke Building Expansion DPI26-1
Cullowhee Residence Halls Renovation DPI26-2

Department of Insurance
Office of State Fire Marshal
Land Development & Training Center DOI21-1

Department of Public Safety
Samarcand–
Live Fire Training Building DPS21-2
Safer Schools Training Academy DPS21-5
State Highway Patrol–
Viper Building DPS21-6
Auditorium DPS23-3
Training Academy Facilities Enhancement–Phases 3-6 DPS23-4
Cadet Dormitory 1 DPS23-7
Juvenile Justice–
Richmond YDC DPS21-1
New Youth Detention Center DPS23-1
Cabarrus–New Modular Office DPS23-6
National Guard–
NCNG Matching Fund NG23-1
Ballentine Building NG23-2
Constable Building NG23-3
Rocky Mount Complex/MILCON NG23-4
Special Forces Complex NG23-5
Louisburg Readiness Center NG23-9
Statewide Standby Generators NG26-1
Kinston Readiness Center NG26-2
Morganton Readiness Center NG26-3
Page 144 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

State Bureau of Investigation
Logistics Building–Phase 2 SBI26-1
Data Center Security Improvements SBI26-2

Department of Military and Veterans Affairs
Fayetteville State Veterans Home DMVA26-1

General Assembly
Education Campus Project
NCGA21-
3
Education Campus Parking Deck
NCGA23-
1

Department of Transportation
North Carolina Global TransPark Authority–
Aircraft Maintenance Repair & Overhaul Facility TRAN23-1

The University of North Carolina
Appalachian State University–
Peacock Hall/Business
UNC/ASU21-
1
Innovation Campus
UNC/ASU21-
2
Hickory Campus
UNC/ASU22-
1
Walker Hall–Interior Renovation
UNC/ASU23-
1
University of North Carolina at Charlotte–
Smith Hall–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/CLT23-1
Colvard Hall–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/CLT23-2
University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill–
Gardner Hall–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/CH23-1
Elizabeth City State University–
Sky Bridge UNC/ECS21-2
Infrastructure Repairs–Phase 3 UNC/ECS23-1
Jenkins Hall/Dixon Hall–Labs/Classroom/Bldg. Renovation UNC/ECS23-2
Safety & Security UNC/ECS25-1
East Carolina University–
Brody School of Medicine UNC/ECU21-1
Howell Science Building North–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/ECU23-1
Leo Jenkins Building/Health Sciences–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/ECU23-2
Medical Examiner Office UNC/ECU23-3
Fayetteville State University–
Butler Targeted Renovation UNC/FSU23-1
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 145

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
H.L. Cook Building Renovation UNC/FSU23-2
North Carolina Agricultural & Technical State University–
Marteena Hall–Renovation, Phase 2 UNC/A&T23-1
Health and Human Sciences Bldg. UNC/A&T23-2
North Carolina Central University–
Dent Building–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/NCC23-1
Edmonds Classroom Building–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/NCC23-2
University Theater Renovation UNC/NCC23-3
North Carolina State University–
Mann Hall–Renovation, Phase 2 UNC/NCS23-1
Dabney Hall–Renovation, Phase 2 UNC/NCS23-2
Polk Hall–Renovation, Phase 2 UNC/NCS23-3
Veterinary School–Large Animal Hospital UNC/NCS23-4
Engineering Classroom Building UNC/NCS23-5
Advanced Research & Test Reactor UNC/NCS23-6
Poe Hall UNC/NCS25-1UNC/NCS24-1
North Carolina School of Science and Math–
Durham Campus
Renovation of Residence Halls UNC/SSM23-2
Academic Commons Addition UNC/SSM23-4
Temporary Housing UNC/SSM25-1
University of North Carolina at Asheville–
Lipinsky Hall–Comp. Modernization/Addition UNC/AVL23-1
Carol Belk Theatre UNC/AVL25-1
University of North Carolina at Charlotte
Smith Hall–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/CLT23-1
University of North Carolina at Greensboro–
Moore Building–Renovation UNC/GBO23-1
University of North Carolina at Pembroke–
Health Sciences Center UNC/PEM21-1
Givens Performing Arts Center UNC/PEM23-1
University of North Carolina School of the Arts–
Stevens Center Renovation–Phase 2 UNC/SA23-1
New High School Residence Hall UNC/SA23-2
University of North Carolina at Wilmington–
Cameron Hall–Comprehensive Renovation/Expansion UNC/WIL23-1
Kenan Auditorium–Comprehensive Renovation/Expansion UNC/WIL23-2
DeLoach Hall–Modernization UNC/WIL23-3
Health Education/I.S.A.T. Building UNC/WIL23-4
Western Carolina University–
Replacement Engineering Building
UNC/WCU23-
1
Winston-Salem State University–
K.R. Williams Auditorium UNC/WSS21-1
Eller Hall–Renovation & Elevator Addition UNC/WSS23-1
Pegram Hall–Renovation & Elevator Addition UNC/WSS23-2
PBS North Carolina UNC/PBS23-1
UNC Board of Governors–
UNC Lease Funds UNC/BOG21-1
NC Care Health Clinics UNC/BOG23-1
Page 146 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
NC Care Hospital Investment UNC/BOG23-2
Children's Hospital UNC/BOG23-3
Systems Office–Project Management Personnel UNC/BOG25-1

Repairs and Renovations–The University of North Carolina UNC/R&R21
Repairs and Renovations–State Agencies (non-UNC) R&R21
SCIF-Related Personnel
PERS2
1
Wildlife Resources Commission–Setzer Hatchery Revision WRC23-1
SECTION 40.3.(b) This subsection authorizes the following capital projects in the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium based upon projected cash flow needs for the authorized projects. The
authorizations provided in this subsection represent the maximum amount of funding from the
State Capital and Infrastructure Fund that may be expended on each project and do not reflect
authorizations from other non-State Capital and Infrastructure Fund sources. An additional action
by the General Assembly is required to increase the maximum authorization for any of the
projects listed:
Capital Improvements–
State Capital and Previous New/Updated
Infrastructure Fund Project Authorization Project Authorization
DEQ26-1 N/A $8,000,000
DEQ26-2 N/A 3,320,250
DEQ26-3 N/A 6,257,230
DEQ26-4 N/A 1,889,462
DEQ26-5 N/A 1,976,154
DEQ26-6 N/A 125,000
DEQ26-7 N/A 400,000
DEQ26-8 N/A 437,994
DEQ26-9 N/A 6,000,000
DEQ26-10 N/A 4,000,000
DHHS23-1 1,352,000 2,652,000
DHHS23-2 5,983,000 17,519,339
DHHS23-3 5,405,000 18,803,000
DHHS26-1 N/A 24,848,348
DHHS26-2 N/A 6,000,000
DHHS26-3 N/A 41,128,337
DNCR21-5 45,000,000 52,000,00
DNCR23-2 15,000,000 19,400,000
DNCR26-1 N/A 5,800,000
DNCR26-2 N/A 5,300,000
DNCR26-3 N/A 8,082,500
DNCR26-4 N/A 10,662,000
DNCR26-5 N/A 11,500,000
DNCR26-6 N/A 5,000,000
DAC26-1 N/A 49,321,016
DAC26-2 N/A 60,464,040
DAC26-3 N/A 12,480,000
NCSD26-1 N/A 7,500,000
ENCSD26-1 N/A 21,500,000
ENCSD26-2 N/A 9,700,000
GMS26-1 N/A 8,405,180
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 147

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
NCGA21-3 $320,000,000 $331,300,000341,400,00
DPI25-1 N/A 2,500,000
DPI26-1 N/A 13,905,882
DPI26-2 N/A 10,000,000
DPS21-1 10,702,952 14,168,707
DPS21-2 1,831,000 4,265,320
DPS21-5 4,170,000 40,390,000
DPS21-6 7,139,374 12,741,749
DPS23-3 35,000,000 63,785,000
DPS23-6 690,000 1,349,000
DPS23-7 43,336,785 84,103,000
DPS23-3 35,000,000 53,466,000
DPS23-7 43,336,785 72,572,000
NG23-1 24,000,000 28,000,000
NG23-2 12,500,000 13,300,000
NG23-3 16,428,582 18,678,582
NG26-1 N/A 5,000,000
NG26-2 N/A 8,800,000
NG26-3 N/A 6,600,000
SBI26-1 N/A 33,459,000
SBI26-2 N/A 3,318,000
DMVA26-1 N/A 10,000,000
DOA22-1 88,000,000 01,400,000
DOA23-1 33,744,000 33,171,600
DOA23-5 45,000,000 57,200,000
UNC/ASU21-1 40,000,000 45,000,000
UNC/ASU21-2 54,000,000 74,000,000
UNC/ECS21-2 2,500,000 7,500,000
UNC/ECS25-1 N/A 12,000,000
UNC/NCC23-2 12,999,424 19,499,424
UNC/NCS23-1 30,000,000 40,000,000
UNC/NCS23-6 3,000,000 16,000,000
UNC/NCS24-1 5,000,000 185,000,000
UNC/AVL23-1 26,150,000 30,150,000N/A
UNC/AVL25-1 N/A 3,000,000
UNC/SSM23-2 28,988,042 43,988,042
UNC/SSM25-1 N/A 2,180,000
UNC/PEM23-1 61,000,000 131,004,985
UNC/WIL24-123-4 8,000,000 83,000,000
UNC/WCU23-1 95,300,000 157,900,000
UNC/BOG23-2 150,000,000 0
UNC/BOG23-3 319,746,392 216,246,392
UNC/BOG25-1 N/A 4,000,000

SIX-YEAR INTENDED PROJECT ALLOCATION SCHEDULE
SECTION 40.4. It is the intent of the General Assembly to fund capital improvement
projects on a cash flow basis and to plan for future project funding based upon projected
availability in the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund. Nothing in this section shall be construed
(i) to appropriate funds or (ii) as an obligation by the General Assembly to appropriate funds for
the projects listed in future years. The following schedule lists capital improvement projects that
Page 148 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
will begin or be completed in fiscal years outside of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and estimated
amounts (in thousands) needed for completion of those projects:

Project Code FY25-26 FY26-27 FY27-28 FY28-29 FY29-30 FY30-31

PERS21 3,154.9 3,154.9 3,154.9 3,154.9 3,154.9 3,154.9
UNC/R&R21 200,000 300,000 200,000 200,000 200,000 200,000
R&R21 200,000 300,000 200,000 200,000 200,000 200,000
DACS23-3 N/A 2,000 4,000 4,000 N/A N/A
DACS23-7 N/A 4,000 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DACS23-8 N/A 2,000 1,000 1,000 1,000 N/A
DACS23-9 N/A 750 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DACS23-10 N/A 2,000 2,000 2,200 N/A N/A
DACS23-11 N/A 1,500 1,500 N/A N/A N/A
DEQ26-1 N/A 4,000 4,000 N/A N/A N/A
DEQ26-2 N/A 3,320.25 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DEQ26-3 N/A 3,128.62 3,128.62 N/A N/A N/A
DEQ26-4 N/A 1,889.46 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DEQ26-5 N/A 1,976.15 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DEQ26-6 N/A 125 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DEQ26-7 N/A 400 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DEQ26-8 N/A 437.99 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DEQ26-9 N/A 3,000 3,000 N/A N/A N/A
DEQ26-10 N/A 2,000 2,000 N/A N/A N/A
DNCR21-5 N/A 20,000 20,000 N/A N/A N/A
DNCR21-13 86,800 30,950 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DNCR23-1 N/A 30,000 24,000 N/A N/A N/A
DNCR23-2 N/A 4,400 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DNCR26-1 N/A 1,000 4,800 N/A N/A N/A
DNCR26-2 N/A 5,300 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DNCR26-3 N/A 8,082.5 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DNCR26-4 N/A 1,000 9,662 N/A N/A N/A
DNCR26-5 N/A 2,000 9,500 N/A N/A N/A
DNCR26-6 N/A 5,000 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DHHS23-1 N/A 1,300 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DHHS23-2 N/A 5,768.17 5,768.17 N/A N/A N/A
DHHS23-3 N/A 13,398 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DHHS26-1 N/A 12,424.17 12,424.17 N/A N/A N/A
DHHS26-2 N/A 6,000 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DHHS26-3 N/A 13,709.45 13,709.45 13,709.45 N/A N/A
DOA22-1 N/A 1,400 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DOA22-3 N/A N/A 21,000 N/A 24,000 N/A
DOA23-1 N/A 3,000 15,000 15,171.6 N/A N/A
DOA23-2 N/A 800 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DOA23-3 N/A N/A N/A 11,000 N/A N/A
DOA23-4 N/A N/A 15,000 N/A N/A N/A
DOA23-5 N/A 5,000 23,000 23,000 6,200 N/A
DOI21-1 N/A 13,750 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DAC26-1 N/A 10,000 10,000 29,321.02 N/A N/A
DAC26-2 N/A 30,000 30,464.04 N/A N/A N/A
DAC26-3 N/A 12,480 N/A N/A N/A N/A
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 149

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
DPS21-1 N/A 3,465.76 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DPS21-2 N/A 2,434.32 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DPS21-5 N/A 27,100 9,120 N/A N/A N/A
DPS21-6 N/A 5,602.38 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DPS23-1 N/A 10,000 29,850 N/A N/A N/A
DPS23-3 N/A 28,785 28,785 1,815 N/A N/A
DPS23-4 N/A N/A N/A 19,000 48,500 77,600
DPS23-6 N/A 659 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DPS23-7 N/A 40,766.22 18,501.55 18,501.55 N/A N/A
NG23-1 N/A 4,000 6,000 N/A N/A N/A
NG23-4 N/A 6,500 N/A N/A N/A N/A
NG23-5 N/A N/A 800 4,000 3,200 N/A
NG23-9 N/A 3,000 N/A N/A N/A N/A
NG26-1 N/A 3,000 2,000 N/A N/A N/A
NG26-2 N/A 800 8,000 N/A N/A N/A
NG26-3 N/A 600 6,000 N/A N/A N/A
SBI26-1 N/A 6,234 13,612.5 13,612.5 N/A N/A
SBI26-2 N/A 472 2,846 N/A N/A N/A
DMVA26-1 N/A 10,000 N/A N/A N/A N/A
NCSD26-1 N/A 7,500 N/A N/A N/A N/A
ENCSD26-1 N/A 2,150 9,675 9,675 N/A N/A
ENCSD26-2 N/A 970 4,365 4,365 N/A N/A
GMS26-1 N/A 8,405.18 N/A N/A N/A N/A
DPI26-1 N/A 1,905.88 2,000 5,000 5,000 N/A
DPI26-2 N/A 250 500 1,250 8,000 N/A
TRAN23-1 125,000 50,000 N/A N/A N/A N/A
NCGA21-3 65,250 5,050 5,050 N/A N/A N/A
NCGA23-1 26,000 16,250 N/A N/A N/A N/A
UNC/ASU21-2 N/A 10,000 10,000 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/ASU22-1 N/A 11,350 13,050 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/ASU23-1 N/A 11,700 4,500 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/CLT23-1 N/A 12,600 9,900 9,900 N/A N/A
UNC/CLT23-2 N/A N/A 4,500 N/A 15,000 25,500
UNC/CH23-1 N/A N/A 2,500 10,000 N/A 10,000
UNC/ECU21-1 60,000 85,742.7 12,003.64 12,003.64 N/A N/A
UNC/ECU23-1 N/A 13,800 13,800 13,800 N/A N/A
UNC/ECU23-2 N/A N/A 1,890 N/A 10,000 7,010
UNC/ECU23-3 N/A 8,750 N/A N/A N/A N/A
UNC/PEM21-1 30,500 24,400 4,250 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/PEM23-1 N/A N/A 32,150 22,750 30,000 40,005
UNC/ECS21-2 N/A 5,000 N/A N/A N/A N/A
UNC/ECS23-1 N/A 827 N/A N/A N/A N/A
UNC/ECS23-2 N/A N/A 1,250 N/A 11,250 N/A
UNC/FSU23-1 N/A N/A 2,075 N/A 12,000 6,675
UNC/FSU23-2 N/A 5,500 N/A N/A N/A N/A
UNC/A&T23-1 N/A N/A N/A N/A 5,335 N/A
UNC/A&T23-2 N/A 5,335 30,041.25 30,041.25 30,041.25 30,041.25
UNC/NCC23-1 N/A 2,000.42 8,866 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/NCC23-2 N/A 650 8,774.74 8,774.74 N/A N/A
UNC/NCC23-3 N/A 2,975 4,675 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/NCS23-1 N/A 10,000 N/A N/A N/A N/A
Page 150 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
UNC/NCS23-2 24,000 28,000 20,000 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/NCS23-3 N/A 18,900 12,600 12,600 12,600 N/A
UNC/NCS23-4 N/A 35,000 21,250 21,250 21,250 21,250
UNC/NCS23-5 5,000 N/A 35,000 67,000 80,000 13,000
UNC/NCS24-1 N/A 25,048.75 38,737.81 38,737.81 38,737.81 38,737.81
UNC/SSM23-2 3,000 4,800 11,719.02 11,719.02 N/A N/A
UNC/SSM23-4 1,000 N/A 9,000 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/AVL23-1 N/A 11,767.5 5,230 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/CLT23-1 N/A 12,600 9,900 9,900 N/A N/A
UNC/GBO23-1 N/A 8,470 13,310 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/SA23-1 22,950 10,200 N/A N/A N/A N/A
UNC/SA23-2 N/A N/A 2,450 8,575 N/A 13,475
UNC/WIL23-1 N/A 7,725 14,160 14,160 N/A N/A
UNC/WIL23-2 N/A 5,200 14,240 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/WIL23-3 N/A N/A 3,000 4,860 N/A N/A
UNC/WIL23-4 N/A 7,500 16,875 16,875 16,875 16,875
UNC/WIL24-1 N/A N/A 29,644 23,723 21,633 N/A
UNC/WCU23-1 N/A 6,260 37,410 37,410 37,410 37,410
UNC/WSS21-1 N/A 14,650 N/A N/A N/A N/A
UNC/WSS23-1 N/A N/A N/A N/A 1,080 5,140
UNC/WSS23-2 N/A N/A N/A N/A 1,600 8,000
UNC/PBS23-1 N/A 17,325 9,075 9,075 9,075 N/A
UNC/BOG21-1 3,750 3,750 N/A N/A N/A N/A
UNC/BOG23-1 N/A 105,000 N/A N/A N/A N/A
UNC/BOG23-3 N/A 103,500 N/A N/A N/A N/A
UNC/BOG25-1 1,000 1,000 1,000 1,000 N/A N/A
WRC23-1 N/A 6,000 N/A N/A N/A N/A

NON-GENERAL FUND/NON-SCIF CAPITAL PROJECT AUTHORIZATIONS
SECTION 40.5. The General Assembly authorizes the following capital projects to
be funded with receipts or from other non-General Fund and non-State Capital and Infrastructure
Fund sources available to the appropriate department:
Amount of Non-General Fund/Non-SCIF
Name of Project Funding Authorized
FY 2026-2027
Department of Natural and Cultural Resources
Jennette's Pier Aquarium–
Solar Covered Walkway $450,000
Roanoke Island Aquarium–
Invertebrate Tank $500,000
Pine Knoll Shores Aquarium–
Invertebrate Tank $2,000,000
NC Zoo–
Elephant Shelters & Barn Bollard Repair $2,500,000
State Historic Sites–
House in the Horseshoe–
Alston House Rehabilitation $445,000
Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services
Umstead Research Station Beef Program Buildout $2,500,000
Department of Military and Veterans Affairs
Eastern Carolina State Veterans Cemetery Expansion $2,138,450
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 151

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Western Carolina State Veterans Cemetery Expansion $1,954,150
Department of Public Safety
Alcoholic Beverage Control–
ABC Warehouse Repairs $1,150,000
Wildlife Resources Commission
Game Land Improvements Morganton Depot Dam $1,086,881
D7 Storage Building $400,000
Caswell Shooting Range Renovation $3,850,000
Shooting Ranges Renovations $4,000,000
Ransom Road Depot $10,000,000
Land Acquisition $30,000,000
WRC Game Land Improvements $6,000,000
McKinney Lake Hatchery Building Replacement $1,300,00
Table Rock Hatchery Residence $640,000
New Tillery Office Depot $1,500,000
Inland Fish District 2 Storage Building $840,000
Butner Lab and Office Building $1,900,000
Caswell Depot Expansion $100,000

TOTAL AMOUNT OF NON-GENERAL
FUND/NON-SCIF CAPITAL PROJECTS
AUTHORIZED $75,254,481

INCREASE DOLLAR THRESHOLDS FOR DEFINITION OF CAPITAL
IMPROVEMENT
SECTION 40.6. G.S. 143C-1-1(d) reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C‑1‑1. Purpose and definitions.
…
(d) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
…
(5) Capital improvement. – A term that includes real property acquisition, new
construction or rehabilitation of existing facilities, and repairs and renovations
over one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($100,000) ($150,000) in value.
…."

INCREASE DOLLAR THRESHOLD FOR FORMAL BIDDING OF CAPITAL
PROJECTS
SECTION 40.7.(a) G.S. 143-129 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143‑129. Procedure for letting of public contracts.
(a) Bidding Required. No construction or repair work requiring the estimated expenditure
of public money in an amount equal to or more than one million five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000)($1,500,000) or purchase of apparatus, supplies, materials, or equipment requiring an
estimated expenditure of public money in an amount equal to or more than ninety thousand
dollars ($90,000) may be performed, nor may any contract be awarded therefor, by any board or
governing body of the State, or of any institution of the State government, or of any political
subdivision of the State, unless the provisions of this section are complied with; provided that
the University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions may award contracts for
construction or repair work that requires an estimated expenditure of less than one million five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) ($1,500,000) without complying with the provisions of this
section.
…."
Page 152 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 40.7.(b) G.S. 143-64.34 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-64.34. Exemption of certain projects.
State capital improvement projects under the jurisdiction of the State Building Commission,
capital improvement projects of the University of North Carolina, and community college capital
improvement projects, where the estimated expenditure of public money is less than one million
five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) ($1,500,000) are exempt from the provisions of this
article."
SECTION 40.7.(c) G.S. 143-128(g) reads as rewritten:
"§ 143‑128. Requirements for certain building contracts.
…
(g) Exceptions. – This section shall not apply to:
(1) The purchase and erection of prefabricated or relocatable buildings or portions
thereof, except that portion of the work which must be performed at the
construction site.
(2) The erection, construction, alteration, or repair of a building when the cost
thereof is three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) or less.
(3) The erection, construction, alteration, or repair of a building by The University
of North Carolina or its constituent institutions when the cost thereof is five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or less.
…."

UNC CAPITAL PROJECT MANAGEMENT FLEXIBILITY
SECTION 40.8. G.S. 143C-4-3.1(e) reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C-4-3.1. State Capital and Infrastructure Fund.
…
(e) Use of Funds. – Monies in the Fund shall first be used to meet the debt service
obligations supported by the General Fund. In addition to meeting the debt service obligations
supported by the General Fund, monies in the Fund may be used for the following purposes:
…
(5) Up to 5% of the funds allocated for projects at the University of North
Carolina authorized under subsection (1) and (2) of this section may be used
by the University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions to provide
time-limited support for construction management personnel.
…."

DEPARTMENT OF ADULT CORRECTION CAPITAL PROJECT ALLOWABLE USE
SECTION 40.9. Notwithstanding the Committee Report referenced in Section 40.2
of this act or any other provision of law to the contrary, the allocation to the Department of Adult
Correction for project code DAC 23-1 Stun Fencing, may also be used for fire alarm and fire
suppression systems replacement at eight facilities.

DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS CAPITAL PROJECTS
CONSULTATION REQUIREMENT
SECTION 40.10. G.S. 143C-8-12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C‑8‑12. Capital improvement projects from sources other than the General Fund.
(a) University Projects. – Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, the Board
of Governors of The University of North Carolina may approve any of the following:
(1) Expenditures to plan a capital improvement project of The University of North
Carolina, the planning for which is to be funded entirely with non‑General
Fund and non‑State Capital and Infrastructure Fund monies.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 153

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Expenditures for a capital improvement project of The University of North
Carolina that is to be funded and operated entirely with non‑General Fund and
non‑State Capital and Infrastructure Fund monies.
(3) A change in the scope of any previously approved capital improvement project
of The University of North Carolina provided that both the project and change
in scope are funded entirely with non‑General Fund and non‑State Capital and
Infrastructure Fund monies.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit expenditures for planning for a
project that has been authorized by an act of the General Assembly and funded with an allocation
from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund.
(b) Carryforward Funds. – For purposes of this section, the term "non‑General Fund and
non‑State Capital and Infrastructure Fund monies" includes funds carried forward from one fiscal
year to another pursuant to G.S. 116‑30.3 and G.S. 116‑30.3B. These funds shall only be used
for projects listed in G.S. 143C‑8‑13(a).
(c) National Guard Projects. – Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, the
North Carolina National Guard may approve expenditures for a capital project of the North
Carolina National Guard if (i) the project will be funded entirely with federal funds and (ii) any
operating costs associated with the project will be paid entirely with federal funds.
(d) Department of Military and Veterans Affairs Projects - Notwithstanding any other
provision in this Chapter, the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs may approve
expenditures for a capital project of the Department if the project will be funded entirely with
non-General Funds.
(d)(e) Reporting. – The Board of Governors, the Department of Military and Veterans
Affairs, and the National Guard shall report any expenditure made pursuant to this section to the
Office of State Budget and Management and to the Joint Legislative Commission on
Governmental Operations."

PART XLI. TRANSPORTATION

CASH FLOW HIGHWAY FUND AND HIGHWAY TRUST FUND APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 41.1.(a) Subsections (b) and (c) of Section 41.1 of S.L. 2023-134 are
repealed.
SECTION 41.1.(b) The General Assembly authorizes and certifies anticipated
revenues for the Highway Fund as follows:
For Fiscal Year 2027-2028 $ 3,495 million
For Fiscal Year 2028-2029 $ 3,697 million
For Fiscal Year 2029-2030 $ 3,750 million
For Fiscal Year 2030-2031 $ 3,811 million
For Fiscal Year 2031-2032 $ 3,878 million.
SECTION 41.1.(c) The General Assembly authorizes and certifies anticipated
revenues for the Highway Trust Fund as follows:
For Fiscal Year 2027-2028 $ 2,648 million
For Fiscal Year 2028-2029 $ 2,750 million
For Fiscal Year 2029-2030 $ 2,815 million
For Fiscal Year 2030-2031 $ 2,893 million
For Fiscal Year 2031-2032 $ 2,973 million.
SECTION 41.1.(d) The Department of Transportation, in collaboration with the
Office of State Budget and Management, shall develop a 10-year revenue forecast. The 10-year
revenue forecast developed under this subsection shall be used (i) to develop the five-year cash
flow estimates included in the biennial budgets, (ii) to develop the Strategic Transportation
Page 154 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Improvement Program, and (iii) by the Department of the State Treasurer to compute
transportation debt capacity.

CAPITAL, REPAIRS, AND RENOVATIONS
SECTION 41.2.(a) For the 2026-27 fiscal year, the funds appropriated in this act
from the Highway Fund to the Department of Transportation for capital, repairs, and
renovations shall be used as follows:

Capital – Highway Fund FY 2026-27
Jones and Wake County Maintenance Yards Relocation $14,100,000
DMV High Need Driver License Office Expansion / Replacement $9,513,813

SECTION 41.2.(b) The Governor and General Assembly anticipate appropriating
the following additional funds in the 2027-29 fiscal biennium to complete the projects set out in
subsection (a) of this section:

Capital – Highway Fund FY 2027-28 FY 2028-29
Jones and Wake County Maintenance Yards Relocation $58,500,000 $19,500,000
DMV High Need Driver License Office
Expansion / Replacement $9,513,813 -

TRANSPORTATION EMERGENCY RESERVE
SECTION 41.3.(a) Section 1H.1 of S.L. 2024-57 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1H.1. Of the funds appropriated to the Department of Transportation, the sum
of one hundred twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000) from the Transportation Emergency
Reserve shall be used for repair and reconstruction of transportation infrastructure in the affected
area. Notwithstanding G.S. 136-44.2E(b) and G.S. 136-44.2E(f)(1), in the discretion of the
Secretary of Transportation, the required transfer of funds from the Highway Fund to the
Transportation Reserve may be delayed or suspended until July 30, 2027December 31, 2028. No
other provision of G.S. 136-44.2E is affected by this section."
SECTION 41.3.(b) Section 1B.1.(b) of S.L. 2025-92 is repealed.

AMEND SAFETY INSPECTION FEE
SECTION 41.4 G.S. 20-183.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-183.7. Fees for performing an inspection and issuing an electronic inspection
authorization to a vehicle; use of civil penalties.
(a) Fee Amount. – When a fee applies to an inspection of a vehicle or the issuance of an
electronic inspection authorization, the fee must be collected. The following fees apply to an
inspection of a vehicle and the issuance of an electronic inspection authorization:

Type Inspection Authorization
Safety Only $12.75 $ .85$2.00
Emissions and Safety 23.75 6.25.

The fee for performing an inspection of a vehicle applies when an inspection is performed,
regardless of whether the vehicle passes the inspection. The fee for an electronic inspection
authorization applies when an electronic inspection authorization is issued to a vehicle. The fee
for inspecting after-factory tinted windows shall be ten dollars ($10.00), and the fee applies
only to an inspection performed with a light meter after a safety inspection mechanic
determined that the window had after-factory tint. A safety inspection mechanic shall not
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 155

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
inspect an after-factory tinted window of a vehicle for which the Division has issued a medical
exception permit pursuant to G.S. 20-127(f).
A vehicle that is inspected at an inspection station and fails the inspection is entitled to be
reinspected at the same station at any time within 60 days of the failed inspection without
paying another inspection fee.
The inspection fee for an emissions and safety inspection set out in this subsection is the
maximum amount that an inspection station or an inspection mechanic may charge for an
emissions and safety inspection of a vehicle. An inspection station or an inspection mechanic
may charge the maximum amount or any lesser amount for an emissions and safety inspection
of a vehicle. The inspection fee for a safety only inspection set out in this subsection may not
be increased or decreased. The authorization fees set out in this subsection may not be
increased or decreased.
(b) Self-Inspector. – The fee for an inspection does not apply to an inspection performed by
a self-inspector. The fee for issuing an electronic inspection authorization to a vehicle applies
to an inspection performed by a self-inspector.
(c) Fee Distribution. – Fees collected for electronic inspection authorizations are payable to
the Division of Motor Vehicles. The amount of each fee listed in the table below shall be
credited to the Highway Fund, the Volunteer Rescue/EMS Fund established in G.S. 58-87-5,
the Rescue Squad Workers' Relief Fund established in G.S. 58-88-5, and the Division of Air
Quality of the Department of Environmental Quality:
Recipient Safety Only Electronic Emissions and Safety
Authorization Electronic Authorization
Highway Fund .551.43 5.30
Volunteer Rescue/EMS Fund .18 .18
Rescue Squad Workers' Relief Fund .12 .12
Division of Air Quality .00 .27 .65
…"

FERRY CAPITAL SPECIAL FUND
SECTION 41.5 G.S. 136.82.(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Use of Toll Proceeds. – The Department of Transportation shall deposit the proceeds
from tolls collected on North Carolina Ferry System routes and route-generated receipts
authorized under subsection (f) of this section to fund codes within the Ferry Capital Special
Fund for each of the Highway Divisions in which system terminals are located and fares are
earned. For the purposes of this subsection, fares are earned based on the terminals from which
a passenger trip originates and terminates. Commuter pass receipts shall be deposited
proportionately to each fund code based on the distribution of trips originating and terminating
in each Highway Division. The proceeds deposited to each fund code shall be used exclusively
for prioritized North Carolina Ferry System ferry passenger vessel replacement projects in the
Division in which the proceeds are earned. Proceeds deposited to each fund code may be used
to fund ferry passenger vessel replacement projects or supplement funds allocated for ferry
passenger vessel replacement projects approved in the Transportation Improvement Program,
to fund vessel maintenance related to U.S. Coast Guard required Credit Dry Docks, and to fund
vessel system retrofits and upgrades to extend the serviceable life of a vessel."

AUTHORIZE CARRYFORWARD OF FERRY FUNDS
SECTION 41.7 G.S. 136.82.(h) reads as rewritten:
"Transfer of Funds. – Notwithstanding G.S. 136‑44.2(f), G.S. 136‑44.2(f1), and any other
provision of law to the contrary, beginning with the 2021‑2022 fiscal year, no later than 45
days after the first day of the fiscal year, the Department of Transportation shall transfer from
the Highway Fund to the Ferry Systemwide fund code within the Ferry Capital Special Fund all
Page 156 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
unexpended and unencumbered funds appropriated to the Ferry Division's budget from the
prior fiscal year. Any funds categorized as unencumbered shall be deposited in the Ferry
Systemwide fund code. Any funds categorized as encumbered shall be deposited into a
specified fund code for encumbrances."

ELIGIBLE USES OF FERRY FEDERAL FORMULA FUNDS
SECTION 41.8 G.S. 136.189.11.(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Funds With Alternate Criteria. – The following federal program activities shall be
included in the applicable category of the Transportation Investment Strategy Formula set forth
in subsection (d) of this section but shall not be subject to the prioritization criteria set forth in
that subsection:
…
(6) Ferry boat replacements and preservation."

AUTHORIZE ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION FEES FOR FERRIES
SECTION 41.9 G.S. 136.82 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(b3) Transaction Fee Authorized for Electronic Payment. – When the Department of
Transportation accepts electronic payment, as that term is defined in G.S. 147-86.20, for any
toll or fee authorized under this Article, thr Department may add a transaction fee to each
electronic payment transaction to offset the service charge the Department pays for electronic
payment service. The transaction fee authorized under this subsection shall not exceed two
percent (2%) of the electronic payment."

REALLOCATE SOUTH DOCK STACKING LANES APPROPRIATION
SECTION 41.10 Notwithstanding the Committee Report described in Section 43.2
of S.L. 2023-134 or any other provision of law, the sum of one million five hundred thousand
dollars ($1,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2023-2024 fiscal year allocated to build
stacking lanes and a concrete barrier on NC 12 at the South Dock Ferry Terminal on Ocracoke
shall instead be used for ramp rehabilitation on the South Dock Ferry Terminal to address
safety and reliability concerns.

PART XLII. FINANCE PROVISIONS

MAINTAIN PERSONAL INCOME TAX RATE
SECTION 42.1.(a) G.S. 105-153.7(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.7. Individual income tax imposed.
(a) Tax. – A tax is imposed for each taxable year on the North Carolina taxable income
of every individual. The tax shall be levied, collected, and paid annually. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (a1) of this section, tThe tax is a percentage of the taxpayer's North
Carolina taxable income computed as follows:
Taxable Years Beginning Tax
In 2022 4.99%
In 2023 4.75%
In 2024 4.5%
In 2025 4.25%
After 2025 3.99%."
SECTION 42.1.(b) G.S. 105-153.7.(a1) is repealed.
SECTION 42.1.(c) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.

MAINTAIN COMPETITIVE CORPORATE INCOME TAX RATE
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 157

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 42.2.(a) G.S. 105-130.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-130.3. Corporations
A tax is imposed on the State net income of every C Corporation doing business in this State.
An S Corporation is not subject to the tax levied in this section. The tax is a percentage of the
taxpayer's State net income computed as follows:
Taxable Years Beginning Tax
In 2025 2.25%
In 2026 After 2025 2%2%."
In 2028 1%
After 2029 0%.
SECTION 42.2.(b) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.

ENACT BACK TO SCHOOL SALES AND USE TAX HOLIDAY
SECTION 42.3.(a) Part 3 of Article 5 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 105-164.13G. Educational sales and use tax holiday.
(a) The state and local taxes imposed by this Article do not apply to the following items of
tangible personal property if sold between 12:01 AM on the first Friday of August and the
11:59PM the following Sunday:
(1) Clothing with a sales price of one hundred dollars ($100.00) or less per item.
(2) School supplies with a sales price of one hundred dollars ($100.00) or less per
item.
(3) Computers with a sales price of seven hundred and fifty dollars ($750) or less
per item.
(3a) Computer supplies with a sales price of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) or
less per item.
(b) The exemption allowed by this section does not apply to the following:
(1) Sales of clothing accessories or equipment.
(2) Sales of protective equipment.
(3) Sales of furniture.
(4) Sales of an item for use in a trade or business.
(5) Rentals.
(c) Hold Harmless. – The purpose of this section is to hold county and municipal governments
harmless for the revenue losses resulting from the sales tax holiday established in this section (a)
of this section. The amount each county may receive is determined as follows:
(1) Distribution Amount. – The distribution amount is nine million three hundred
thousand ($9,300,000) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026. For fiscal
years beginning on or after July 1, 2027, the distribution amount is equal to
the amount for the preceding year multiplied by 3.5% and rounded to the
nearest one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
(2) County Allocation. – The Secretary shall, in October of each fiscal year,
allocate to each taxing county the distribution amount on a per capita basis as
calculated in G.S. 105-486(a). For the purposes of this section, “taxing
county” means a county that levies the first one-half cent (1/2¢) local sales
and use tax under Article 40 of this Chapter."
SECTION 42.3(b) This section is effective for fiscal years beginning on or after July
1, 2026.

ENACT WORKING FAMILIES TAX CREDIT
Page 158 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 42.4(a) G.S. 105-151.31 is reenacted as it existed immediately before its
expiration and reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-151.31. Earned IncomeWorking Families Tax Credit
(a) Credit. An individual who claims for the taxable year an earned income tax credit under
section 32 of the Code is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this Part equal to a
percentage ten percent (10%) of the amount of credit the individual qualified for under section
32 of the Code. A nonresident or part-year resident who claims the credit allowed by this section
must reduce the amount of the credit by multiplying it by the fraction calculated under G.S. 105
134.5(b) or (c)G.S. 105.153.4(b) or (c), as appropriate. The percentage is as follows:
(1) For taxable year 2013, four and one-half percent (4.5%).
(2) For all other taxable years, five percent (5%).
(b) Credit Refundable. If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the amount of tax imposed
by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, the Secretary must
refund the excess to the taxpayer. The refundable excess is governed by the provisions governing
a refund of an overpayment by the taxpayer of the tax imposed in this Part. Section 3507 of the
Code, Advance Payment of Earned Income Credit, does not apply to the credit allowed by this
section. In computing the amount of tax against which multiple credits are allowed,
nonrefundable credits are subtracted before refundable credits.
(c) Sunset. – this section is repealed for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014."
SECTION 42.4(b) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.

REENACT MODIFIED CHILD AND DEPENDENT CARE TAX CREDIT
SECTION 42.5.(a) G.S. 105-151.11 is reenacted as it existed immediately before its
expiration, is recodified as G.S. 105-153.11, and reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-151.11. Credit for child care and certain employment-related expenses.
(a) Credit. – A person who is allowed a credit against federal income tax for a percentage of
employment-related expenses under section 21 of the Code shall be allowed as a credit against
the tax imposed by this Part an amount equal to the applicable percentage thirty percent (30%)
of the amount of the credit provided for in Section 21 of the Code Code, except as reduced by
the percentage reduction in subsection (c), which is claimed and allowed pursuant to the Internal
Revenue Code. To claim the credit allowed by this section, the taxpayer must provide with the
tax return the information required by the Secretary of Revenue.
(a1) Applicable Percentage. - For employment-related expenses that are incurred only with
respect to one or more dependents who are seven years old or older and are not physically or
mentally incapable of caring for themselves, the applicable percentage is the appropriate
percentage in the column labeled "Percentage A" in the table below, based on the taxpayer's
adjusted gross income determined under the Code. For employment-related expenses with
respect to any other qualifying individual, the applicable percentage is the appropriate percentage
in the column labeled "Percentage B" in the table below, based on the taxpayer's adjusted gross
income determined under the Code.
Filing Status Adjusted Gross Income Percentage A Percentage B
Head of Up to $20,000 9% 13%
Household
Over $20,000 8% 11.5%
up to $32,000

Over $32,000 7% 10%

Surviving
Spouse or
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 159

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Joint Return Up to $25,000 9% 13%

Over $25,000
up to $40,000 8% 11.5%

Over $40,000 7% 10%

Single Up to $15,000 9% 13%

Over $15,000
up to $24,000 8% 11.5%

Over $24,000 7% 10%

Married
Filing
Separately Up to $12,500 9% 13%

Over $12,500
up to $20,000 8% 11.5%

Over $20,000 7% 10%
(b) Employment Related Expenses. – The amount of employment-related expenses for which
a credit may be claimed may not exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) if the taxpayer's
household includes one qualifying individual, as defined in section 21(b)(1) of the Code, and
may not exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000) if the taxpayer's household includes more than one
qualifying individual. The amount of employment-related expenses for which a credit may be
claimed is reduced by the amount of employer-provided dependent care assistance excluded from
gross income.
(c) Phaseout. – The credit allowed by this section shall be reduced by a percentage listed
below, rounded to the nearest percentage point, based on the taxpayer’s adjusted gross income
as calculated under the Code:

Filling Status For AGI Exceeding Percentage Reduction
Married, filing jointly $150,000 The lesser of 100% or
[(Taxpayer’s AGI - $150,000) / $50,000]
Head of Household $112,500 The lesser of 100% or
[(Taxpayer’s AGI - $112,500) / $37,500]
Single or Married, The lesser of 100% or
Filing Separately $75,000 [(Taxpayer’s AGI - $75,000) / $25,000]
(c)(d) Limitations. – A nonresident or part-year resident who claims the credit allowed by
this section shall reduce the amount of the credit by multiplying it by the fraction calculated under
G.S. 105-134.5(b) or (c), G.S. 105-153.4(b) or (c), as appropriate. No credit shall be allowed
under this section for amounts deducted in calculating North Carolina taxable income. The credit
allowed by this section may not exceed the amount of tax imposed by this Part for the taxable
year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, except for payments of tax made by or on behalf
of the taxpayer.
(e) Credit Refundable. – If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the amount of tax
imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, the Secretary
must refund the excess to the taxpayer. The refundable excess is governed by the provisions
governing a refund of an overpayment by the taxpayer of the tax imposed in this Part. In
Page 160 Senate Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
computing the amount of tax against which multiple credits are allowed, nonrefundable credits
are subtracted before refundable credits."
SECTION 42.5.(b) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.

INCREASE THE STANDARD DEDUCTION
SECTION 42.6.(a) G.S. 105-153.5(a)(1) reads as rewritten:
"(1) Standard deduction amount. – The standard deduction amount is zero for a
person who is not eligible for a standard deduction under section 63 of the
Code. For all other taxpayers, the standard deduction amount is equal to the
amount listed in the table below based on the taxpayer's filing status:
Filing Status Standard Deduction
Married, filing jointly/surviving spouse $25,500$26,500
Head of Household 19,12519,875
Single 12,75013,250
Married, filing separately 12,750.13,250. "
SECTION 42.6.(b) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2027.

PART XLIII. MISCELLANEOUS

STATE BUDGET ACT APPLIES
SECTION 43.1. The provisions of the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C of the
General Statutes, are reenacted and shall remain in full force and effect and are incorporated in
this act by reference.

APPROPRIATIONS LIMITATIONS AND DIRECTIONS APPLY
SECTION 43.2. Except where expressly repealed or amended by this act, the
provisions of any legislation enacted during the 2025 Regular Session of the General Assembly
affecting the State budget shall remain in effect.

MOST TEXT APPLIES ONLY TO THE 2026-2027 FISCAL year
SECTION 43.3. Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly
indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the textual provisions of
this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2026-2027 fiscal
biennium.

EFFECT OF HEADINGS
SECTION 43.4. The headings to the Parts, Subparts, and sections of this act are a
convenience to the reader and are for reference only. The headings do not expand, limit, or define
the text of this act, except for effective dates referring to a Part or Subpart.

SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 43.5. If any section or provision of this act is declared unconstitutional
or invalid by the courts, it does not affect the validity of this act as a whole or any part other than
the part so declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 43.6. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 915-First Edition Page 161